C
CHAPTER I.
Character...Pedigree... My Father...Fidele...My Uncle...My
Mother...Her death...Discipline...Incidents...Death of Fidele
...Reflections...Death of my little brother...Adventure.
If
there ever
was
a coward upon earth, I am one.
If God ever made a thing so contemptible, I was born
one. From my earliest recollection of myself, the
very name of death was frightful to me: and, when I
came to understand what it meant; and to see how it
fastened upon whatever I happened to love, so invisibly,
yet so fatally; how it altered whatever it touched, till
every body fled from it, even the mother from her babe;
how it affected the voices of men, when they spoke of it
I began to feelI hardly know how, toward itit
was not as other children felt; not, as if death were a
shadow
,
or a power, the common enemy of our racebut,
I hated it with a bitterness and earnestnessand feared
it, with a fear, that kept my blood in a continual
agitation
as
if it were a real, living creature; and my own
particular, deadly enemy. Nay, even now, with all
my experience, and discipline; notwithstanding all that
I have encountered, and suffered, in the hope of
overcoming
this weakness of my nature; it is a fact, that the
very
thought of death, when I am alone, is enough to
drive me distracted.
And yetmy whole life has been one scene of
uninterrupted
adventure; often very desperate and wild; and
always voluntary. How is that contradiction to be
reconciled
?
Many a time, have I done that, from which other
boys would have started back with terrour; and then,
when it was all over; and I was alone, and safe at home,
in my own bed; I have covered up my head in the clothes,
and lain there, with my teeth chattering; or my hair wet
with perspiration, for hours together.
How are these things to be accounted for? Who can
tell me?I am afraid of death; so piteously afraid of it,
that, even now, while I am writing about it, I can feel
a convulsion in my throat; and a coldness about my
mouth, which, in my boyhood, was the sure forerunner
of a frightful paroxysm: and yet!how will ye account
for it!Ye men, that pretend to explore the infinite
recesses
of the living human heart, as ye would search into
a lump of morbid anatomy; and to trace the thought
thereof; and the motive; through all their invisible
ramifications
,
with as much certainty, at least, as ye would,
the source of life, through all the labyrinth of nerves
and blood-vessels, with electricity or galvanismtell
me! how will ye explain these everlasting phenomena
in my nature!
Will ye tell me, that, when danger and darkness have
been upon me; and silence round about me, I have
continually
shut up my senses, with the desperation of fear;
and plunged, headlong, upon every confronting peril
like the cowardly creatures of the desert, and the
wilderness
;
who, when
they
are beset on all sidesare sure
to turn upon their enemies, with tenfold greater effect,
than they, that are naturally brave, and go quietly abroad
over the mountains--openly--in the full light of heaven?
Will ye tell me that the same law prevails with the
bird and the beast, throughout all creation? Will ye
point me to the female and her young?
Menye are darkening counsel, by words without
wisdom. I tell youthat I have done this, when I
had no young to guardnothing on earth to care for;
and with my senses all a wake; and excited to
inconceivable
activity; when it was neither dark, nor silent
about mewhen I was neither blind nor deaf
nor desperate with passionnor in any dangernor,
in any degree, insensible to the true character of the
peril, which I had to encounter;nay, that, when I have
done these things, it has generally been, with a calmer
eye, and a steadier handand when the danger was
multiplied and aggravatedinfinitelyby my natural
cowardice.
Can ye read me the riddle now! No. Then, follow me,
while I become so intensely engaged, in the plain
narrative
of my life, that I shall forget the aspect of Death;
and grow insensible to the influence of my dastardly
nature; and ye will then beholda picture it may be
of many a human heart, that ye have mistaken for a
brave onea true picture, it may be, of
your own
.
I was born in New England, at a little village near
Boston. I was christened; or, rather called Ichabod
Adams; but I did'nt like the name, and would not answer
to it, although it underwent a variety of spiteful or
gentle
transmutations, among my mischievous play fellows,
and the good natured people about. But, all would'nt
do; I detested
Ika
and
Ikaby
and
Iky
just as heartily as I did
Ichabod
. At last, an uncle,
on the side of my mother, with whom I had been a
favourite
;
deceased
, as they say in New England; and
left me, among a number of fine things, which I didn't
get, (the watch being given to one of my brothers;
and some books to my sister,) two, that I
did
getto
withis christian name, and a silver mounted riding
whip; which, having taken a great fancy to, I had
stolen
so often; and so adroitly, that my uncle, in despair,
gave up the hope of keeping it, I dare say.
From that time, I was called William AdamsWill
AdamsBilly Adamsor Willy, or Bill, just as the
person who called me, happened to have more or less
authority over me; until, at last, there was a particular
name; which, like a particular look, gesture, or tone of
voice, before which, you may see a child, or a beast,
crouch, even though he have never seen, or heard it
before
;
which always prepared me for a whipping; and
which I never heard, if I could help it. It was remarked
too; but I do not vouch for the truth of it, that there were
certain seasons of the year, when, all names were alike
to me; when I was deaf, as an adder; and, some how or
other, if I may trust to tradition, among the families that
yet remain in that neighbourhood, this deafness was
more particularly evident, in the day time, about
school-hours
;
and, in the morning, about the time, when people
ought to get up, in the country; or, in the evening, when
the family, as they used to, in old times, had assembled
together for prayer; or to read a chapter in the Bible.
And so too, they have it, that, about the time when the
wild strawberries were ripe; or the raspberries; or
black-berries
;
or the sweet apples began to lie about, baking
under
the trees, and ripening in the hot sunshine; or the
cucumbers
were of that dark green colourprickly and
crispwhen the country boys are found, under the stone
wallseach with his hand full of saltand something
in his other hand, that he never takes a bite of, without
first looking all about him;or the water-melon
patches
;
the young turnip field; and musk-melon plantings
were in their gloryor the green corn in the milk
that my deafness would become unspeakably obstinate;
so much so, indeed, that, often and often, the people,
who had been sent for me, through interminable fields
of tall corn; bawling after me, at every step; and
cracking
a horse-whip, it may be, like a pistol, all the way,
have actually, on more than one occasion, stumbled
over me, as I lay, sleeping in the grass, before they
have been able to make me hear. And then, would'nt I
get it!Zounds, I can hear that cursed old riding
whip, cracking away, nowand see it, too!whenever
I stop writing, and lift up my head from the paper
although it is a long while agoand I am nearly blind,
as well as deaf.
But, even this name,
Bill Adams
, did'nt last me
long. Before I was fourteen; far and near, wherever
a salmon was to be caught, a shad, or a mackerel; or
whenever a
raising
, or a
quilting
, a
husking
, or a
sleighing
was in the wind, I was known by the name of
Neck or Nothing
.
That name, however, sticks to me yet. I am still,
Neck or Nothing
; and, not long ago, when I first
returned
to my native village, after a long life, spent
among strangers and in foreign lands; and found our
old house in ruinsthistles and burdock, literally
growing out of the fissures, in the great hearth-stone;
over which, I had assisted so often, in rolling a single
back-log; which, in these times, would be fuel enough
C 2
for a week, in a common fire-place; and there, when I
stood, and looked at the old chimney, with the blue clay,
falling out of every crevice, at every blast of the wind,
till my heart was in my throat; and I could have knelt
down, even where I stood, and cried like a child;
even then, and therewhen my whole name and
family
were extinct; and I was like an outcast among men
aye, more like a brute beast, cowering for shelter
among obscene rubbish, than a prodigal son, as I was,
returned to the house of my father, that he might have
compassion on meeven there, did my stunned heart
leap in my bosom; when some one, an old man, who
had been looking at me for some time, let his crutch
fall, and cried out, in a broken, tremulous voice,
Neck
or Nothin
!as I'm a livin' critter!
Ah, my friendwhoever you are, that are now
reading this manuscript, I cannot tell you what
followed; or, how foolish I was, while standing within
the four walls of my father's house; overgrown, as I
have already told you, that it was, by the frightful
greenness of desolation; and blackened with the vestiges
of fire, (for I learnt from the old man, that it was burnt
by lighting) when I heard that well remembered name
of my boyhood. Upon my word, whatever you may
think of it, I felt no disposition to smile; I could rather
have cried heartily. The name went through my
heart, as if my father had spoken to me, out of the
ground.
SoLet us leave this part of my narrative. It is but of
the other dayand I do not so distinctly remember the
circumstances, as I do those of my childhood. But, before
I forget it; I would mention that the old man told me all
about the destruction of the family; although, I have
nearly forgotten it; for, I remember nothing, but the place
under the great apple tree, where, he told me that my
father
my
father; yes, I believe it was my father; was
buried
.
I am strangely bewildered. Things of yesterday,
some how or other, appear to me, as if they had never
been; and yet, all that happened to me in my childhood,
I can remember, as if they were but the other dayas
if it were a little time onlysince I went tumbling
about, under the currant bushes; or, in the dark wood,
half buried in great white flowers, and purple blossoms:
Where the wild grape hangs, dropping in the shade,
O'er unfledged minstrels, that beneath are laid.
And yet, I am not oldnot very old; other men, at
my age, are hardly in their prime. Why is it, then,
that I am so troubled with faintness and giddiness of
heart? And why is it, that my memory can no longer
be depended upon?
Butto the narrative. Let me tell you who my
father
was. I remember him well. He was a little, fat,
positive old man; of uncommon personal strength; and
more obstinacy of temper, than any other mortal
except
myself, perhapsthat ever lived. At one time
but the very time, I
disremember
, (as they say in
Maryland
)he
was a follower of George Fox, the quaker.
But, happening to see a woman that he liked, he visited
her; and, because the quakers, at Lynn, took it into their
heads that he was courting her, (not a thought of which
had ever entered into his head, at that time, I verily
believe
)and
undertook to interfere, and advise, and
deal
with him, as they call it; and prevent him, if they
couldhe married her. He was always the first to
take the bull by the horns. After the committee, that
they sent to him, had set awhile, in silence; groaning a
little, now and then; he asked them what was the
matter
?
and what they wanted?They told him, in rather
a round-about way; and there the matter ended.
They left him, I am told, when the sun was about
two hours high. That very day, before candle light,
my father was a married man. Three weeks from that
time, he was turned out of meeting;and, before the
honey moon was over, he was a tavern-keeper; a justice
of the peace; a Selectman; a Deacon in another church;
a store keeper; and a militia captain; and had killed an
Indian, with his own hand, in the orchard, back of the
houseon a sabbath day, toowhile all the people
were at church; the rest, with their loaded guns lying
before them, on the rough board-benches.From that
day, he became the most active and formidable enemy,
that the followers of George Fox ever had.
My father, among other matters, prided himself on
never having abandoned an argument; on never
having
learned a trade; on never having been mistaken, in
all his life; and on being able to turn his hand to
anything
.
Still, there were some points in his character, that
I could never fully understand. He became a rigid,
inflexible Presbyterian; for, he was never the man to
go half way, in anything that he undertook; and yet,
there seemed to be a secret yearning, for a long time,
in his disposition, toward the early habits of quaker
discipline; which betrayed itself continually; and,
sometimes
,
rather laughably, I remember, when he was in
a passion, or taken by surprise. Thus, he would
thee
and
thou
the soldiers, under his command; and damn
their cowardly souls to hell, in the same breath; and
then, suddenly draw upbegin to pray aloud, at the
head of his companyand forget to take his hat off.
I, myself, have seen him guilty of such things as these
and one of them, I distinctly remember. General
Horton came to see him, one day.My father
first took his heavy saddlebags over his arm; then, made
him a low bow; and then, called him by his christian
namea few minutes after that, in the capacity of a
tavern-keeper, he began to curry the general's horse;
and then, recollecting who he was, he drew up,
pompously
,
before the general, with all the air of a justice
of the peacecut a solemn flourish, which he meant to
be a military salute, with a yard-stick, that he had in
his hand(while one customer was bawling to him,
from the shop door, for some truck for trowsers, and
another, from the tavern window, for some new laid
eggs, for breakfast) and concluded, Jim Butler says,
though I did not see
that
, with rolling up his eyes, and
a deep groan, like a church warden.Allowing a
little for exaggeration, I assure you, that the various
occupations, of my father, were continually subjecting
him to trials, which were quite as amusing in their
consequences
,
if not precisely the same, as I have
described
.
Yetlet me not be unjust to the good old man. He
had some conscience; and not only used to permit the
children, and his wife too, when she pleased, which
was, whenever she had anything new to wearor,
whenever she had heard of anything new, that another
had, to go to quaker meeting at Lynn, or Marblehead;
but would frequently amuse himself and us, for a whole
evening together, talking
quaker
, as he called it; until
the plain language became like our mother tongue to us.
He spoke it, remarkably well; better, by far, than any
of our neighbours; and, for that reason; and because
he was better educated than they, his downfall and
exclusion
from society, had been predicted for many a year.
The truth is, I
believe
, (I say that I
believe
, because my
father would never permit us to ask any questions
about his family;) the truth is, I am afraid, that he was
a wicked fellow, among the womenat least, when he
was a young man. He was an Englishman too; and
well educated, for the times, although there was a good
deal of mystery about his early life.
My father had a large family, as long ago, as I can
remember; and, being, at one time, orthodox to a
proverb
;
and related to one, who in the early religious broils
of Massachusetts Bay, I have heard him say, had
suffered
much persecution; he held it to be his religious
duty to perpetuate the feud, by all legitimate means;
and to keep alive the recollection of what had been
done and said, by his ancestry, for the last hundred
years; by any means whatever, whether legitimate or
not. For this reason, it was, that our family, males and
females continued, generation, after generation, to
appropriate
to themselves certain outlandish names; which
whenever they had to mingle with the world, became
a source of continual mortification and embarrassment;
long and long after a more rational practice had been
established in our very neighbourhood.
I was originally called Ichabod, as I have already
mentioned; but soon came to be known, altogether, even
at home, by my nick names of Bill; Will; and
Neck or
Nothing
.
My elder brother was christened Jonathan; my
second
Mosesmy third Sampson Achilles, which by
corruption, became
Samy Kelly;
my youngest,
Benjamin
my
eldest sister,
Thankful
; my next,
Comfort
;
my third,
Charity
, till the death of my mother;
and then, Catharine Elizabeth, partly out of spite too,
I believe in my heart, to the quakers. And, as my father
was mightily addicted to the scriptures; there is no
knowing how many other names, he might have added to
each individual, had not my mother hinted to him, in
her simplicity; that, if he were not frugal, the family
vocabulary might be exhausted. My father, I am told,
was
considerably
frightened; for such a thing as a new
name, in his family, was about as rare an innovation
as a new creed; and my mother bred like a rabbit.
Let my father have his own way, and he was one of
the best tempered men in the world; but obstinate as
the devil; and exceedingly perverse, as I have felt it my
duty to acknowledge to him, many and many a time,
when he could'nt have it. And though he would growl
a little, now and then, about the sinfulness of neighbour
Obadiah Stephens, and Deacon Sammy Shipwell; his
spiritual associates in the church government; and
drink hard cider, till he could'nt see out of his eyes;
and get what he could, out of the Egyptians and the
Philistines
,
as he called
all
the rest of the world, for his
tin ware and sugar-boxes; justifying himself by the
example
of the Israelites;yet no man reprobated
scandal
,
and back-biting; cheating and intemperance, more
heartily, or devoutly, than he. He knew every one, by
name, that was guilty of either, in any degree, within
a circle of ten miles round; and, at a proper place, and
time; such as prayer-meetings, lectures, raisings, and
love feasts, no man made better use of his knowledge
or was less niggardly of his admonition to the
offender
.
In family and church government, he was alike
orthodox
and absolute; as all our backs can testify.
But, among his peculiarities, there were some touches
of character, which, under different circumstances,
might have made him conspicuous for other things; for,
puritanical as he was, in most matters, I remember
well that, if he got his head once wrong, even about
church matters, all creation could'nt set it right. Thus
he would never permit a child of his, to be christened
till it was one year old. This, to the truly orthodox,
was truly awful. They remonstratedhe was mute:
they charged him with the infant's soulhe nodded
they asked him what thegoodnesshe meant?
To which, I have been told, that he replied, something
after this fashion. Neighbours, you be dammed!
don't be worrying yeselves, about me. I want none o'
your meddlin.
That
for the boy's soul! (snapping his
fingers,) I shan't go the expense of christenin, till I
see some probability of his livin: and I think it much
more fatherly to keep a fresh born babe, well wrapped
up; warm and snug, at home; by a roarin fire, though
he should happen to go to heaven without a name; than
to carry the little toad, half a dozen miles, to a cold
church; and show his little parboiled face, pimpled and
mottled all over, like the rump of a picked chicken,
for four or five hours together, to a congregation, who
can't, with all their zeal, keep their jaws from
chattering
together, like the cogs of a water mill:beside
all that, I don't choose to give my child a name, till I
know something of his character. He may be a David;
or a Solomon; or a Judas; and I would'nt make him
ridiculous, while it was decent to avoid it.
The conference ended; and the committee returned
in silence; walking, leisurely, through the principal
street, one after the other, that the publick might he
moved to enquire where they had been; and what had
been the nature of their
dealing
with Deacon Adams;
and, peradventure, that they might be led into an
interpretation
of their long faces, each man, according to
the wishes of his own heart.
Howbeit, from that day Deacon Adams began to be
regarded, as a worldly minded man; not to be moved by
the brethren having authority; and as one profanely
snapping his fingers at a future state.
Some of my earlier years had gone by, almost
without
my knowing my own age, when something
happened
to make an altered boy of me. My poor mother
died. I loved my motherI loved her, a thousand
times more, I believe; because, for a long time, I had
nothing else to love. Yet, the only distinct
recollection
that I have of her, is, that she was a sickly
looking
woman, who grew surprisingly fat, once a year, at
leastin a manner, that was perfectly unaccountable
to meat that time;with a mild, pleasant face; and
large hazle eyes, I believe; for I have seen large eyes
of that colour since, which looked at me, as my
mother's
did, when
she
loved me. When my father chose
to whip me; my mother, I remember, was very sure to
interfere, right or wrong: and, if she could not beg me
off; nor hide me; nor get me a qualified flogging; I was
pretty sure to get a double allowance of Indian
pudding
pumpkin
pies; or pudding and molassesor
apple-dowdy
with
a plenty of
sweetning
at the very next
meal. She used to sit and cry over me, too, for hours
together, when I was very little; thereby teaching me
to love her, and hate my father, for his cruelty to both
of us;to me, for whipping me, when I deserved it; and
to her, for not letting me off, whenever she chose to beg
it of him: and nourishing, thereby, in me, a brave and
rebellious disposition, that, in time, made war upon all
authority, andbut no matter now. She died.
Ayeand when I stole into the chamber at night, and
crept into her bosom, and felt how cold it was; and tried
to pull her little hands apart; for they were locked
firmly
together, upon her breast; and cramped, as I thought,
with the coldfor I had no true notion of deathshe
was so frightfully still and white, that I began to shriek;
and I never left her, till I rolled off the bed, in
convulsions
;
for which, by the way, I was
nicely
whipped, as
they say in New-England, on the spot.
Then
then,
knew I well what death was!but not till then; for there
she lay; and my cruel father, gracious heaven! that
men should have no feeling for their own flesh and
bloodhe whipped me, at the bed side of my poor
dead mother, until I foamed at the mouth; and she,
ah, she never raised her hand, nor uttered a single
moan. Then
knew
I, that she was dead. And then,
began that horrour of death in me, which no reasoning;
no experience; no discipline; no determination; will
ever overcome! Lord have compassion upon me! It will
make me desperate, yet. It is the secret of all my
suffering
,
and all my transgression.
Well, they buried her at last; and I ran away, and
lost myself in the great wood; for there was nobody
else in all the world, I thought, to love me. But they
found me, and whipped me again. I would'nt eat;
and they whipped me. I cried in my sleep; and they
whipped me. If I went to school, I was whipped; and
if I staid away, I was whipped. Whipping was the
sovereign specifick. Happen what woulda broken
head, or a floggingno appetiteor a torn jacketa
belly acheor a sore heartit was all the sameI
was infallibly whipped.
Very well.My mother died, just when I began to
find life tolerable. And so it has been through all
my days. Whatever has been kind to me, something
has always happened to, till nobody, at last, had the
courage to be kind to me. And whatever I have made
dear to me, even that has become a mark for sorrow
and buffetting, all my life long; until I have learnt to
tremble and avert my face, if any beautiful apparition
came very near to me; or looked out, with a pleasant
countenance, from the dreamy darkness and dreariness
that have altogether encompassed me, from that day to
this. Both have been, but the harbingers of suffering
and sorrow. And while I have waxed older and
stronger
,
among the population of the earth, I have learnt to
feel more cheerfully, when a frowning and bad face
hath gone by me; or a malignant lip curled and
writhed
at me, though it touched mine, at the very moment,
much more cheerfully, than when blessed eyes have
been upturned to me; and sweet, distant voices have been
singing faintly in the uninhabited caverns of my heart.
Alasit is too true. I have seen and heard both.
The dark and terrifying have aroused me to do battle
with them. The beautiful have only soothed me into
brief delirium:out of which, I have started, as from
D
a trance, spoiled of my armour, and naked to the
arrows
of all the world. There were beautiful eyes,
even in my boyhood, that were shut up, and darkened
forever, because of their love for me: and now, all my
life long, go whither I will, I can hear the continual
melancholy chiding of a broken-hearted girl, that I
loved, in my manhoodlike the murmur of the green
wood; or the summer ocean; or the swift, far sky, when
you lie half asleep, in the moonlight, watching the blue
heaven, while it rolls away from you;coming up on
one side of the earth; and going down on the other,
till, over your head, and under your feetand on
every
side of you, there is a continual motion and glitter;
within and without you, too, as if you were breathing
an atmosphere of starlight.
My mother lived just long enough, after I began to love
her, to give birth to Jeremiah, the flower of the whole
family,
he
thinks, and perhaps truly; for he is a very tall
man, with large, sparkling eyes; white handsthe
prettiest teeth in the worlda great favourite of the
ladiesand a most accomplished penmanupon my
word he is. After she was buried, I began to look
about me for something else to love, though it were
only a cat or a dog: I cared not; except that, be it what
it might, it were death to it, to be a favorite of mine.
I was a melancholy, stupid boy, I am told; for never a
tear, nor a cry escaped me, under all their laceration;
not a groan, though they mocked at me, and scourged
me to the bonesexcept on one occasion (which I
remember
well)when my poor little puppy Fidele, that
I had saved once from drowning, at the hazard of my
life, was nearly crushed to death by a wagon wheel,
which he attacked, for having hurt me, while I was
playing in the street. Accursed be the wretch that
finally murdered him!I care not who it was, though
it were my own father, or Sammy Kelly, himself,---that
malicious little imp. It almost broke my heart. There
lay poor Fidelethere the poor fellow lay, half
buried
in the sea weed, which was all wrapped, round
and round his two fore paws; just as if he had been
struggling, and swimming a long while, at the length
of the rope, from the bottom. He was the strongest
little creature!but, there he lay!washed up on the
beach, among the drift wood; and shells; and white
ridges of sand, with a great stone about his neck, and
a rope almost gnawed off, in two or three placesso
that he must have been a long while a dying. He was
dragged up there, by the villain that murdered him
I dare sayby Sammy Kelly himself, if it
was
hethat
I might see it. Who did it, I never knew; and it was
well that I did not know; for, when I found the poor
dog, with his head cut open; and the white silky hair,
so beautiful and soft, as it used to be, all dragged in the
blood and dirthad I known who it was; and had I been
strong enough, I would have gone after him, to the ends
of the earth; and dragged
him
to the first water; and
strangled him, in itor driven him into it, with the
same stone about
his
neckand when he rose, and
gaspedand struggledand
his
bright hair was
floating
on the water(for Sammy Kelly's hair was
beautiful
it
was of a bright gold colour, and there was
half a bushel of itat leastand people used to come
and feel of it; and talk about it, ugly and hateful as the
little imp washump-backed and mis-shapen all over)
I would have hurled stones at
his
head, till the salt water
reddened with
his
bloodand be damned to him
Poor Fidele.
Here was another dead creature that I loved. What
was I to think? What had I done, that death would
not let me alone? My heart turned cold within meI
had a strangling sensation in my throata temporary
blindness fell upon methe roaring of the sea sounded
fainter and fainter in my earsand I felt as if some
great invisible creature were trying to stifle me, while
I layhalf buried in the sandwith poor Fidele in my
bosomhis long soft ears against my bare neckbut
I did'nt care, though he did stifle me; and there I lay,
in spite of him, till I had cried myself asleep. I know
not how long I lay there; but, another tide; a few more
waves, would have washed us both away, together
Would God that they had!
But my father found me; and, weary of watching a
creature, that he regarded as a downright idiot, who
had'nt the sense to bawl out, when he was floggedand
yet, would cry himself blind, over a dead doghe
passed
all his right and title to lacerate my flesh; and
trample
on my spirit, over to a great raw-boned uncle of
minea butcher; with leave, (for my uncle was a
melancholy
man; and a little change of this nature, might
go far to keep up his spirits)with leave to try his
cowhide upon me; for the riding-whip was worn out,
whenever he was inclined to the blues. He was an
amiable manthat butchering uncle of mine; and his
wife, tooyou can have no idea of her gentleness; at
least, I have not; and I lived in her family for seven
long yearsand served out an apprenticeship there, to
whipping, shame, and torture. Let me relate some of
my experiences. I was a sad boy. There is no
denying
that;
and I had been belaboured, from pillar to post,
from the time that I was taken out of petticoats, in
spite of myself, until I was almost big enough to go
into
them again, in spite of other peoplethrough all
the schools of the district; and not a creature could be
found to undertake my education.
My dear,
dear
aunt, had a pleasant way, however,
when I did get into any school, of determining, at once,
whether I had played truant, or not.
Willy!come here, Willy! she would sayCome
to me, directly.
I would go, and stand before her, with my fists
doubled.
Let me look at your hands. It was all that she
would take the trouble to say. She never asked if I
had been to school; or what I had learnt; or who was
there; because
that
might tempt me to tell a lie; and
the devil, himself, was no match for me, at that. So,
I would open my hands.
If they were not blistered, or red and swollen; she
knew
that I had played truant; and I was turned over
to her husband, for a cowhiding. She was generally
right.
In this way, I learnt to regard a smart feruling, at
school, as quite a comfortable thing; and, lest I should
get skinned
all over
, at home, by my uncle, I took
especial
care to provoke the master, by some of my
pranks, to skin my
hands
, before I left him. To be
sure, I was flogged, sometimes, when I did not deserve
itbut I escaped oftener when I did deserve it.
This would happen about once a week; for I soon
learned to hold their tyranny in such abhorrence, that
I compounded with my scruples, at one whipping a
week; and then, staining my hands with sumach berries,
when I could get them; or red ink, before I went
home.
My uncle did this flogging in a very workmanlike
manner; owing, it may be, to the fact, that he had a
large family, of ten or a dozen devils, without including
my aunt
for
whom, I continue to feel no common
respect
and
upon
whombut no, I cannot permit
myself
to tattle of family matters, or slander so
affectionate
a couple.
He had some whimsical notions, too, I remember,
about the manner of scourging. Like Doctor
Sangrado
,
bleeding was a sovereign remedy with him; but
then, Doctor Sangrado operated with a lancetand
was foolish enough to use warm water also. But the
process of my uncle, was much less timid, and
abundantly
more simple. He bled with a cowhide, at arm's
lengthand cared little about veins and arteries; and
measured the bloodnot by bason's-full, or ounces
but by shoe's-full. Verily, that uncle of mine, had a
facetious way with him; and his nephew, long and long
afterward, profited by his pleasantries, to such an
extent
thatbut, no matter;the tale of vengeance and
retaliation is not for to-night.
Since then, I have been to Spain; and Italy; and
among the wild Arabs:and I have had the good
fortune
to see some clumsy work of the same kind, got up
in the Portuguese inquisition; but the contrivances of
my uncle were altogether superiour.
There
, when half a
dozen muscular fellows were tugging away, at the heart
strings of a poor devil, upon the rack; there was always
D 2
a kind hearted gentleman at hand, to tell them when
they might lie by, awhilefor what is the use of
worrying
yourselves with a dead body? he would say. It
is insensible, nowrest yourselves a littlewipe off
your sweat, gentlemen; and take some refreshment
there is no need of wasting your labour, you know.
Time enough to harness yourselves to the pullies and
levers again, when the pulses are stronger. Now, my
uncle never gave himself any such trouble. He whipped
me, first, to keep up his spirits; next, for exercise;
next, for the terrour and edification of his children, (as
the Spartans made their slaves drunk)and, lastly, as
he often assured me, with tears in his eyes, for my
everlasting
happiness. And, therefore, he, generally, left
off whipping me, only when
he
was out of breath
whether
I were dead or alive; or
I
, pretty near my chance
for everlasting happiness.
To this compassionate nature of his; together with
some experience in the trade of a butchersuch as
sticking a hog, now and then, for pastime; or knocking
down an ox; or flaying a young calf alive; or slitting
the throat of a lamb;I am willing to attribute such
forbearance; though I have known him, once or twice,
to continue the discipline,
after
he was out of breath;
and till he was all in a lather. It was really a pity, I
used to think, that he took up the
profession
of a
butcher
.
I should have fared much better, I have no doubt,
if he had continued to resort to it, only now and then,
as an amateur, for amusement; for the pleasantest thing,
we know, will become irksome to us, if it be always
under our nose, as I have heard married men sayof
their wives. Nay, it is a melancholy truth, I believe,
that, just in proportion to our delight in anything for
amusement, is our aversion to it, as a business. We
can live upon chips, or Johnny-cakesaw-dust, and
homminy; (at least, the Virginians can;) but we should
soon die upon sweetmeats. We can trudge all day
long, with a pack upon our shouldersday after day
week after weekbut we are soon worn out with
dancing
.
We can live, comfortably enough, for whole years,
with our wives, when we no longer thrill at their touch;
but our hearts would whirl themselves to death, in a
long honey moon.
So it was with my uncle. Flaying
dead
animals
with a knife, grew to be quite a hum-drum sort of a
thing with him, at last;and one day, for variety, he
had just nailed a live fox, that had been playing the
devil in the farm-yard for a long time, to a board; and
was skinning him, alive.By heaven, you might have
heard the poor animal shriek for three miles. But, I
had the courageGod gave it to meto drive a knife
through the creature's heart, and release himfor
which piece of simplicity, my uncle seemed mightily
disposed to make me take his place on the boardand
play
little
Saint Bartholomew;but he relentedtold
me, in his kindest manner, (while the blood rushed into
his eye-balls, and through his swarthy temples, like a
sudden explosion within him,) to run up to the house,
and put on my
biggest
shoes;for I had two pair
neither
of which was I permitted to clap my feet into,
except
to go to church, or take a flogging in(thereby
promoting several other pleasant associations in my
mind.)
I obeyedhusbanding my wrath for the day of
retribution
;-and,
that time, he emptied my large shoes twice
and then left me hanging, in the slaughter-house, till
they bubbled over a third time; and my trowsers were
drenched in my own blood. I was nearly dead, I
remember
;
but I prayed God just to live a little longer
a very littlewhatever might become of me, afterward
till I could mete out a small measure of my
thankfulness
to the father, in his own way; or, if that might
not be, till I could strangle one or two of his nasty
children, who were amusing themselves, while I hung
there, with snapping their little whips and
handkerchiefs
,
at me.
Once he stoppedhe came to me. I was black in
the faceI had determined, afraid as I was of death,
to hold my breath till I died. He was frightenedand
I had not the power to hold it longer. I had just life
enough left, to give him one lookone, which he
never
saw again, and never forgot, till twenty-two years
after; when it broke over him, as the blood gushed out
of his own ears;and somebodyhe knew not that it
was the idiot boyknelt upon his breastand only
forbore from crushing his heart out, because it was in
the unpeopled place; and he felt that the great God was
looking down upon him.
From that hour, he was afraid of me. I saw itI
knew it. And, from the moment that he drenched me
with scalding pickle, and cut me down, until he held
his life at my mercy, he never ceased to persecute,
thwart, and wrong me.
Yet, he continued to whip me; and, when he was
done, out of compassion to my bruised and torn flesh,
he would scatter fine salt over it, to prevent me from
taking cold;and then, (for he was a very,
very
pious
man; and used to read all day long, of a Sunday, through
his nose,) he would go down upon his knees, and pray,
devoutly, for the idiot,
Neck or Nothing
. I was
called by that name, pretty generally, then.
The next thing, that I remember, is the death of my
little brother Benjamin; who had his head, luckily for
him, poor fellow, crushed by a great tree, that was
blown down, smack through the roof of our house.
Poor Benny!he loved me, toohe did, indeed, though
he was deaf-and-dumb; and, even now, when I think
of him, I can hear the wind roarthe house shake in
the hurricaneas it did then; and see his little bright
eyes, with the lustre crushed out of them; and the brains
bubbling down upon the floor. Well, here was another
deathnothing but death, death, death; till, at last, I
would tremble and turn pale, if anything wanted to love
meand began to expect, as a thing of course, some
frightful event to happen to every body, that looked
kindly upon meeven to the cattle in the farm-yard
or the poor ducklings that I fed, secretly, with dough,
in a time of great scarcity; for which I was whipped, I
verily believe, more than twenty timesalthough the
dough was my own; and made out of my own allowance
of bread, by soaking it in water. Benny loved me, too,
poor innocent!and,
therefore
, he died. Somebody that
makes poetry, has just said the same thing
I never loved a tree nor flower,
But 'twas the first to fade away:
I never nursed a dear gazelle,
To glad me with her large black eye;
But, when it came to know me well,
And love meit was sure to die.
I am not fond of poetry. I do not understand it. But
somebodyno matter who
she
began to love me; and
when I fled from herfor, it appeared to me, that she
turned pale, while she smiled upon meshe pursued
me, and made me tell why I ran away from her; and
when I did tell her
why
, in my simplicity, she
repeated
some poetry that I never shall forgether voiceher
breathher lipsthey made the name of poetry dear to
me; dearer, I am sure, than anything else, under
heaven
,
could have done. It should have been written
upon
my forehead, at my birthit
is
written upon my
heartand it shall be written upon my tomb.
Soon after, little Benny, my deaf-and-dumb brother,
died, my father ordered me to be solemnly christened
over again, with the name of my uncle, William. I
bore it patiently; for I loved the only person of that
name, that I had ever heard of, then; and little Benny
loved him, tooand while he nestled in my lap, and
lay by me; and grew to my very heart, in his
helplessness
,
how could I help loving what he loved? For two
months in the yearmore or lessI was a bad boy;
I cannot deny that;but, during the other ten, I was
quite an exemplary oneas to plundering gardens and
orchards, I mean. This I can recollect, distinctly; and
it is a matter of great consolation to me, now, that I
had so much forbearance
At last, all these names had to give place to that of
Neck or Nothing
, as I have told you; in consequence,
I verily believe, of a joke, perpetrated by the parson of
our parish, upon my
wilfulness
. That I might the
better
remember this, my uncle suggested the expediency
of a gentle cowhidingmy common allowance, instead
of pocket money, on holidays, like Christmas; Election,
Thanksgiving; and fourth of Julytill my back became
a calendar of remarkable events, to all the world but
myself. The hint was taken, from an old conveyancer,
who lived in a litigious neighbourhood; and had a large
family of boys, whom he let out, to be whipped at the
boundaries of land:hence, he used to say, the red
dotted
lines, that are common in what are called
plats
where such land is in disputethey represent the
trickling of blood, from one boundary to another.
SoI was whippedand whippedand whipped
whatever happened; whether it was I, or they; or any
body that wanted to remember any eventI was the
stick upon which they notched the day. But,
peradventure
they forgot, that I might learn to remember
them
also. Yet, thanks be to God! I have lived to
remind
them of it.
It was a matter, I soon found, of great concern,
with all my relations, that I should escape, as lightly
as possible,
hereafter
. Several methods were
suggested
,
I have been told; but, none of them were of a
nature
,
not to be counteracted by my unhappy and
inherent
propensity to evil. Therefore, as I charitably
hope, was I tortured, and torn, and bruised as I was,
by every living creature that came near me, till I was
big enough to stand at bay. Next to
saving
me,
whether
I would or not; the most certain plan was, that of
counteracting the effects of damnation, by deadening,
neutralizing my sensibility. To do this, it was only
necessary
to destroy my nerves, physical and
intellectual
;
and to do
that
, was the simplest thing in the world;
it was only to shame me, soul and body, till I was all
over, within, and without, one callous. Thus, I was
whipped; parboiled; skinned; starved; frozen and
roasted
,
on earth. And, what more could they have done
to me in hell?
Man!man!I had a heart like a wellinto it,
every living creature might have dippedfor my blood,
to make it happier. All that I would have prayed for,
in return, was, a little lovea little gentlenessa very
little.I could not bear muchit would have killed
me. Yea, such was the heat of
Bill Adams
, when he
was born; nay, for many a year after he was born
ready to empty itself into any other heart, that came
near it. But, never mindlet me relate the cause of
the last flogging, that I ever receivedthe last blow
with a whipand the last that I ever will receive, from
anything less than my Maker, without returning it,
though my arteries explode upon the spotand I am
consumed to ashes, for it. One day, I had been forbidden
to go near the wharves, about the south end of Boston; or,
under any pretence whatever, to go near the salt water.
I was a wretched swimmer, but passionately fond of
swimming; and I hated to swim in fresh waterand
then, our river was neither fresh nor saltbut dirty
and troubled, without being buoyant; in consequence of
the tide, that flowed up, for miles above our swimming
place. I felt that the prohibition, of my uncle, was
mere wantonness; and I determined to evade it,
whenever
I had an opportunity.
I took my pudding-and milk, with the rest of the
family
,
that night; and, went off, rather earlier than usual,
as my aunt supposed, to my bed; but, hardly was I well
into it, when I began to wish that I had run down to
the river and washed, first; for, it was in vain to think of
swimming there, at a season of the year, when the fresh
waters, all about, were full of saw-dust, slabs, mud
turtles, and floating timber; to say nothing of water
snakes, which were far more terrible to me than
shirks
.
The more that I thought of it, the more impatient I
became
;
the weather was close and sultry; the day had been
very hot, till just about sunset; when a
smart
shower
had fallen, which had only made every living creature
more insupportably languid, testy, and fretful. The
musquitoes bit, like devils; and, in short, I could bear
it no longer. So, I bounced out of bedhuddled on a
part my clothes, and ran down to the river, dressing as
I went. I looked at it, and shudderedit was too dark
and muddyand I could see millions and millions of
water snakes, as plainly as I can see this paper,
crawling
about on the bottom. So, I kept on, at a light,
pleasant trot, with part of my clothes in my hand, by
the river path, looking for a better place; when, all at
once, my blood began to leap in my veins. I heard the
shouting of boys!I listenedI knew that they were
swimming, by the cry.A moment more, and I knew
that they were in the salt waterfor, as I came out
from under the great willow trees, the noise went by
me, for a moment, as the wind shifted. I could'nt stand
that! It was more than a mile, yet, to the nearest place,
where I might expect to find them; but, some how or
other, I was therein the midst of thembefore I had
well made up my mind about the distance, or the
propriety
of my going there.
Ah, how my blood rippled and thrilled, when I first
felt the water about my naked feet. I was bare
footed
,
when I arrived. That, I could account forI
remember
that. But, after a little time, I found myself, to
my astonishment, perfectly naked; though, to this day,
I have no recollection of undressing; or, even of
looking
at my clothes. I only know, that, I determined,
over and over again,
not
to undress; and,
not
to run the
risk of drowning; although, I confess, that, while I did
this, I was paddling, in the water, with my feet; and, now
and then, ducking my head, a little; or, dropping one
leg, over the raft of pine boards, upon which, the boys
were assembled, into the cool, delightful water. I
wanted to plungeI stood upand sat downI don't
know how many timeswent back, on the raft, twenty
times, at least; shut my eyes, and determined to plunge,
headlong; but, still, when I came to the point, and
felt the single board yielding under my weight, and
the water rising, my courage would failand, I would
stop shortreason with myself awhile; and then, try
again; but, still, I was afraid. Never did my heart so
pant, and thrill, between terrour, shame, and
temptation
,
in all my life. The deep, blue tide, rose, every
moment, higher and higher; and, rippled, and sparkled,
more and more temptingly, about my feet; the end
of the raft, upon which we were, kept sinking, lower
and lower; and, I was getting deeper and deeper, into
the water; for, I stood out, upon a thin, slender board,
far from the rest; and yet, I was afraid to plungeand
had'nt the power to go away from the place. The
boys took no notice of me, for some time; but, by and
by, as they came out, and began dressing, all about me;
and going away, one after another, from the raft to the
wharfthere was a little whispering, which grew
louder and louder, till they mocked at me, and shamed
me, for my cowardice. They even proposed to push
me overboard, by main force; and others threatened to
pelt me, with blue mud, that I might be obliged to go
in; and, others again, proposed to take away my clothes,
and keep them, until I went in,
voluntarily
. But, all
would'nt do. I stood, like one in a trance. I was
mortally afraid of all that they threatened; yet, afraid
to do either the one thing, or the other. My clothes
fell, piece by piece, from my hand, where I stood; and,
I am fully persuaded, that I should have made no
resistance
,
whatever they had attempted upon me,
whether
of insult or cruelty; although I was a very
powerful
boy of my ageand could not, were it to save
my life, swim five times my whole length.
At last, they left me; probably intimidated, by my
strange silence, and regardlessness of their threats.
I looked about me. I felt the silencethe awful
silence
of the place, weighing me down. I could see
nobody
hear
nobody. I thought myself altogether alone;
if not in the whole world, at least in that part of the
world. I felt persuaded, that I was going to be
drowned
;
that nothing could save menay, that, after a few
minutes, I should be obliged to go down, gradually, and
slowly into the waterdown to the very bottom. And,
yet, strange as it may seem, I was not frightened
there was only a pleasant, drowsy, and cool thrilling,
through all my blood. I looked down into the water,
continually. It was clear and darkshadowy, I
mean; not turbidbut, I could see the flounders, and
plaice; and eels; and sculpions; (the ugliest fish in the
world, except the lamprey) swimming all about the
bottom
;
or mooring, with a fat, lazy, undulating,
continual
motion, just
over
the bottom;and multitudes of
little
starry looking fish, active and bright, as the smelt;
or, the dull brown and yellow of the tommy-cod; or the
purple of the young pollock; sporting, hither and
thither, in all directions, like birds, through the air;
E
some, like flashes of white fire; and others, turning up
their golden bellies, now and then, like creatures that
have the power of becoming visible or invisible, at will;
for no eye could trace them, except by an occasional
rich effusion, of colour and faint brightness, in the
water
;
like that of the fire-fly in the air;---or, that of the
lightning-bug, in the grass. Look where I would, these
brilliant creatures were incessantly in play, among the
stars, which were reflected in the depth below me, as if
heaven had been showering them down, like blossoms,
into the habitation of the waters.
Ah, I cannot describe the stillness that was about
me. It was awful. It was like that of death. The
sky was bluer than I had ever seen itand much
further
off, it appeared to me; and the sweet, solemn stars
were multiplied, in the water, till my head ached with
the temptation of their influence; and I was on the
point, child that I was, of plunging after them. Do
not smile, whoever you may be. Many drowned
women
,
and children, have felt the same fascination, I
have no doubt; drawing them, as it were, by a song and
a spell, into the bosom of the great deep; and I have felt
it more than once, neither as a woman, nor as a child;
but, on this night, it was more like an attractionan
irresistible, secret allurementa delightful influence;
winning and persuading me into a voluntary self
destruction
.
It was more like some unknown affinity
operating upon my bloodupon the spiritual part of
memy thoughtlike a charm; than like what I have
felt, as a strong hand pressing me into the water, by
main force. At one timethe time that I allude to
we were upon the high seasa few starved and
desperate
menour lips cracked and bloody with our last
hateful meal:and we were drifting, with our helm
lashed down, and topsail flying in the wind, far and
widelikeO, unlike anything ever seen upon the
waters!more like a floating hospital of lunaticks and
murderers; than a gallant ship, well manned, and
obedient
to the helmand out upon the oceaninstinct
with spiritas if it had a soul and a will of its own;
water-loggedhelplessunable to put her before the
windand altogether alone, in the very middle of the
unclouded, unfathomable, immeasurable deep. I was
lying, I remember, in the hot sunshine, upon the half
burnt deck, with my head over the side of the ship,
gaspinggiddy, and sick, and deadly faintlooking
blindly down into the sea; and ready to give up the
ghost, with every sick, impatient sob;when, all at
once, there was a terrifick explosion below mea strong
light flashed into my brainmy veins tingledmy
blood was all in confusionand the great deep heaved,
and roared, and broke up, and vanished!
vanished
,
like a dream, from below me. And where it had been,
there came up a dizzy wilderness of beauty, and
flower
,
and greenness. The winds blew; and the trees
rustled all over, and waved their rich branches; and
the birds flew about; and the flowers fell; and every
where, through the short thick grass; and out of the
old rocks, which were spotted with shining moss, the
greenest in the worldthe waters gushed and bounced
and sparkled, and rattledand then wandered away,
singing the self same tune that the birds were all
singing
in
a labyrinth of brightnesswith a reality so
unspeakably tempting, that I had well nigh leaped
down into the bosom of the apparitionamong the
sharks and water-snakesbefore I caught my breath.
I did attempt it! I attempted to stand upon my feet,
they saidand threw up my arms, with a cry of
transport
just
as the vessel heeledand I should have
been overboard, but for the
Dwarf
the
Accursed
, I
had always called himwho plucked me back, and
held me, like a giant. I smote him that he fell; but he
never relinquished his holdthough his white teeth
were set with painand the blood gushed out of his
broad, swarthy temples;-never, never, until I had come
fully to myself.Well, wellthat was the third and
the last time, that I had felt a temptation, like a
pressure
,
upon me. And now, let me return to the raft,
and the boys.
There was a kind of stupefaction upon me, I believe;
the stupefaction of fear. I know not how long it
lasted
;
but it was finally broken by a piteous cryfrom
afar offollowed by a loud shouting from a vessel in
the stream, and from the boys at the wharf. I had no
idea where the cry came fromnor where the creature
was, that uttered it; whether in the air, or under the
water; but my heart stopped with affright. I
continued
looking, however, in the direction, to which I had
first turned my face, on hearing ituntil I saw two or
three boys running down the side of the wharf, not far
from me, crying out, that a boy was drowning; and
something else, that I did not understand. But I saw
them looking, at the same time, to a very black place
in the waterwhere it was either very deep, or
shadowed
by something; and I, too looked for a moment. A
few little bubbles rose, from the centre of that black
place; one after the other, to the top of the water, each
one nearer and nearer to me. I ran to the extreme end
of a boardI gasped for breathI must have breathed
loud, for I did'nt speakyet, they heard me to the
wharf, and shouted to mewhile I was pressing both
hands upon my heart; for I was afraid that it would
burstand listening to a sound, that appeared to come
up out of the water. The next moment, I saw something
whiterolling over and over, twenty feet below me
like the shape of a human creature, struggling, and
trying to swim upward;then, it began to riseit
floatedand then sank again. I could bear it no
longer
.
I plunged after it, in the midst of a general shriek,
from the wharves and vessels.
A shark!A shark!
they all shouted together. It was too late. I heard
the cry, to be sure; but I was already in the grasp of
something, that I struck against, with a force that
stunned me; from which, there seemed to be no escape;
before I had time to think of what I was about.
All that followed, was but the struggle of a moment.
I had been distinguished, by great bodily strength, from
the time of my early childhood. More than once, has
it saved my life; but never, in a manner more
wonderful
,
or so instantaneously, as on this occasion.
Something
,
as I have mentioned, grappled at my body; but,
it was half a minute, before I felt myself fairly in its
power; and then, my right arm was useless. With my
left, however, I instantly disengaged myself; and,
forgetful
of all danger, for I felt a head of human hair
floating about my face; I caught at it, with my left hand;
and instantly rose to the top of the water. God be
praised for it!the raft was covered with peopleand
we were both saved;myself, with a broken arm,
which I had, probably, struck against the sunken
timber
,
at the bottom of the raftthe ends of which ran
out, irregularly, from the main body;and the poor
drowned boy, all wrapped about with eel grasswhich,
but for me, would have kept him at the bottom, till life
were entirely extinct.
While I was in my revery, at one end of the raft,
he, poor fellow, with more courage than I, although he
could'nt swim, had let himself down into the water, it
appeared, holding on by his hands; instead of jumping
boldly into it; and had been instantly sucked under it;
and would, infallibly, have been drowned, but for the
boys, who saw him, as he came up, and gave one cry,
after having struck his head against the bottom of the
raft; and before he went down to the very bottom, and
became
entangled in the eel grass, with which he was
contending, probably, when I first saw the bubbles of
air, which I mentioned; and the white appearance in
the water, which carried me overboard. Had I been
a brave boy, I could have withstood that; and had I
been like other boys, I should have gone into the
water
,
at first, from downright shame.
Well, I saved the life of a human creature. And what
was my reward? I was whipped nearly to death for it;
but I swore then, by the blood of my own heart, that it
should be for the last time. It was for the last time.
That boy has now become a mana great mana good
one;while my unclerest his souland my father,
areno matter where. I have seen one of them upon
his death-bed, and helped to quicken them, both, I am
afraid, upon their journey.
E 2
CHAPTER II.
Character of my Sister...Her influence...Beauty...Sampson A
chilles
...His
character...Appearance...His education, continued...
Death of cousin...Incidents...Bigotry...Reflections.
One
word more of my family. My sister Charity,
afterward called Catherine-Elizabeth; and then,
Elizabeth
,
grew up into one of the gentlest and most
beautiful
of God's creatures. You could'nt bear to call her
Catherine; particularly, if you were acquainted with
the true character of the northern amazon;
after
whom,
if not
for
whom, my mother had named her; or her
brutal sensuality; and coarse, masculine, and
domineering
spirit;nor
Kate
, lest you should think of
Shakspeare's
shrewand she, heaven knows, was far enough
from that character;nor
Elizabeth
, if you
remembered
king Elizabeth, of Englandthe man in petticoats;
whose heart was a great magazine of shattered finery,
paints, patches, and regal gewgawsa crowned and
throned monarch, furbelowed all over with Flanders
lacea king-millineralike in mind and person
supremely
little and great, at the same timeburnishing
shields and spanglesbuilding head dresses and
seventy-fours
in
love with dominion, whether of empires or
hearts; vain, alike, of the power which she had, and of the
beauty, which she had not;a king, on all befitting
occasions
a
mere woman on all othersno, you could
not profane my sister with the name of such a woman;
and
Eliza
that would not doit was too childish.
I never knew a fool, that was'nt called Eliza, of course;
a she-fool, I mean;although, I do not pretend to say,
that all Eliza's are
fools
. NoI know better. I have
met, and loved, more than one woman of that name;
and I could'nt love, or meet a second time, an
ordinary
woman. This affair troubled me not a little, till I
found her full grown, to far less than a womanly
stature
,
however; with clear grey eyes; very long, and
very dark eye-lashes; a countenance shy and timid, in
general; but rouse her; put her nature sufficiently to
the proof; and you would swear that she had a devil
within her; but thenit was a beautiful bright-eyed
devil. Her hair was very remarkable. There was a
brilliancy in it, almost metallicklike spun gold; and
yet, it was very soft. But rouse her---alarm her; and
you would look at her in amazement. Her whole form
would undergo an instantaneous illumination;---her
hair would shake, and quiver, and sparkle, with
electricity
;---her
eyes would dilate;---and her red mouth
would open with such intense, vivid, and scornful
vitality
,
thatah! she was really blinding in her
beauty
,
at such a moment. Allow all that you will, for the
partiality of a brother; and for my proneness to
exaggeration
;
still, there was a nature in her, as you will
find, by and by, unlike that of other women.
Compared
to them, she was all soul.
Many, and many a time, have I seen the little
delicate
creature dilate to the stature of a princess, and
shiver all over; and her eyes lighten, like those of a
young wild cat, when she has been set upon, without
notice, by the dogs.
[2]
[2]
I once met with a woman that reminded me of herand but
once.It was Miss Owenson, now lady Morgan: I was a good deal
agitatedshe was not half so beautiful as Elizabethnor so well
made (one shoulder being a little higher than the other)but her
fairy littleness, and exceeding vivacity reminded me so, of her, that
my eyes filled immediately.
She was very diminutive---very;
but perfectly formed; with a constitution so frail, that
the snapped lily were its only emblem, if the rude wind
blew over it.
Yet with that habitation, I have seen her proud
spirit
awe men, when it looked out of her eyes;---men,
who had stood untroubled before the majesty and
wrath of many a larger womantill their very step
was unsteadyand their high foreheads wrought with
alarm. YeaI have known her move the lame dwarf
himself, till, devil as he wasto my thoughtthe tears
gushed out of his great ugly eyeslike water from a
trodden spunge.
That sisterI cannot trust myself to speak of her:
there was a something so etherial; so pure and
spiritual
about all that she thought, or saida flavour in
ita perfume about it, at least to the heart of her
brother
thatno,
it won't doit won't. I have been so
little used to kindness in this world; and least of all,
among women that were beautifulthatbutno
no matter.
My poor mother loved me, because I was
her
child;
little Fidelebecause there was nobody else, in all the
world, to feed or caress him;my helpless,
deaf-and-dumb
brother, because he was safe with me, from all
that worried or mocked at himand becauseno
matter whymy arteries had run for him, more than
once, till my big cow-hide shoes frothed over. But
my sistershe loved mefor myself alone: it was not
that I was kind to her, or afraid of herfor that, I could
not help--and all the world were kind to herand afraid
of herand she knew not what unkindness was. The
very brute beasts, that came near to her, it did appear
to me, were gentler in their movement. It was not
that I was ready to die for her; because, I was ready to
die for anybody that would let meprovided that there
was an express command, of my father, or uncle, to the
contrary. Nobut she loved me, for my
heart
, when
nobody else knew that I had one;for my
understanding
,
when all the world thought me a fool; nay, when I
had began to believe it, myself;for my
disposition
,
when it was all evil, in the sight of others. Let me speak
of her. It is to her; and to her alone, that I owe
everything
,
that is good, or great, in my nature;my love to
man; my reverence for God;my reputation---my self
confidence. But for her, I should have been what other
people thought me---an idiotpossessed with an evil
spirit
.All,
that hath yet supported me!all, that supports
me
now!
all, that will support me, hereafter!and give
me the courage to face
our
compassionate Father in
Heaven (I do not speak of
my
father nowI don't
care much about meeting
him
or my uncle)--all, all! do
I owe to the sweet upbraiding, and the proud impulses of
that child:for she was a childeven with the stature
of a womana child in her simplicity; a child in her
innocence; a child in her affectionate naturebut her
spirit was not of the earth. It was eagle-eyed, and eagle
pinioned too; and, when she used to fall upon my bosom,
and sob there;and murmur, like some sweet, strange
instrument, answering to the low wind;even then,
while she emptied her young heart into mineI was
afraid to look her in the faceafraid and ashamed:
yet I was the older; and, with a finger, could have
crushed
herbut her dominion was enchantmentintellect,
lovepower and strengthfetters of steel, interwoven
with violets;a sceptre of ironby some delicious
sorcery made to flower all over, like a branch of apple
blossomsa flame to crumble and melthidden with
odour and vapourcurse this nonsensemy sister,
pardon me. It were better to say, at once, the plain
truth; that I loved thee, as never man loved woman;
and that I was beloved by thee;and leave all this trash
of the imagination, to drift where it will, on the wind
or the water.
But there were more of the family. Sampson
Achilles
,
the last child of my mother, born after she had
begun to read profane history, was crushed by the
weight of his names. They were put upon him, exactly
at a year old; and he never grew an inch afterward
in longitude, I mean. For a yearling, he was a
wonder
;
a great lubberly fellow, with a head like a half
bushel:but for a man, he was a little monster.
His name, too, has dwindled away into sounds that are
really somewhat amusing to my recollection
Sampson
they have abreviated, in their familiar way, to
Sammy;
and
Achilles
, to
Kelly
so that, luckily for
him, the original endowment is forgottenand
Sampson
Achilles, himself, is now only,
Sammy Kelly
.
He was the darling of my parents; but a base,
cowardly
,
thieving and malicious creature, as ever God put
the breath of life into:an evil spirit. if ever there was
one upon this earth; so malignant in its nature, that the
only alternations of pastime with him, from the day that
he was able to impale flies, till this hour, have been
between
worrying cats; drowning dogs; fighting cocks
and making life hateful to everybody; and, more
particularly
,
to his brothers and sisters. Twice, have my
hands been about his throatand twice, would I have
strangled the imp, but for the interference of Elizabeth
once for scorching her beautiful hair, and blinding
her with gunpowder;and another time, for putting
snakes into her bed. His little eyes were spiteful, red and
fiery; and eternally snapping, till the lashes were either
worn off, or singed off. His mouth was very large and
awry; and his laugh,my blood curdles, at the thought
of it, now. He was weak too;and his great,
unmanageable
head kept rolling about, with his fat tongue
lolling out of it, as he sat; for he never ran, or
walked
or leapedmoping in the sunshine or rain(for
both were alike to him)or lay, half buried in the ashes
So hateful was the creature to me, in time, that I could
not think of him without a spasm;and, for years and
years afterward, I could not bring myself to believe
that a human creature could resemble him, even in the
colour of his eyes;or have a big head; or unnaturally
quick fingers;and not resemble him in heart; nay, I
fell into the vulgar notion, as a matter of belief, that, if
a man be a dwarf, he must be a devil; if hump-backed;
that he must have kicked his way into the world, as my
brother did hisand have torn his own mother, like a
beast, with his first breath. Let the sequel tell how
true were my prejudices; and how
wise
. It was a
religion
once, with me, that deformity of person was an
infallible proof, of a deformed and devilish spirit. And
that a monster in bodywas, therefore, a monster in
heart. Others have thought so, too---a legion of plays
and novels have been got up, to prove the same thing.
I have known one exception.
Jeremiah was---but I have already told you what he
was; and
is
---a blockhead---six feet high---and
fashioned
like a god. Are you a woman?---What more would
you know?
For myself, I am---the Lord knowsfar enough from
being either handsome---six feet high---or a blockhead;
---probably, from a naturally perverse temper;---for I
could not bear to be drawn out as nail rods are, by
beating;---nor to be made a fool of, where it was so easy
to be a knave. Am I handsome?---heaven forbid. I
have seen some ugly men in my time, but never more
than two, so diabolically ugly as myself:---one was my
precious brother, Sammy Kelly, and the other, a man
---of whom, more by and by. I speak of my countenance
only---for my person and limbs are very good;---but
there was a time, when all the world looked at me,
through a glass darkly---I was one of the men---
who
walk like trees
.
Let me run back for a moment. The first decided
operation of all the severity, that I have mentioned, was
to make me hate my father with all my heart, and all
my soul;---and my dear uncle, ten thousand times more
bitterly. Both had been distilling a cup of death for
themselves, for many a long and weary day:---my tears
and blood had run, year after year, into their alembick,
---but the vapour was condensed, at last; and fell, in
drops of fire, upon their own heartsGod! it would
have eaten through steel. But my sister stood by, when
I would have re-sprinkled my father with it---and she
withheld my hand, and extinguished the red poison
with her tears. There was none to shelter my
uncle
.
I saw it fall---drop by drop---sink---and heard the
blood hiss---and---yes I did!---and though I have shed
mine own since, in sorrow for it---yet I scorn to deny
it.
Yes!
---and I sat by him, and mocked at him, in his
convulsions.
The next effect was---to confound all distinctions of
right and wrong in my mind. If I went to school, I
was whipped;---if I played truant. I was whipped. This
made a liar of me. I dared not tell the truth---if I did,
I was whipped;---and if I did not, I was whipped. It
matters little what I did, or did
not
---the whipping was
a part of my daily allowance;---rations, that were dealt
out to me, sick or well, dead or alive.
I have been beaten for going to church; and beaten
for staying at home. I have been beaten for whipping
a boy, twice my size, who struck me; and beaten, for
being whipped by a man. I have been beaten for
whisthing
of a Sunday; and beaten for holding my tongue.
In short, whether I robbed orchards; kicked a Bible
about in the mud; set fire to the minister's wig; saved
a poor boy's life; or attempted to strangle my own
brother, I was always beaten, so long as they could stand
over me.
This, in time, became of use to me. It made me
regard
torture and death as a trifle---the
pain
of death,
I mean;---the fortitude of an Indian, as hardly worth a
thought, for, though I have been scourged, again and
again, till I foamed at the mouth; no human being ever
saw me wince, at such a time---or a tear fall from me---
or ever heard one moan from my lips.
And yet, I could cry---I could---and laugh too, till
the skies would ring again,---at what other people saw
not; or seeing, heeded not. Nay, so sudden and
fearful
were these transitions in my nature; that, when I
was fourteen, I frightened all of our family and kindred,
by one of them. A dear,
dear
cousin of mine died. I loved
her very tenderly. I would have laid down my life for
her. I was standing by the coffin. The room was
full of people---I had turned back the lid reverently,
boy that I was---for what is death, that it should awe
me!
---said I, to myself---while my hand shook---and
my head grew giddy.---I had just raised the thin muslin
from her dead, beautiful face---and the tears were blinding
and choking me. I put my hand upon her shut eyes---her
sunken temples---forgetful of all
propriety;
---and though
they were so frightfully cold, that my blood stopped
running, all at once---as if my heart had been adrift till
then---in the cold ocean---and just struck and shivered
against something;---and I shook all over, with a
strange in ward concussion---yet I would willingly have
lain there, forever---frozen to her, cheek to cheek---
mouth to mouth---and been buried with her:but
somebody---I
knew not who---I never turned to look,
plucked
at me, rudely---and would have torn me from her,
as he would, a wild beast from his prey. I bore
it patiently, awhile---but not long. I just lifted my
hand---nobody saw the motion---but the man that
felt it, staggered through the door, as if he had been
struck by the paw of a wild beast.He fell; and, as
he fell, he carried with him, men, women and children.
The room was emptied---as if the dead body, itself, had
given the blow; and I was left alone with it. This
was all that I wanted.---I grew blind and giddy with
excessive emotion---I cleft a lock of her beautiful hair,
---it was like wet silk---from her transparent temples:
it had been denied to me before---and then, I laughed
---dashed out the lights---laughed, till my heart ached---
and my temples were sore; and when I bounded through
the window; and left them to recover from their
consternation---as
they might. I was never forgiven.
Such was the effect of their unnatural severity. They
scourged me, as if I had been a mis-begotten creature of
darkness;---and they continued to scourge me, till there
was nothing of humanity left in my nature---till I
cared
no more for what they called death, as
they
said---
and thought no more of pain, than if I had been made
of cast iron.
The laws that were made for me, were literally
written in blood.---in mine own blood---I might have
had as hearty a reverence for them, it may be, if they
had been chiseled upon brass or stone. They were
truly the laws of Draco---written in blood---and
meting
the same punishment for every offence.
Hence, I came to learn, why unnatural restraint leads
to unnatural excess; why, the greatest criminals have
charged their parents, with a too unsparing severity in
their childhood; why that proverb is true, which declares
that deacons daughters, and parsons sons, are more
profligate and wicked, than others.
The punishment being always the same, I naturally
concluded that the
offence
was. To me, therefore, there
was no difference between lying and murdering;
whistling
on a Sunday, and blaspheming all religion;
sleeping
at church; resenting an insult; or knocking down a
priest, at the communion table.
But, I went abroad. I found that men of talent, and
worth, and influence---great men, and good men, too---
even in the eyes of my own father, would sometimes
tell a lie; whistle of a Sunday; sleep at church; or
horse-whip a fellow, that spit in their faces. This
staggered
me, at first. There must be something, I thought,
radically wrong in the doctrines, which had been
inculeated
F
into my flesh, so carefully, so circumstantially,
and so continually. My conscience tingled a little; and
I was a good deal shocked; at my first transgression;
but, in time, I became reconciled to the whole matter;
and, having found that my father and uncle were
egregious
fools or knaves, in many things; I took it for
granted, that they were, in all. So that, at the end
of a year, after I went abroad in the world, I was just
as ready to murder, as to lie; and just as ready to lie,
as to snore in church; and just as ready to snore in
church, as in my own bed-chamber.
And, so hath it been, from all time, with all bigotry.
Reason must have way. Her fire
will
be kindled, by
some gentle hand; or by the wind; or by the lightning;
but wo to them that wait for the latter! Once lanched,
there is no quenching it; blood will not do it; tears; no,
nor the ashes of temple nor crucifix; nor the dust of the
overthrown altar It
will
have way; rending, and
exploding
,
and tearing into the very bowels of the earth,
where the people of countless generations, are holding
their dead, silent, and terrible congress.
Just so is it, with the abused child; and the trodden
slave; nay, just so with the Catholick murderer, whose
bloody fingers shake, as he counts out the gold for his
redemption---not with blood---but with terrour of the
priesthood. Touch once his red heart---let it begin to
flow---let him but once open his eyes upon the foot of
the bald spectre, that is set upon it; and, exhausted as
he is---humbled as he is---he will upheave the
tyrant
from his dominion, and grind him to the dust. Give to
a man, a plain substantial nutriment; and he never
becomes
either a slave or a despot; but feed him upon
terrour, humiliation, and ruin; superstition and hatred;
replenish his veins with such fiery aliment---and you
are nourishing an earthquake---a volcano. One spark,
and it will explode---then where are you? The very
chains that bound a people to you, are melted with the
shock---and fall upon you, in a rain of fire.
Look at France---Italy---Spain---Portugal---where
Superstition once held her tremendous dominion
unquestioned
,
unapproachable. But, a convulsion
happened
;---the
veil was rent!---the curtain plucked away,
and set fire to!---her sceptre broken!---and a people of
slaves---priest ridden and trampled slaves---arose like
the dead natives of all the earth, at the sound of the last
trumpet---laid waste the dominions of men---nor
stopped
till they were driven back from the battlements of
heaven---by a tempest of smoke and fire. They awoke
from a long trance, like men that have been drugged
with death---amid relicks and miracles; and, finding
that they had been deceived, by a priesthood; they have
broken
them
down---and scattered them to the four winds
of heaven; and overturned altar and temple, in their
wrath. Were it not better, that the dominion of darkness
had been shorter, or less terrible? So is it with nations;
so, with men; so, with me. I knew not where to stop;
nor what was true.
CHAPTER III.
Homily...Black Art...Truth...Natural writing...Addison...John
son...Master Patten...Narrow escape...Quakers...Education
...Blow in church...Goes to a play...Sail...Lying...Thieving
...Beating....Reflections...Apprenticeship....Dishonesty....
Education...Advice...Friendship.
There
are some difficult things, that appear simple
enough, when they are once explained; and we are often
provoked at our own blindness, after we have been told
how some enchantment hath been wrought; when we
might never have imagined the truth, if we had been
left to ourselves. There is a curious propensity in the
mind, to overlook the common, while it gazes after the
improbable events of life. We love the marvellous; and,
while we ridicule our neighbours, for the same folly,
we are loving it, more heartily than they. We hear of
some murder; or, of some old haunted chambers, for
example; and, while we laugh at the story of both, our
blood thrills at the recital; and nothing will satisfy us,
till we get to the bottom of the mystery. In the mean
time, whatever happen, we are always sure to imagine
a more complicated series of reasoning and design, than
is ever the true one. We attribute motives to people,
who never had any motive for their conduct; and judge
of all, not by placing ourselves in their situation, at the
time when a given deed was done, were it evil or good;
but by the circumstances that have since happened.
This mode of judgment is cruel and preposterous. I
do
differently. I
think
differently. I do not judge of
anything
,
by the
result
, when I can help it. I would rather
fight a good battle, and be conquered; than a bad one,
and conquer.
So too, if I am watching the movements of a juggler,
political or religious; the harmless operator upon our
pocket: or, the more dangerous one, upon our credulity;
whose legerdemain is for government here, and
hereafter
;
I am prone to imagine his contrivance far more
simple and short sighted, than people in general do.
They overlook whatever is probable; and rush into the
marvellous. And why? I did the same thing when I
was a boy. But I have grown wiser now. I took it
for granted, once, if I had been cheated, that it must
have been by the most consummate address. Nothing
else would console me under the imposition;nothing
else could reconcile me to myself.
It is painful, is'nt it?to be deluded very stupidly?
Yet, so it is. Ask any juggler. He will tell you, that
his security liesnot in the depth of his own
contrivance
but
in that of the theories, that are imagined to
explain it. How many persons have stood by
Rannie
(Do
you remember him?a fat, red faced, greasy
fellowwhose light-fingered tricks were played off, in
publick)and seen him cut a piece out of a woman's
gownblow upon itand restore it. They saw the
processthe scissorsand beheld the piece. But how
was it possible? A thousand pleasant inventions were
thought of, to explain it. The vulgar supposed that
some charm was usedsome powderwhich deceived
one, like a fog; a little higher, you will find a people
that knew how the whole was donethe piece
was
actually
cut out, say they; but some natural cement,
known only to the operator himself, was applied; and
the cloth grew together. A third class would get over
the affair, at once, by calling it the
black art;
a fourth,
by reference to natural magickthe Egyptians;
alchymy
;
and the magicians of scripture; a fifth is sure
that there is some trick in the scissorsthat they were
not
real
or that the garment was notor, in short,
anything but the simple truth. But I was not to be so
easily satisfied. I looked to find it a conspiracy. I was
mistaken. He came to make the experiment on
Elizabeth
,
my own sister; she wore a white muslin, I
remember
;
he gave me the scissors into my own hand; I
cut the dress myself, while he held it. I saw it; and
saw it, again, united. Yet, I did not believe in it. It
disturbed me. I thought of it, continually. I went
again. I kept my eyes upon him. He chose a black
dress. He cut the piece out. I saw it in his hand.
F 2
Do me the favour, said I, to let the dress alone
with your other hand; let it fall; let me see the hole.
He was disconcerted. I saw the trick, instantly. I
arrived at it, on the spot. So it has been through all
my life, with me. I have found nothing inexplicable;
nothingexcept the heart of a woman. Rannie
depended
not so much upon our
short
-sightedness, as
upon
our
long
-sightedness, and our
over
-sightedness. He
knew that our vanity would prevent us, for ever, from
imagining that we were fooled so egregiously, as we
were. A deeper trick had been discovered. But, by
cutting another piece of cloth, held in the same hand,
in which he had gathered up the dress, he was
perfectly
safe. Yet, who would ever have thought of so
simple
an explanation?
Would you discover the truth? Do not believe a
thing, merely because you cannot account for it. Do
not believe it, because it is impossible. That were as
wise, as to disbelieve whatever we cannot understand,
in the phenomena of heaven, and earth, and air. And
yet, the reverse is our natural propensity. We love the
marvellous, and the alarming. Nay, we often believe
a story, from its very
improbability
. Thus, we are told,
that some sweet, timid, affectionate creature, whom we
have known for many a year, hath murdered her own
babe. Terrible as the tale is, we believe it; because it
is impossible that any body would think of
inventing
such a story, of such a woman. There must be some
truth in it, we are sure.
Improbable
as the tale of
horrour
isyet, it is
more improbable
, that it should be a
mere invention. On the contrary, we are apt to be
suspicious
of a very plausible, well connected, probable
tale. How strangely perverse are the operations of
our nature!how full of contradiction!
Would you discover the truth?persevere. Truth
is God; and God never will hide himself from the
devout
searcher.
Yet, there are facilities upon the wayandthere!
won't that do pretty well, for the beginning of a
chapter
?
Is'nt it an essay, altogether worthy of our
established
novel-writers?and reviewers?
Among these matters, which are so simple when
explained
;
and so inexplicable, till then, is the mystery of
writing. Some men find it a weighty affair, to put half
a dozen sentences together; yet, they can spout for an
hour together, in publick; and reason, sensibly enough
at home, with their tongues. Why is this?
They dare
not write, as they talk
. They will not go abroad, but in
a holy-day dress. I shall do no such thing. I am above
it; and, henceforth, I shall ramble, just as capriciously
as I please, in the tale that I am relating. Method is
out of the question. I never pretended to it; and my
utmost ambition, now, is to write my own history, just
as I would tell it, to people that I loved, about a
roaring
fire, in the depth of winter.
Reader!what say you? Are you so wedded to the
sleepy modulation of Addison, and such people, that a
short sentence, or a sudden stop, will jar you like
another
step, at the bottom of the stairsor no step at all,
where you are ready for one? If you are, stop!stop
where you are! You are not the reader for me. I hate
the simpering, smooth, sweet, musical cadence of
Addison
,
just as I do the great, lumbering, heavy, windy,
pompous, lubberly movement of Johnson. I would as
soon live on sugar-candyand sleep, for ever, upon
new-mown hay, with a water-spout singing in my ears
all day long, and all night, too;or, try to keep up with
the temple of Juggernaut, upon stiltsas listen to
either
,
for more than half an hour at a time. So, if you
expect to be lulled asleep, stop where you are. It will
be the better for you. And if you look for a single
sentence
,
put daintily together, like Addison'sor a
single
period, like Johnson's, jointed and cramped with
ironbig words that have been brought together by
main force, as if by a press-gang; and chained fist to
fist, lest they should squabble, or mutinyyou will be
disappointed. But, if you would hear a fellow creature
talk, as men
do
talk, in our language, every day, in the
streetstand by me awhile. There will be truth and
nature to detain you; and one thing, at least, you may
be sure of
natural language
. Easy writing has been
defined to bewhat
anybody
can easily write. The
definition
is witty. But
natural
writing, I would define
to be what anybody, in the same situation, would
naturally
sayif he could:
such as you do not often find in a
booknever, in the classicks; but always, in the mouths
of men and womenbroken and incoherent, at times
for such is the language of passion; simple, it may be,
and touching, when you least expect it; for such is the
manner of them that mourn, when they are weeping at
home, and alone:stormy and impetuous; burning and
acrimonious; when the crushed viper, or the outraged
giant, are let out of the human heartfor such may be
the bearing of common men, when mightily wronged.
Their tongues are of fireserpent likeand vivid, with
the intensity of their suddenly lighted spirits. Will
this content you? If it will, push on.
It would be no easy affair, at this time of life, for me
to recal even the
names
of those who, in their
compassionate
regard for my future welfare, assisted in
destroying
my evil propensities, in childhood, by kicking,
and cuffing, and flagellation; but there remain two or
three, somewhat more conspicuous than the rest, to
whom I am greatly indebted; and I cannot resist the
temptation, that I feel at this moment, to acknowledge
my thankfulness to them. It was so kind in them!so
considerate!so affectionate!
Among the first, the very first, was a precious
jack-ass
,
named
Stephen Patten
, a school-master, to
whom it was my misfortune to be sent, for two or three
excellent reasons; the chief of which, I take to be, that
he was a conceited, obstinate, sleepy dolt of a fellow,
with no brains at all---and rather less heart than brains.
Another was, to keep me out of mischief, at the least
possible expense; for it was a sort of town school that
he kept, or a
charity
school; and called so---not so much,
because it was an asylum for indigent children, as for
indigent
men
, utterly helpless, useless, and incapable
of any other employment:---and the third---I hope that
I am not
very
uncharitable---was to have me murdered
legally; or, at least, made as cheaply and certainly as
possible, what the benevolent predicted that I should
be, a candidate for the gallows. This man used to whip
me, whenever he was out of humour. But once, in
particular---I
shall never forget it; and he has been nearer
than he dreams, of being made to remember it since,
quite as distinctly. It was a custom in the school, to
make the poorer scholars sweep and clean it; and,
during
the winter, to bring in fuel, and kindle fires. I
happened
to be of that class; and, in the impartiality of this
miserable wretch, a double duty fell upon me---a duty
of mortification and labour. I am naturally meek; but
I have a strong sense of justice; and Moses, himself,
would have lost his character, had he been loaded and
shamed, as I was, under
Master Stephen Patten
.
The spiteful creature watched me continually; and
every
symptom of rebellion was tempered down, or
trodden
out, the moment that it was detected; not
unfrequently
,
too, with what he called a lecture---a few
words of which, on any occasion, would be a treat to a
rhetorician. At such times, when the school was all
hushed as death, he had a favourite saying, that we
were pretty sure to hear, no matter what was the
subject
,
or who the culprit;---it was about envy. Envy,
said master
Patten
, is a green-eyed monster, that
flies over cities and towns;---and this was a picture
of envy, for the understanding of children, from seven to
fourteen years of age!
But, to the whipping.I will try to recollect it.
Something had happened, to prevent me from making
a fire at my last
turn;
(as it was called) which
turn
, by
the way, put me back, amazingly, in my arithmetick;
for, I could never, rightly, apprehend how, in a school
of one hundred and twenty boys, where there was only
one fire to be kindled in the morning; and only one
morning in the day, it came to me, in
rotation
, to
kindle
it, about once in two weeks. But, so it was. And,
when I failed, on this occasion, I was compassionately
let off, by producing a billet, (which, I dare say, had
been used by me, more than once, before; for, when it
was not dated, I always managed to get it back again,
in some way or other, by hook or by crookeither, by
clambering in at the window; or by picking the lock of
his desk) from some person in authority, showing, that
I had been truly unable.
But, the next week, my
turn
came again. Now look
you,
Bill
, said the master. Tomorrow morning,
you are to make a fire in that are stove; and if you don't
do it, mindI'll skin you, alive. No excuse now; I
don't care what happens.
That was a threat of little moment to me. I had
been accustomed to it, at home and abroad, from
friends and strangers, from my very cradle; nay, it had
become no uncommon mode of salutation, for the
neighbours, when I was clambering up their spouts, or
robbing their gooseberry bushesand such small
cattle
.
Still, though I cared little for the
threat
, I
cannot
deny that I had always an ugly antipathy, to
the process of skinning alive, from the time that I saw
it practised upon the poor fox, by my uncle; and, if
the truth must be told, I have not become entirely
reconciled
to it yetthough, many a kind creature has
been half persuaded to reconcile me to it, if he could.
So, I determined, as much as in me lay, to build the
fire, in due season, dead or alive. But, unluckily. I
had a good natured uncle, on my father's side, who
had something to do with a ship;---and, was in the
habit
,
now and then, of giving me a few cents; or a cuff;
or a
hiding;
as he happened to be in a good or bad
humour
,
with his coffee---or, as I happened to deserve
either
.
He saw me, in the evening; and told me to come
down on board the vessel, early in the morning; and I
should have some pieces of junk, rattling, oakum, bits
of spun-yarn; and, perhaps, a spare rope's end. I
did'nt much like the latter item; but, looking him in the
face, I found that I had nothing to fear. So, I went---
stipulating, first, for a billet to
Master Patten
; by
way of a protection. The business done; the oakum
and junk disposed of; all that had been given to me,
and some that I had stolen; and the money fairly in my
pocket, off I trudged, to the school, with the billet in my
fist.But,
Master Patten
was not to be trifled
with. He first flogged me, and then read the billet;
---nay
,
he had the impudence to declare, after it was all
over, that, whatever had been the excuse, it would have
made no difference.
For this, I never forgave him. I did'nt care
that
,
(snapping my fingers,) for the flogging. Nay, he
might have read the billet first; and then, flogged me,
till he was weary; and I should only have laughed at
him. But, that the scoundrel should dare to strike me,
when he knew not but I might have been locked up, by
my father; and prevented, by accident, or sickness; or,
by some violence, from performing my duty; nay, how
knew he, but that some of the family were dead.
Yet....he flogged me....and, at the first blow, that he
struck me, there arose in my sweltering heart,
something
,
I know not what; it felt to me, like a serpent,
whose habitation had been made too hot for him. I
looked
into the eyes of the cowardly rascal; and I saw them,
as plainly as I ever saw anything, blood-shot....and
stained. It was a vision; and had well nigh been
fulfilled
;
for, it is only two years ago, that I passed him, as
he stood in the door of his paltry little book-shop, in
conversation with three or four elderly gentlemen.
I went by, at the distance of two or three paces. I
hadn't seen him, for yearsI felt my blood beginning
to boilthe muscles of my arm to shiverand I knew
that, if I once laid my hand upon his collarthere
would be no mortal help for him. I knew this. I felt
it. What saved him, God, only, knows. It might be
his agenot his character. I could not strike a man,
so much older than myself; though he
had
whipped me,
when I was a helpless child, till I was raw all over.
I swallowed the bitterness, that was rising in my throat,
and passed by; nor, did I know how fearful had
been the battle within me; till, as I turned the next
corner, I felt the hot sweat pour from my forehead,
like raintill I staggered, with exhaustion; and was
fain to throw myself upon my bed, the moment that
I entered my room; and, the next day, when I got up, I
was stiff, and sore, all overeven, to the roots of my
hair; as if I had taken a violent cold.
Bewareye that give a loose to your passion, when
the feeble are intrusted to you. There is no knowing
what a bruised spirit may achieve; if it be not withheld,
as mine was, by a strange feeling of pity, scorn, and
compassion. Verily, but for that, had I not relented; and,
it was wonderful that I
did
relentbefore a hand could
have been raised in his defence, I had trampled the
breath out of that man's body.
There was another man too, named Cobb; a quaker;
whose admonitions were continual; and, as he thought,
very terrible; but, luckily for him, he never had the
courage to lay his hand upon me, except in
meeting;
when, if I made too much noise in whittling the
benches
,
(for I used to
go
tonot worship
in
a Friends'
meeting house; where, to be orthodox, you must have
pine benches, instead of pens, or pews, to sleep in,) he
would sometimes get up, with the steadiest countenance
in the world;walk down the broad aisle, to the seat
where a dozen of us would sit, shivering at his approach;
and, single me out, for exhibition, upon the
high seat
.
I was not very ambitious; but, this event was sure to
happen, whenever there was any publick speaker;
(travelling preacherswho, having some conscience,
charge nothing for their instruction; and treat their
friends like tavern-keeperseat of the best that the
land affords; they and their companions, and horses
for they never go to a tavern; and live, as the wild
beasts will
not;
on each other) among usand more
than once, have I been carefully led up, before a house
full of the orthodox and heterodox, to the very highest
seat, in the whole meeting house, (it were impious to
call such a contrivance, a
church
,) and there left, with
my hands and legs across, as a beacon to my
companions
.
And once, I rememberand I wonder that I didn't
get a flogging, then. There was a mischievous fellow,
in the seat behind me; I had an awkwardly contrived
thing upon me, called a new coat; the first, I believe,
that I had ever been fitted toI do not say, the first
that had ever been fitted to
me
for,
that
was not. It
was a common joke, with the boys, on such an occasion,
to cut off a button. Such is the effect upon the idle,
and unocupied, in the house of God;
there
, as in every
other place, they will be in mischief, rather than
remain
idle. The sublime, still worship of the spirit, is
unknown, unheeded by, and unfitted to them. A good
man, in the awful silence of a great solitude, will feel
a more tremendous sense of nearness to the Deity, than
he ever may, in temples, ringing with musick, and
blinding him with magnificence. But, even
he
, the
great and good man; he, who, when he dies, but steps
once, to become an archangeleven
he
cannot worship
God, as he would, if there be many about him. How,
then, shall the wicked, and the foolish? How are
children
to feel the awful stillness, of Jehovah's audience
chamber, ere they have learnt what stillness, or
worship
means?They cannot. Therefore, it is, that the
children, in a Quaker meeting house, are fuller of
sneaking
mischief; than at school, when their master is out,
and they have nothing to do.
So it was, here. Our seats were bored, through and
through; whittled and gashed; scribbled on, and carved
into, while God himself, if the scriptures be true, was
standing in the very midst of us.
On this occasion, I felt the boy; he was much larger
than I; and, I was naturally timid, cowardly, and
cruel
.
I felt him at workand heard a suppressed
breathing. There was a dead silence. I turned, and
let him have it, as we say, into his face and eyes. The
blow was
quicker
than lightninghis head struck the
back of the seatand, the blood spun out of his nose, into
the broad aisle. He had a knife in his hand; and, till the
elder, upon the
fore seat
shook hands; and, thereby,
broke up the meeting, I felt, every moment, as if it
were just ready to be stuck into my ribs. But, he
dared not. I had been afraid of him before. Now, he
was afraid of me. My promptitude had disconcerted
him. While you live, reader, always
give
the first
blow; never
take
it. If you have any doubt, strike.
The battle is half over; and he, half whipped, who takes
the first blow.
up about me, till the welts and blood-blisters ran, like
tight drawn purple snakes, from side to side of my
body. I bawled out
murder! murder!
not because of
the pain; but because I did'nt like the manner; it was
new to me. I then put on my jacket, and went home,
side by side, with the good man; and, the last thing
that I remember is, that, when I was getting over the
fence, and he was talking to me, about what he
intended
to do, toward making a man of mesaying that he
should send me to Salem, to school, and give me a new
suit of clothes, and
Snuff-colour
? said Iinterruptig him
snuff-colour
,
uncle? and there the matter ended. I'll warrant
you that I forgot the flogging, sooner than he did;and
I am sure that I remembered the snuff-coloured suit,
the schooling much longerfor I heard no more of and
either from him.
I mention it, to warn other men from such doings.
It was a base, vulgar expedientbarbarous and
foolish
.
I had a proud heart, a keen sensibility. Had
this man touched eitheras I could that of a child,
I would sooner have been burnt to ashes, than ever
touch aught of another's property afterward. But
this brutal appeal, to my
body
, rather than to my
soul
,---
forced up all my bodily faculties to resist it. He might
have shamed me, till the tears dropped hot from my eye
lids;till he might have filled my bed with untold
money
,and,
I would'nt have touched it even in my dreaming.
But noHe struck at my body. And my body was
that of the young Spartan. Like him, I learnt that, to
steal was adventures and braveto be found out,
disgraceful
.Some
author asks where is the difference
between the education of a Spartan and another? Both
steal; and both are punished, if they are found out.
What! is there no difference between inculcating theft,
as a part of military stratagem, and punishing a boy
for mal-adroitness; and denouncing theft,as the most base
and cowardly of crimesa propensity to it, as a nature
to be scourged out of one, with whip and fire?
Butmen will reason in this way; and where they
do not, they will act as if they did. In this very case,
the lesson that was taught me, in pain and bloodwas
not, that a proud, generous and noble spirit, would
disdain
to pilfer;but that, whoever did pilfer, must have
a tough hide, and a stout back. I had both;and, had I
been lashed, with steel wire, red from the forge, the
effect
would have been precisely the same. I scorned to
be beaten into a reformation. Blows and indignity
only made me dastardly and revengeful. By GodI
had that naturewhich, if it had been rightly
ministered
to, would have made me a hero, at twelve years
of age.
And where was the mighty evil of my transgression?
I
lied
why? because everybody about me lied, and they
that whipped me, could not tell the truth, and did not.
I stolewhy? Because I was perpetually exposed to
temptation,naked and unfortified, by any appeal to
the pride of my nature;kept without the allowance of
any pocket money;yet, with gold and silver
perpetually
at hand; and no way of obtaining any part of it,
except by stealing. The boy that would
not
steal in
such a case, must be a fool.
Had I been once made to feel ashamed of it;once
made to run over at the eyesI should have forborn
all my life after, whatever had been the temptation. But
they, even they, that tempted me, were more wicked
than I. He that puts silver and gold in the way of the
miserable and destitute; unfortified by religion;
uninstructed
in self denial; taught only to think of shame
and suffering, not as the consequence of
guilt
, but as
the consequence of
discovery
he is a greater criminal
than the wretched thief himself. Beside thatdid I
not find all the people about me, getting possession of
propertyGod knows howif it were not by
cheating
or pilfering.
It is told of an absent man, not remarkable for his
discernment (or dizzernment?which is it?) that he
had some doubt about the honesty of a servant; and that,
willing to put it to the proof, he left some loose gold in
his way; and then went to a friend, full of self
complacency
,
at his own managementand told him what he
had done.
G 2
You counted it?
said his friend.
Alashe had not. He had never thought of that.
We laugh at the folly of this man; but how many of us
do the same thing? How many temptations do we
perpetually
offer, in our carelessness, to the poor, and
unsettled
?to
our servants, and to strangers?
What is the evil?This. We learn to suspect
everybody
;
to have no confidence in any human creature.
A judicious circumspection would prevent this. How
often do we only
suspect
a loss; yet, not being certain
of it, are fretted vilely by our suspicion, and dishonour
all that are near us, by our watchfulness. This may
be thought lightly of. But such is my opinion on the
subject, that, I would not be the friend of a man, so
careless of his property, as not to
know
when, or where
it was stolen from him. I consider every man, in this
world, as a lodger in a great inn. It is the privilege of
all
the guests, that each man should know
whom
to
charge, and with
what
, when he is pillaged. Else all
are wronged.
And what was the consequence of this discipline? I
became an inveterate thief. I stole whatever I could
lay my hands on, unless confidence were put in
me, until I was eighteen; and so expert was I, that I
have stolen one end of a thing, while the owner was
holding on by the other. I broke into my mother's desk;
robbed her sweetmeats, pies, shoe-buckles, pantry,
money
,
and spoons: nay, I have clambered into the
window
of an office, where an uncle of mine lived; and
robbed
his money box, time and again; and once, of a whole
dollar, while I was yet a child. Yet, why relate these
felonies?They grew out of a shameful neglect in my
education; great cruelty, and great injustice.
Naturally
a coward, I was exceedingly inquisitive and curious
in my disposition; chiefly, that I might find something
to comfort me, when I was afraidor console me,
after
I had been whipped. That I am not yet a thiefor
something worse than a thief, is no fault of theirs;---
it is not because of their scourging, butentirely owing
to myself. I have learnt to scorn it; or, rather to fear
the peril of it. My natural cowardice has got the upper
hand of my short sighted fear.
The first strong impulse ever communicated to my
honesty
, was accidental. I had never been trusted;
never, from my very cradle. I had, therefore, no
character
;
and no opportunity of acquiring one, for honesty.
But a man, with whom I lived, who had never been
wise enough to allow me any pocket money; and kept
me in such a state of degredation, that I was obliged
to ask for everything that I obtained, even to a pair of
shoes, though I was of incalculable service to him
until
I thought of tearing my clothes, or grinding them
through, at the elbows and knees, till they
spoke
for
me, whenever I grew tired of them; as the best way to
avoid the intolerable trial that it was for me, to
beg
,
even of my master, what I knew that I deserved;this
man had the good sense, one day, to put me in the way
of earning some pocket money, for myself. From that
hour, I was honest to him, and afraid to steal. Why
did he not think of this before?A little spending
money
is as necessary, as food and rest, to every child, who
may be surrounded by temptation. It is awkward for
him to steal; but, having once reconciled his conscience
to the
guilt
it is the same thing to him, whether he
steal a large, or a small sum. How different was it
now! How proud and sensitive I felt, the moment that
I had a few paltry and common perquisites allowed to
me, by which I could obtain something honestly;less,
to be sure, in a month, than I had been in the habit of
stealing in a weekbut little, as it was, it was my own;
and I slept quietly.
Let me say it. I have had some experienceI have been
a master, and an apprentice; a tyrant, and a slave; a
father, and a son, by turns; and I have always found it
cheaper to give high wages at firsta handsome
allowance
than
to be sordid. They that steal; like them,
who let out money at illegal interest, will be paid for
the risk of detection and punishment, that they run; and
the reputation, that they hazard. A desperate game is
to be played desperately.
O, it is melancholy, to look back upon the days that
are gone; to turn my thought inward, and contemplate
the trampled richness; the dishonoured and abused
quality of my own heart. It is wonderful to me, that I
have any of it leftwonderful that, for the blood and
pulse that I feel here now, stimulating me to acts of
benevolence and charity,I should not find the ashes
and blackness of a quenched furnacefull of crawling
reptiles.
A kindlier dealing with me; a more noble and
delicate
watchfulness, had made me one of the gentlest of
human creatures.Alas! why was there not some
guardian, of a benignant temper, to search out, and
studywhat was really worth studying; and what would
have rewarded him, here and hereafterthe hidden
and secret fountains of my heartand thenhow soon
had all their bitterness passed away.
It was not long after this, that I was put in the way
of another man, in extensive business;one of the
cursedest liars, and probably, one of the most natural
scoundrels, that ever kept the reputation of a decent man,
since the world was created. I was tall and manly of
my age; and the contract that was made for me,
rendered
it necessary that I should go naked; or steal and
cheat; or clothe myself
honestly
with
forty dollars
a
year, like a human being. The latter was impossible,
althought he man that swore, that his son
Ben
,(a
stuttering
;
thick-headed fellow, who managed the concern;
and who used to read Curran's speeches, of a cold night
in winter, till his hands cracked open, and bled upon the
pagenot because he had any relish for them, or the
capacity to understand them at all; but, merely, that
his mother might communicate the tale to some of her
gossiping acquaintances)had clothed himself for less
than thirty dollars a year. Nothing could be more
probable!at least, nothing, that you would ever hear
out of the father's mouth, from one year's end to the
other.
Now, what was I to do? To clothe myself, honestly,
and decently, with forty dollars a year, was out of the
question; though it should be stipulated, that I might
have whatever I should want,
out of the store, at cost
.
It was still harder for me to steal: because my hand
had been out for some time; and I felt a prodigious
unwillingness
to re-commence, so long as I could get
along, tolerably well, without it.
There was a middle course. Into that, I rushed, like
a skilful navigatorsaving my conscience, and
covering
my back, at the same time. It was stipulated, as
I have already said, that I should have what I wanted,
at cost
. It was only necessary, therefore, that I should
avail myself of the contract, after the manner which I
have since learnt to be the lawthat is, altogether in
favour of myselfto be clothed as well as I pleased.
Take an example. Suppose that I wanted a pair of
shoes. I would go to the shoemaker, and stipulate for
a pair, to be paid for, out of the store. Their price
would be a couple of dollars, if you please. When I
paid him; it was always with some trash, that had been
laid in at auctionfor my master's whole stock was of
that character; and I was always governed by the cost
marked
upon the outside. Thus, if a lot of different
qualities were purchased, they were all marked at the
same cost;
while some articles, perhaps, were worth
five times as much as others. I was always somewhat
scrupulous in this matter. I chose the
best
sold it at
a price, as much above what it cost, as I could
cheated
all that I could, in the measure(though
that
was
expressly against the injunction of Bennenev
never cheat, in the mmeameasure, said Ben; it
ititit is very unprincipled; ifif you must cheat, che
checheat in the
price
. You won't bebebebe
found out, ththen;) and then cheated in the
reckoning
(a
hint that I took from the old man; who first
undersold a neighbour, one day; and then, made it up
on the slate, while I was standing by him.) But,
perhaps
,
all this did not satisfy me. Perhaps I had
already
overrun, my monthly allowance of three dollars,
and thirty-three cents and one third.
In such an emergency, though the shoes might have
been made, in the way spoken of, to cost me only half
a dollar, or soyet,
that
was quite too much. They
might be managed so as to cost me nothing; nay, so as
to put some money into my pocket! But how? I had
only to make the man take goods, to a greater amount
than the shoes, and pay me the balance. These goods
I charged to myself, at
cost;
and put the profit into my
own pocket, and the shoes upon my feet, at the same
time. Thus I made forty dollars a year quite a
comfortable
salary. Pray heaven that you may do it as
honestly!
How short-sighted are the mean and sordid! If this
man had allowed me, for my clothes, eighty or one
hundred dollars a year, he would have been better
served. I should have been more jealous and true to
his interest, and carried my head more proudly; and
yet, less insolently, than I did. But he drove me to
compound with my conscience; and he had to pay the
price of the composition,
of course
, out of his own
pocket
.
By the way, let me give you some notion of the
accomplishments
,
that a reasonable man may look to
obtain
for his child, by putting him apprentice to a retail
dry goods
merchant;
grocer; or confectioner. In the
first place, he is pretty sure to learn how to
cheat;
next,
to
lie;
next, to
steal;
to say nothing of the fact, that the
very trade is disgraceful to a manexactly so far as
it could be carried on by a woman; for they, when
indigent
,
respectable, and virtuous, have
no resource;
none
at all, sobefitting their condition, as that of
shop-keeping
.
To them, it ought to be left; and men, who
presume
to sell ribbands, tape, laces, thread, needles,
stockings, and linen, ought to be labelled for
men-milleners
;mantua-making
would be but another branch
of the same trade. However, that is not all that a boy
will learn at a retail shophe will learn, ninety-nine
times out of one hundred, to pass counterfeit money.
I did. One maxim with my master, wasif he bought
the devil, to sell him again. And with whom, is it
not
a maxim? Another was, never to believe that a
counterfeit
note
was
a counterfeit. Out of these two
maxims
,
grew my conduct; and
his
. If we received a
suspicious
looking note, we took care to put it off,
immediately
,
either upon a stranger; a countryman, from the
back woods; or a woman; their simplicity, ignorance,
forgetfulness; and the probable distance that they would
carry it, before they would attempt to pass it, or
discover
their mistakebeing a guarantee that it would
not come back to us again. Yet, I have had the same
note come back, ten times in a day. And what was
the consequence? Did I ever lose a customer by it?
O, no! They always left me, full of gratitude and
delight
.
I would pretend not to recollect the note; and
would say, Well, madamif you say that you took it
of me, I am satisfied. I do not deny thatitbut you
are
sure
of it, you say. O, certainly, sir
certainly
;
if it were the last word, that I had to speak, I would
swear to it. Very well, madam;
there
is good
money
;if
this be counterfeit, I must lose it;it is very
hardvery; and I am heartily sorry for the trouble
that you have hadbutyou are
sure
, you sayand if
you were not, why we can better afford to lose it, than
you, &c. O, God bless you, siryou are very
good, she would saythe tears probably, standing, in
her eyes. She would leave me; and the very next
woman
that left my store, ten to one, would carry away
the same note, again! So much for my apprenticeship.
Boys do this from fear, sometimes, when they suspect
that they have taken a bad note. Others, from
principle
.
I was of the latter class.
I was, after that, in the service of other men. They
treated me well; and they are the richer for it. Mine
has never been the maxim of the worldto treat them
worst, who treat me best. Do I slander the world? I
do not. By whom do we suffer? By our
friends
. A
man in debt, or in jail, will pay his mortal enemy, to
get out of his power; and borrow the money of a friend
whom he never paysfor the purpose: aye, and let
his friend take
his
place in prison. We dare not take
liberties, or ask favours, of them that hate us. We are
too proud. Nay, do we not oftener suffer, by having
too good, than too bad an opinion, of a man? Whence
all these bankruptciesfailuressuicidesand
destruction
of familiesby endorsementlending money
bail, and securityship? They all come from our
friends
.
We lose nothing in this way, by our enemies.
Nobody
neither man nor womanever suffered from
distrusting
anybody
. Yet, mine has been a contrary maxim
open war, or real peace
. It matters little which. If I
called a man friend, there was meaning in it. He was
not to be my
victim
.
CHAPTER IV.
Early History...Observation...Incidents...Retrospect...Becomes
a clerk in a store...Temptations...Trails...Mortifications...
Characters
...Education...Advice...The
trunk...The portmanteau
...Reflections...Curiosity...Advice to parents.
I have
lived to experience one of the most
extraordinary
revolutions, in prejudice, that has, probably,
ever happened. When I was a young man, I was
always
treated best, by them that knew least of me.
Since then, it has been directly the reverse.
Then
, my
first appearance had, usually, a striking effect; (I speak
of my apprenticeship;) for, as I said before, I was tall
and manly: but I found a lamentable falling off, on
every
day's acquaintance, in the consideration with which
I was treated. How different has it been since! My
acquaintances have hated me, and slandered me;
people
that I had met once, and only for a moment, never
could bear to hear, afterward, my name mentioned;
while there were a few, intimate with memale and
femalea very fewwho would; aye, and
will
yet,
spill their blood for me.
I remember when I went home, for the first time, to
the house of my new master;the man who gave me
forty dollars a year, and cold dinners, for taking care
of a large establishment, under his great booby of a
son. It was to dine. Ben was my companion, for
that
day; and, when I entered the room, there was an
involuntary
movement of surprise in the women. They
were not prepared to expect a fellow of my size and
appearance
;
and I was not a little amused at their
embarrassment
.
There was a good deal of whispering,
and fidgetting; and an entire new arrangement of the
cloth. Ben and I, for that day, were seated at a side
table. That was by way of condescension toward
me!
It was very ill-judged; for
we
could never occupy the
same level. It was not in the nature of things; and I
should have been happier
then
, to be beneath him, than
H
with
him. You can have no idea of his obstinate,
piteous
,
money-making stupidity; and yet, he had no
notion
that it was possible to be a greater man than he
expected to be. I remember a letter, that he once
wrote, to a little she cousin of his;a fine girl, too,
upon
my word(I have often thought of her since, with
pleasure and respect.) A copy of it fell into my hands.
He talked very feelingly in it, I remember, about the
leprosy
, in which commerce had lain, for so long a time!
Well!for the
first
day, Ben was permitted to dine
with me; and I was
permitted
to dine at a side table;
but the next, Ben, after some shuffling, went home with
his father, to dinnerleaving me to watch the store;
and when he came back, after some apologies, I took
my
turn
. But my
turn
continued to beto go
last
, I
foundhappen what would; and, after the first week, I
heard nothing more of apologies:and all the
involuntary
deference, which the mothera notable, good,
rational
sort of a woman, in her wayor the young lady,
above mentioned, had shown, at my entrance, soon
wore away, into quite a slip-shod kind of indifference.
But there it stopped. They were not quite willing to
yawn, or go to bed, in my face. Yet, why was this?
What had I done? Nothing. My deportment was
above my age; and, had I been a stranger to them, they
could not have forborn, for their souls, to rise, every
day, when I entered the room, as they did, the first day.
But, a worldly policy; that vulgar cunning, which is
constitutional with the vulgar, soon led them to another
course. They were afraid of setting me above my
business
.
Poor simpletons! And yet, I can look back,
with pleasure, upon that year's novitiate; and recal the
deep and continual mortification, that I endured, more
than once; with a sentiment of pride. Even then, I
felt
that my destiny was not with them. I
knew
that I was
born to
command
better earth, than that, of which their
souls
were made. I
knew
that the time
must
come,
when, even to be judged by me, as I now judge these
people, would be an honour to them, of which they
would speak boastingly:and I used to go to my bed,
week after week, the moment that I left the tea-table;
and lie there; meditating upon the apparitions that
came out, and went back again, into the beautiful blue
darkness that was about melike continual eruptions
of colour and brightness; while the heavens above me,
showered their stars upon the earth, like the blossoms
of a fig-tree, shaken by a great wind.(Revelations,
iv. 13.)
Yet, the mother was kind to me, on more than one
occasion; and the father,
never
I must say that for
himnever once wounded my feeling; but the sonhe
was afraid of meafraid as deathalthough he did
not know it, himself. And well that it was so. Once,
and once only, was he nigh putting his hand upon me;
he came round from the counter to do it; but he caught
my look; he heard my low voice; and he shook, from
head to foot. The cause I well remember. A young
brother of hisafter ten thousand childish, but wicked
pranks; such as greasing my clothes, (for which his
mother cuffed him soundly once, all about the
breakfast
room, in my presenceand for which, I imagine
that he never forgave me)and thwarting me every
way that he couldhe had the audacity to strike me.
This, I never could bear. I had born such things; but
that time had gone by;and I whipped him
unwillingly
,
I confess; but I whipped him, nevertheless. He
rushed upon me with brick-bats, until I was obliged to
let a little blood out for him. He complained to Ben;
and Ben began to bully and splutterwhile the spittle
flew, in a shower, over the desk. But there it stopped.
He did not strike me; and I was retained in the store
till the year was up; and then, packed off, quite civilly.
I expected it.--A few words more, on this part of my
apprenticeship
.
Among the most severe and cutting of these
mortifications
,
were two or three, that I never shall forget.
My blood boiled; and the tears that gushed out of my
eyes, when I was in bed, almost blistered my cheeks.
I wanted to go to church with them, once; but they
were ashamed to sit in the pew with meand almost
said so. That was one. The second was worse. The
mother had often permitted me to come into the room,
when she had company; and, ugly and ungraceful as I
was, there was, even
then
, more of natural gentility, ten
thousand times over, in
me
, than in all her unlicked
cubs, togethernot excepting Ben, who was, beyond
all comparison, the most truly ludicrous machine; the
most entirely awkward contrivance, that I ever met
within breeches.
On one occasion, she gave a ball. Two little
junketting
rooms were thrown openfor the lady was fond,
very fond, of company; and cake and wine are plenty
enoughand cost nothing, you know, where the
husband
of a woman is a grocerand his wife, a good
manager. The people jumped, and stewed; and
wriggled
,
and shuffled; first, up the roomand then, down,
to my infinite astonishment. I had never seen any
dancing before; and I loved to look at the fools. In a
little time, without intending it, I had hustled myself
in among the patricians. Just then, the good lady
was kind enough to come, stuttering, up to me(for
she
stuttered a little, too)her pretty, shining black eyes
snapping fireand hint to me, thatthatitit
sheshein short, that she had perpermitted me to
stand at the door; and look in; andandthatin
shortI had better be off. What a damper!
On another occasion,the old man had too much
heart; and Ben, I suppose, too little, to speak to me of
itafter two or three family consultationsthe old
lady
no,
that's wrongshe is not old, yettook me to
task, for a couple of new linen shirts, that had been
found in the washas if she would like to know how I
came by them. That was devilish hard. I had left
off stealing. The shirts were fairly mine. I had
charged the linen to myself, some months before; and
and, in short, I made her, and all the family ashamed
enough of their suspicions.
Now, what had I to keep me honest? Suspect any
man of being a scoundrel; and it is the surest way in
the world, of making him one. Be careful how you
suspect;
but never
never
, betray your suspicion to one,
who is to remain in your service, unless you are
prepared
to
prove
his guilt. I was greatly tempted to
vengeance
yet,
I forbore. My own manhood kept me
honestnothing else.Pshaw! it was not manhoodit
was cowardice. The risk of stealing, then, had begun
to frighten me.
Here were other examples of folly, in the education
that I received. They tried to humble me. They could
not. They were ashamed of themselvesbut they
never
made me ashamed. I deserved to be treated with
respect and affection. I was not. They began, as
they could not continue. I smiled; for I saw the
meaning
of it all. They were afraid to arouse me at once, by
the indignity of a cold dinner, at a second table. Nay,
they were ashamed. They had'nt the courage to offer
it to me, after
seeing
me. But, gradually, by
contemplating
my
salary
, and forgetting
me
, they brought
themselves down to
it;
and I was treated with
indignity
,
by the very women that trembled before me, when
they first saw me.
I had a good heart; but I had no experience in the
ways of the world. I had a stout hand; but I knew not
the mischief that might be done with it. In proof of
the former, I would allude to the fact, that I lay awake
several hours, for an opportunity to bid a
shop-keeping
brother of
hers
, (I mean the girl,) good bye, the
last night that he spent with the family; and that, when
I
did
it seemed to be a
liberty
, that the blockhead could
not understand;and, again, that when
she
was going
away, I remember standing an hour, in the cold and
darkness, for an opportunity to say farewell to
her
merely because, one evening, when we happened to be
alone together, she had the wisdom to treat me like a
companion. Thatbut no matter. I have seen her
since; and in a situation, when she charged me with
feeling no disposition to acknowledge the acquaintance.
I do not like these things.
Begin, as you can hold out,
is my maxim;
or, at least, never grow
worse
, or
do
worse, as you grow older. If you take boarders, give
them, the first day, a worse dinner than usual; rather
than a better one. If you are newly married,
remember
the maxim:you may be ruined elsebankrupt
without any credit to yourself. So, in all the business
H 2
of life:husband your resources and friendship. If you
are lavish at first, your wife, your friend, and yourself,
will soon have to go to the
side table;
and then, to a
cold
dinner
. Beware!
A word more of
myself
, nowby way of a change.
One of my strongest peculiarities through life, has been
an incessantly active spirit of inquiry. In my
boyhood
,
it was little else than a meddling, curious,
impertinent
inquisitiveness, without object or aim, beyond
a present momentary gratification;but, as I grew up,
it took a more alarming shape.It haunted me like
some unburied creature; it set me meditating upon
forbidden
thingsinterrogatingGoddissecting
analyzing
,
and torturing into expression, whatever I came
near, that had life in it. It set wandering, with a
scornful
step, through all the geography of heaven. For
this, I have been guiltyso guilty, that I have no hope
left, except in the
infinite
compassion of my Maker.
Naythis it isan insatiable spirit of investigation,
which grew up out of my cowardiceand an anxiety
to protect myself in
any
way, from the common perils
of lifeI was afraid to sin openlyto inquire, boldly
as other men did;to oppose, or resist, or retaliate
aggression upon the spot, like the brave-blooded:and,
therefore, I became so active and intense, in my secret
searching after the means of defencelike them that
defend themselves, and attack others, by poison,
because
they are not valiant enough, nor strong enough,
of arm or heart, to make battle openlythis it is, to which
I owe all that is good, as well as all that is evil in my
life. It has made me a husband and a fathera lover
of many womenthe explorer of many heartsa
traveller
through all Europethe spoiler of many a
blessed
creature; many a shrine of purityand left me
blind and broken heartedwidowed, houseless, and
fatherlessnay, childless, even in my maturity
but
better
, I believe; and
wiser
in my sorrow, and
bereavement
,
than I should have been, even, with a crown
upon my temples, and a sceptre in my handwith
which I could break in pieceswhatever I smote;and
smite, whatever I would. But let me not anticipate the
tale. It is one of much trial. May it be one of
instruction
!
It is one of much sorrow, and tribulation;
may they that meet with it, learn to be tender in their
administration of power! to deal gently, and
dispassionately
,
with whatever hath been made weaker, and
more delicate than themselves! to repress an
unhallowed
curiosityand to lovemore temperatelyless
distractedly, than I have loved, either my wife, or my
childrenI must pause. I
must
recollect
myself
.
There are incidents of my early life, which,
though apparently trivial in themselves, at the time
of their happening, have had a perpetual and
continually
augmenting influence upon my destiny. They
ought to be told; and, whenever they occur to my
memory
,
they shall be told, although I have to go back
every
moment, in my narrative.
I have spoken of my active, investigating spirit. Two
or three examples of my character, when it first
appeared
,
will be a clue to much that has taken place in my
history since. Whatever happened that was
mysterious
,
troubled me like a brain-fever, till I was at the
bottom of it. Whatever was difficult, yet
possible
, to
be done, I was sure to attempt, if left to the goading of
my own spirit. These principles of action are still at
full spring within me.
When about eight or nine years old, I was taken
into
the counting-roomno, I may as well out with the
truth at oncetaken into the back room of a retail
shop, where tape and pins were speculated upon, by the
merchants
, with the solemnity of people engaged in a
South Sea; Tulip; or Mississippi scheme. I was of
little
useexcept in the summer time, when my chief
employment
was stealing fruit from a fine garden, just in
the rear of
our
storetearing out my corduroy trowers;
and rummaging the shop, from garret to cellar, whenever
I was left alone in it, for a moment. One dayI
never
shall forget itthere was a big leathern trunk in the
store, to which I had seen one of the concern, go, so
often, and so regularly, that, I felt an immoderate desire
of imitating his example, on the very first opportunity.
It soon arrived. There was a cry of fire!fire!in
the street. Away went my masterslocking me up, as
usual. I waited just long enough to get my breath;
flew at the trunk,wrenched it open,emptied it all
over the floor;and proceeded to distribute, and
arrange
for inspection, a heap of tattered billet-doux
old clothespattern cardstorn booksfishing tackle
scraps of drawing&c. &c. &c. They were, where
I sat, about as high as my ears, on each side of
me. I looked at the whole, with the eyes of an
Alchymist
.
My ancient curiosity was about to be
thoroughly
gratified. I was almost afraid to begin the search;
I paused, and held backto indulge myself with
looking
at the treasure before melike a glutton, or a miser
who feeds all his senses; but, only one of them at a
time;or, rather, like the voluptuarytouching and
tastingtill his appetite is all on fire. At last, I broke
the spell. I rose from my knees, and fell to work.
The first things, that I laid my hand on, were some three
pronged fish hooks;with leaden sinkersthese, I
appropriated
to myself, at once, without further
ceremony
;
merely on account of their workmanship; for, I
did'nt know what they were; and had no idea of their
use. The next thing, that underwent examination, was
a drawing, coloured most shamefully, in imitation of a
landscape, upon a waiter, borrowed by my junior
master
,
from our next door neighbour; of whom, more, by and
by. To this, was attached the picture of a house
painted upon a cardwith a pretty, little, white railing
in front, which had mightily tickled me, I knew, some
weeks before; for, as soon as my said master had
completed
it, I had asked him for it,
in vain
. The
temptation
was
hard to resist. It was a paltry thing, to be
sure; and, as well I can remember now, so badly
contrived
,
that, if my little boy had painted so wretchedly, at
seven years old, I would have had him impaled alive,
for it; still, it was the house that I had asked for, and been
refused. It was hard to leave itand yet, if I took it,
I must be prepared for a stout examination, and denial;
for, it was, next to his own finger nails, upon which he
spent half his time, the dearest thing under heaven,
probably, to my young master. I could'nt determine
I had a great mind to put it by, along with the fish
hooks and sinkers; and then, again, I resolved to leave
it; but somehow or other, I always found it in my hand
again; at the end of every soliloquy; and so, I laid it by,
with the fish hooks; for future consideration. In the
mean time, the fire was all outthe bells had stopped
ringing, and the people were tramping home, in every
direction; but, I heard nothing of them, and saw
nothing
,
except the
house
. By and by, I had the courage
to break a string, that bound up a packet of neatly
folded
paper, written all over. That was a treat indeed.
It was the daily journal of a man, for years, who never
had more than one idea in his head, at a time; nor, any
other experience in the ways of the world; or, in the
adventures
and vicissitudes of life, than any shop-boy
may learn, who has grown old, in travelling from one
counter to another; to dinner, and bed, and supper; and
back again. Yet there were some precious secrets to
be found some, that my fingers itch to relate; even at
this late day; and, a multitude of such weighty
incidents
,
as the following:
Monday, June
3, 18.
Bought a new pair of gloves.Saw Miss A. B....
Tuesday
, 4discovered an improvement in egg
blacking
.Took
tea at Mrs. C..d's.Letter from home.
Wednesday
, 5had my top boots mended, by Gage, so
that it appeared, as if a bullet had gone through them.
Thursday
, 6bad cold.
Friday
, 7running away, at
the nose.
Saturday
, 8can't keep up with it. &c. &c.
My profane hand next fell upon a love letter.I had
just opened it saw the words
Dear Timothy
and
turned toward the light, thatcurse it,was
there a sudden eclipse?I looked up. There was my
master, standing over mewith the pleasantest
countenance
in the world. How long he had been there,
heaven only knows; but
I
know that I never felt so like
a fool, in all my life.
Bill
, said he, at lastgoing into the next room,
will you be kind enough to put the letters and things
back into the trunk, when you have done with them?
That
I will! thought Iquaking like delicate
machinery, with some wild animal in it;and in, I
tumbled
all the rubbish, pellmell, neads and points; and,
prepared myself for being spitted and roasted, alive,
at least. But, God help the fool!I never heard
another word about it.
And yetmark me, readerthe shame that I felt on
that occasion, was worth a dozen whippings. Had the
man, who was really amiable, called me to him, when
he was alone; put his hand upon my head, and spoken
to me, as I would speak to a child
now
, whom I had so
caught among my trumpery, I should never have sinned
again, upon this earth. But nonothing was said
about it; and I was left to imagineeither, that some
tremendous punishment was brewing for me; or that
my transgression was quite too trivial for remembrance,
or notice. It was not. I should have been made to
feel that it was notby a whip, not of substantial
scorpions
but
by one, that I should have felt, to my dying
daysone, that would have left a young serpent in
every woundand, every wound upon my brain.
But, what was the consequence? My infernal
appetite
for meddling was not to be quenched. I ransacked,
whatever I found hidden, or locked, without mercy;
spoiling
,
as if it were lawful, whatever were shut up from me.
Not long after this, I had just such another escape.
I had been sent, with a small portmanteau, to the
stage-office
.
It belonged to a gentleman, whom I left
talking
,
at the store. I ran as fast as I could, to gain a
little time, for my purpose; I then turned a corner; and
popped down, behind a pile of shingles, to examine the
portmanteau. I had just got my right hand
thoroughly
to the bottom, when I heard some one sing out
Halloa, there!just above me. I had half
a mind to vanish on the spot, without looking up, to
see what the noise came from; for, I remembered the
trunk; and it always
had
been my cursed fate, on such
occasions, to be intruded upon. Providence had always
set itself against me, face and eyesbut, I could'nt
get my hand out. At length, I succeeded; and
stammered
out a lamentable story, about having dropped a
knife into it, whichbut, no matter, it was a clumsy
lie for me to tell, young as I was. But, alas!the
cruellest thing of all, was, that I had to continue the
walk, side by side, with the ownerfor half an hour
longer; and truly, I never suffered so much in my life.
At a yet later period, I suffered in a similar way.
I had made up my mind once, to appropriate to
myself
,
a pair of blue cloth pantaloons, to which I had
taken
a fancy, in a gentleman's wardrobe; for whom I had
been writingand who had been very civil to me. I
knew that they would fit me; for he was a well made
fellow; and I had already worn out one pair for
him. I knew when he was
not
there. I entered boldly;
and went directly toward the closet.What could I say
for myself? There he
was!
just where I had left him,
the night beforeas if he had'nt stirred since. Indeed!
indeed!it was very disagreeable. It was like finding
your conscience or courser restive, just in the wrong
place, after a deal of training.
The same unhallowed curiosity, hath since led me
into matters of a more frightful seriousness. I have
done rummaging trunks and portmanteaus; but
heaven
forgive me!I have ransacked hearts and
bed-chambers
;
intruded upon the holiest places of the
holiest
templespaid midnight visitsof darkness and
deathandbut they are past. Heaven, I hope, hath
pardoned me; and the fierce instinct of my being; this
old, sleepless spirit of investigation, trial, fear, and
experiment
,
is now employed upon higher and holier offices,
I hope
.
Was it unwisely given?this investigating
disposition
?
No. But it was suffered to run to waste; and,
what had been a fountain of immortality, watched over,
visited, and purified, reflecting the magnificence of
heaventhe setting and the rising sunthe starry
annals
of the sky, at midnight;untouched, unguided,
had well nigh stagnated to a deadly poison. So it is,
with all our blessings. They, that are the most
powerful
when
abused, are the most terrible. It is safer to
trifle with many inferiour faculties; to profane many
an ordinary endowmentthan to darken, or stay the
revolution, for one instant, of the greater luminaries of
the mind. It is they, that, suddenly quenched, drop
darkness and mildew upon men! It is they, that, if
they shed not light, shed pestilence!
That
spirit of inquiry
that
, which led Newton into
heaven, and set him walking with the twenty-four
ancients
,
familiarly, among the stars;
that
, which,
unannounced
,
and unprepared, set the blind Milton, face
to face, with Jehovah;
that
, which led Bacon and
Locke, unharmed, unappalled, into the darkest
habitations
of the human hearttill they were able to trace
out the burning path-way of every passionthe route
to dominion, of every habitthe secret operation of
every
hidden, and lurking spirit, that haunted them;
even
that
is it, which, unheeded or mocked at, hath led
to the commission of more atrocities, than almost any
other propensity, in the nature of man. You may
estimate
the virtue of every thing, by its malignity and
destructiveness, when perverted.
Parents!Beware how you stifle this early
curiosity
.
You had better take out the brains of your
children
,
at once. Beware, too, how you look with
indifference
upon its first movements. They may make your
heart swell with thankfulness; or bring down your
grey hairs, with sorrow, to the grave. Hearken to
me; and you will soon learn, of what tremendous
efficacy
it is, when rightly directed; and how deadly, and
terrible, when abused.
CHAPTER V.
Matters and things in general...Memory of the senses...Tricks of
authorship...Anecdotes...My Mother...Thieving...Education
...Reasoning...Advice to parents...Stuck to my seat...Schools
...Windham...Famished...Academy...Barefooted...Revenge
...Dream.
I have
chosen my course. It has ended, where, if
I had foreseen that it would end, ten years ago, I should
have gone mad upon the spot; and rushed into the
presence
of Jehovah, with a cry of desolation.
Why hast thou created me! Lo, I am returned to
thee!unbidden! I should have said;for I cannot
abide thy appointment!
Yes, I have chosen my coursetied up my own
handsthrown myself down, like some detestable thing,
upon the dust and ruin of all that I have loved. Shall
the tale be told? It shall.
But how to tell it! Shall I begin with a
recapitulation
of all the fiery and sore plagues, that have
been visited upon me; the devils, that have beset my
path; the apparitions, that have baited me, day and
night, from my very boyhood? Shall I do this; and
then, retread my steps to the
causes
cause after cause,
that have led to it?
Could
you follow me? No.
Your heart would fail you. You would never believe;
you could not, that such wreck and devastation, could
have been the consequence of such trivial and distant
events. Let me begin then, before you are alarmed;
and lead you forward, step by step, from the first
delicate
link, to the massy iron of the lastthe
last!
how
know I, that the
last
link is yet wrought?how know
I, that the next will not weigh me down to the earth?
Nay, deeper than the earth? Yea, that shall be my
course. I will not begin, by terrifying you. I will
begin
at the smaller end. Whoever you are, reader, I
defy
you to throw down the book, till you have trodden
I
to the conclusion. Yea, though it be with me, over
plough-shares hissing with bloodserpentsand live
embers.
There are two ways. I have chosen the simplest
the most effectual. Our object may be the same; and
the routes, apparently, the same; when, by one, we
never
can arrive to it:and, by the other, we shall
arrive
,
at once. My memory frightens meyet, I
cannot
tell why. The scenes of my early life, are all vivid
before meyet, I cannot describe them. How
incomprehensible
!
you exclaim.
Do you understand any other language than your
own? Latin, for example?or French? You are able
to read it, we will suppose, readily, and at a glance.
A page of French is given to you. You translate it, at
once. But the page of English, the
same
that you have
just written, is offered to you again, to return into
French. Can you do it? No. Can you give a
reason
?
No. You only know, that you
cannot
do it.
It appears very strange to the inexperienced. What;
say they;you cannot translate English into French!
and
can
, French into English! How is this? You
could not do the last, unless you knew and
remembered
the
words
. But, if you know and remember the
words, what prevents you from doing the first?
Thus will people reason, on what they do not
understand
.
They have never learnt that each sense has its
memory; each faculty, its retentivenessits
reminiscence
;
a mode of receiving and communicating
impressions
peculiar to itself. The mind slumbers.
The memory of abstract thought dies away. But the
senses are startled into exquisite life, years and years,
after the mind has lost its hold upon things, by some
sweet perfume; some cadence; some vapour; some touch;
or some taste; some colour, or expression.
Apply this. The eyes remember the words, when
the mind has forgotten them. There is a self-arranging
power in all language; a spirit that seeks affinity, ease,
and harmony, too, which the ear remembers. But the
eyes must see, and the ears hear these things, before
they will recollect them.
As well might one be called upon to remember, and
describe an odour, or a heavenly pair of eyes, so that
another should smell the one, and see the other, as he
did, long after they had gone away from him; with no
fragrance, and no eyes near, to compare them to;as
that he should
speak
in a foreign language, as readily
as he can
read
it.
But there are some, I hope, who are acquainted with
no language but their own; but then, I hope too, that
they are well acquainted with that. I will try to make
them
comprehend the mystery, that we may
remember
,
what one cannot
repeat
.
You hear a song. Do you not remember it? You do.
Can you repeat a word of it. No. Nay, more:you
have set out, play after play, at the theatre. You are
unable to repeat a lineyou forget even the name of
the author, and the characters. Yet, how quickly do
you detect an interpolation. You do not know what
is
in the play; but you know what is
not
in it. Which
requires the greatest memory? You cannot remember
Milton. Yet, nobody could pass off another's poetry,
upon you, for his. Nay, you are able to read and
relish
the beauties of Shakspeare. Can you write like
him? No.
You think this absurd. But recollect yourself. You
wonder that a person, who can read and relish a French
author, should be unable to write French. Where is
the difference?
Does not this prove to you, that you may remember a
thing, without
knowing
it; nay, without being able to
recollect, or describe it. How do you know your
acquaintances
,
when you meet them, after a long absence?
It is the habit of your senses; not the recognition of
your mind. It is not the
memory
of your
mind;
for, if
it were, you would find ideas and words for it. Can
you describecan you give to anotherany notion of
the process, by which you arrive at the recognition of
them? You cannot. Am I still incomprehensible? Do
you not see, that, although I may remember every
thing that has happened during all my life, yet I cannot
repeat it.
You may have the same object. There may be two
routes, plain, and common, and direct to your view.
Yet, one only may lead you to it. Take another case.
You meet with a strange word, in some foreign
language
.
Let us suppose it, in the Italian. You are
desirous
of finding out what it means. Two routes are
before you; two, alike certain and direct, to the
inexperienced
.
You have two dictionaries. One is of
Italian
words, with English definitions; the other, of
English
words, with Italian definitions. To which will
you refer? If you take up the latter, you may spend a
twelvemonth in the search; and not find the word at
last. If the former, you get it directly. Yet, in both
cases, you are
ignorant of Italian
. Yet, what
multitudes
in life, are in the habit of looking into the
Italian
dictionary! When I see a young girl, newly
married
about
to
Here I intended to introduce an original essay, that
I had by me, after the manner of Franklin's whistle;
but, I have thought better of it. And, besideII
intended
to enter into a deep speculation upon the
present
fashions of teachingthrow in some strictures
upon Locke, &c. &c.;but all that may come in, better,
and more naturally, by and by. I look back on what
I have written. I ask myself, what on earth, this long
essay on the senses, has to do with the subject? And
then, I comfort myself with the reflection, that it is
ingenious
;
and so altogether after the present fashion of
writing, that I can't, for my soul, make up my mind to
leave it out. Awkwardly introduced, it is, I confess;
but, open a page, a single page, of any writer, ancient
or modern, and I will show
you
some matter, as foreign
though more adroitly dovetailed, perhaps, into the
main subject. Have you never had a lady quote
half a dozen languages at you, in one letter? You
have. Go to your dictionaries. Tumble them over,
and you will find, that she has copied the phrases, there
given as examples. Did they grow
[3]
[3]
See
quotations
in the
Port Folio
no matter where they occur, since the present
Editor
has had it in hand, for
illustrations
.Ed.
out of her subject?
Nothe subject grew out of them. However, reader,
I promise to play no more such tricks with you.
But, what can be done, now? This, and this only.
The essay does'nt fit the tale; let us make the tale fit
the essay. My object was to hitch in some
illustrations
,
that were by me; and I should be ashamed of
having left out, what they were meant to illustrate,
were it not the commonest practice in the world, with
all the best writers of the age. One would think, that
they kept a common place bookand then counted it
off, into chapters, cantos, or essays.
But let me see. The matter may not be so
desperate
,
after all. I have only to discover, or imagine
some connexion, between my thought, and this episode
upon the senses; memory; dictionaries, and languages.
StayI have it. Two ways were left to meto tell
my sorrow; and then, to lead you
back
, barefooted,
over the ground that I had tracked with my blood, in
my weary, weary pilgrimage, to the
cause:
or, I might
begin with the cause, and lead you onward, year after
year, with me, to all their tremendous consequences.
In either case, by retreading the same path, the
memory
of each sense would be active. A thousand
associations
would be awakened upon the spot, that would
have slumbered, for ever, had I remained in my room.
Beside, there would be a natural and mechanical
recollection
,
as there is, in beginning at the top of the
alphabet
,
and reciting it in the order that is learntto
facilitate my progresswhen, no matter how well I
was acquainted with it, it would be exceedingly difficult
and irksome, to say it
backward
. Thus hath it been
with me, in determining which of the two methods I
should adopt, on this occasion.
To the unthinking, one were as easy as the other.
To me, there was a mighty difference. I was willing
to show itnot by telling the truth; for that, I am
forbidden
to speakbut by looking for analogy into other
matters. I have found it. I have shown that there
may be an inconceivable difference in two routes,
which
appear
alike. And now, if you please, I'll go to
bed.Q. E. D.
I 2
I was always remarkable for trick and expedient.
Darn one hole, and I broke out at another. Smoke me
out of this hiding place, and I haunted the next. It was
impossible to imprison or suffocate me. The example
above, is in point. Let me go back awhile; and show
you the consequence of suspicion and artifice. They
lead to artifice. Villany begets villany.
My mother used, sometimes, to send me to the store
room, where the mince-pies, dough-nuts, short-cake,
smoked herrings, apples, and sweetmeats, were kept
for something or other; but, always with, a vehement
injunction
that I should meddle with neither. I should
have obeyed her, I am sure, had she trusted to her own
interdict. But she did not. She began a game of
artifice
.
It was plot and counterplot, with me; and I
always prevailed at that game, with this difference
that, if she had let me alone, I should have stolen only
a few sweetmeats; or a few apples; or a pocket full of
nuts; or a piece of pie; or, perhaps, neither;whereas,
by hedging me in with so many stratagems, she made
it indispensable for me to steal
whole jars
, and
whole
pies. How was it? She would bid me whistle all the
time that I was gone, so that she might hear me; and,
when I returned, she would look at my lips, and
question
me, and smell of my breath, notwithstanding.
What could I do? I whistled away, like a brave
fellow
,
up stairs and downtaking care to put a whole
jar of preserves; or a whole pie, outside of the door,
while
I was whistling; so that I might lay my hand on
it again, when I wanted to, without the embarrassing
preliminary, of lock and key, &c. It had been better
for her, if she had left me to steal a mouthful or two,
by way of toll, as you see.
Would that all were as honest as I! How
their
confessions
would startle the world! For my own part, I
cannot help repeating, that a parent is never so
mistaken
,
as when he invites a child to competition in
cunning
.
In the first place, he is sure to be outwitted, in
the long run; for the faculties of the child are
constantly
improving; and he is never so artless, or so easily
deceived, as the parent supposes. How often will you
see a little fellow, who can hardly speak a word, leave
his playthings; and sit stock still, in the middle of the
floor, to listen to the gossipping of his mother?and
that, too, when she is endeavouring to impose upon
him. He knows that
he
is the subject of conversation;
and that,
he
is
not
to know it. What is the train of
thought in his little mind?this:that language may
have more meanings than one;that it is lawful to speak
so that different hearers may understand you
differently
.
What a lesson for the pure and unpractised mind!
Nothis will never do. In cunning, we are no match
for our children. Would you make yours ingenious?
Be so, yourself. Brave?calm?steady?set them
the example. Passionate?mean?shuffling? Your
example is sufficient.
It was by such foolish and wicked lessons, that I was
taught. There is nothing evil in me, prodigal as my
evil qualities are, and productive as they have been;
which may not be traced, distinctly and certainly, to
some wickedness or folly of them, that had charge of
my education. What there is
good
in me, I owe to God
alone; and, next to Him, to my sister Elizabeth. The
one gave me a heart, and the other kept it from
perishing
.
One or two other little incidents, and I shall
abandon
this part of my detail. There was a large and
beautiful garden, just in the rear of our house. It was
full of fruit trees, currant, and gooseberry bushes. I
had explored it often; but all my affections, at last,
began to concentrate upon a fine old English
gooseberry
bush. At one of my periodical visitsI have
always
been noted for method except in conversation and
mathematicksI heard a gate open at the further end
of the garden. I peeped out from my hiding place; but
it was altogether too late to escape. The proprietor
one of your old-fashioned gentry, kind-hearted, and
full of humourhove in sight, with a magistrate
hanging
upon his arma magistrate! I shivered with
affright. What was I to do? The fence was close by.
I could run up, like a squirrel, over a pile of bean poles
that lay upon itand escape, before they could lay a
finger upon me. But then, I should be seen; and a
stop would be put to my intimacy with the gooseberry
busha thing, that I could not bear to think oftill
apples
were ripe. I put my hand to my pocketsthey
were full; to my hatthat was full; to my waistband
that
was full;I could'nt have swallowed another
dozen
,
I verily believe, had it been to save my life; and I
was ready to bawl with vexation,
because
I could not.
They were now at hand; and I cuddled up, under the
bush, like a hare, squatting in her form. They affected
not to see me, till they were close upon me. Why? It
was a trick, and I knew it. I saw it, by their affected
countenances, and broken conversation. They wanted
to catch me, alive. At last, the owner fetched a great
startand I crawled outto my unspeakable
mortification
.
Reader, have you ever backed out of
anything?
[4]
[4]
Like the rat, out of his breeches, lately, at Providence, R. L
Ed.
no matter whatdo you remember how like a fool
you looked?or felt? Here was a fair game between
us. He had
lied
, once, by pretending not to see me;
and he lied again, by pretending to mistake me for some
wild animal. So, I flew to my penknife story;my
best one, for such an occasion;told him that I had just
lent it to a boythat he would'nt give it backthat I
had had a scuffle with him, for itthat he threw it over
the fencethat I jumped over, after itthat I heard the
gate open; and saw him comingthat I was afraid that
he might suspect me of being a thief; a thing, that I could
not bear to think ofand that, therefore, I hid myself
under the gooseberry bush. So saying, I produced the
knife, in confirmation; and he bade me depart in peace;
winking, as he did, at the other. Why did he wink?
I felt that it was a compliment to my ingenuity.
Instead
of being ashamed, therefore, of the lie that I had
told, I was proud of it. Heaven forgive that man! He
did much toward confirming me in the basest of all
vicesthat of lying. God! what a coward I was!
why had'nt I the courage to own the truth?
Little mortifications, too, are sometimes cruelly felt
by children. Things, that men laugh at, will make the
little heartaye, and the small temples too, of a
generous
childache with mortification. I remember a
case. It was my fate, to go the rounds among all the
schoolmasters of the country. Among others, there
was a prodigiously tall, stout fellow of the
neighbourhood
,
who, at first, took a mighty fancy to me; but,
in time, partly I do believe, to revenge himself for it,
as if I had been a voluntary accomplice in the
deception
;
he turned right about; and distinguished me, by a
double portion of austerity and unkindness. I bore both
without quailing. I had that in me then, that told me
what was wrong in another, sometimes, it may be,
before
it told me, what was wrong in myself. My soul
rose against oppressionfor he
did
oppress me. But
nothing ever affected me so sensiblyno, nothing!
and I was with him for a long timeas the following
little incident. It was hot weather. I was a restless,
incessantly moving creatureas if all my veins ran
with quicksilver. A boy put a quantity of shoemaker's
wax upon my seat, while I was away. I sat down
upon
it, without perceiving it. It melted; and, when I
arose, I lifted up the seat with me. A tremendous
ripping
and cracking followed. The girls all laughed;
and the boys hourraed. My face was all in a blaze.
The master desired to know what the matter was. His
eyes flashed fire. I already heard the cries of the
culprit
,
in anticipation.
Well, sir, said he, what is all this about?
JoJoJoe Lee, sir, said I, has been putting
shshoemaker's wax upon the seat; andIII
can't get up!
Here was a case of peril! I would'nt have been in
Joe Lee's skin, just then, for a trifle. But, alas! alas!
a joke popped into the master's head; and, as no two
things
could
be there at the same momentthough it
was no fool of a headfor
size
, I meanthough I
would'nt say that it was no head of a fooland his
wrath popped out, likelikewhatever you please,
reader.
Well, said he, I am really glad that
anything
can
keep you to your seat, Bill Adams.
As he said this, he gave the signal, by laughing
himself
,
like a good fellow. In all cases of doubt, you
know, it is the master's prerogative to laugh first; and
then, the whole school roared again, according to
custom
.
By heaven, the hot, fine tears, spirted out of my eyes,
like oil from a squeezed lemon peal. I cried for
vexation
;even
I! that would'nt have cried, if I had been
stripped naked, and lashed with vipers, till my bones
were bare.
What was the consequence of this unthinking
merriment
?
I was laughed at, on all sideshooted atand
obliged to fight. I was afraid as death of Joe Lee; but
a quarrel grew out of my fear of him, which lasted till
poor Joe was in his gravefor I was afraid to forgive
him. Nay, moreI began to nourish such a mortal
antipathy against the master, that I had some serious
designs of blowing up his desk with gunpowder; and
did, actually, begin to hate another boy, a quaker,
who sat on the same seat with me, merely because he
was a favourite of the master; wrote a better hand than
I; was permitted to study French, when I was not;
and wore shoes, while I was obliged to go barefooted.
That feeling was carried so far, that, though he was
one of the most truly inoffensive creatures that ever
liveda little older and larger than myselfthat I
waylaid him, one day; and fell upon him; and tried
hard, but in vain, to beat him soundly. He defended
himself with two stones, which he held in his hands
and dealt about him, awkwardly enough, to be sure;
but with such effect, that I was fain to abandon my
purpose.
There
is another lesson to people in authority. Why,
for the gratification of a little childish vanity, was a
boy permitted to escape, when he deserved a severe
flogging? Why was another mortified, with a joke, at
the natural expense of so much malignity and
bitterness
?
Yet, that is often done. Children are mortified
by people, as books are sometimes damned, by
reviewers
;
because they are tempted by a pun, or a joke; or
happen to have a
bloody
severe thing, unappropriated,
in their noddles.
It was my misfortune, for two winters, to be the
inmate
of another place of punishmenta sort of quaker
boarding-schoolestablished at a little rascally
country
place, called Windham, a dozen miles, or so, from
my home. Here, the chief employment of the scholars,
to the best of my recollection, was snow-balling;
whittling
pine blocks into boxes; hunting up fir-balsam, for
the mistress, who was affected with some complaint;
sliding; eating water-gruel;bread that corresponded,
exactly, with the leprosy, which is described in
Leviticus
;
being full of red and black plague spots; and cold
beans. That we read, and wrote, occasionally; and
learnt definitions
out
of the dictionarynot
in
it
cannot
be denied. But, gracious heaven!the misery and
weariness of spirit; the poverty and famine of the very
heart, that I endured
there
make me, even at this
moment
,
in my warm study, with a bright fire at my side,
feel as if I had been shipwrecked, when I was a child,
upon some desolate island. Would it be believed, that,
so scantily were we nourished, at that school; and that,
so sordid and base were the superintendents; that I
have seen three large boys, squabbling like famished
wolves, over a salt fish skin, that had been shrivelled
upon the coals? Yet, upon my word,
it is true
. And I,
myself, stood by, with my mouth watering to
participate
.
I did, by heaven and earth!
What should be expected of human beings, who have
been so abused, under the name of education? Is it
wonderful, that they recur to the period of it, as to one,
of torture and death; a season of detestable, and
unappeasable
longing? How many unnatural appetites
grew up, think you, among a school of boys, whose
aliment was so atrocious? I know not. But this I
know,that, since, while I have wandered through the
apartments of the building; and paused upon the places
of my several transgressions, thereand looked about
meI have wondered to see it, standing yet! I have
asked myself, why some of the young banditti, that
were trained in it, have not made it their lurking place,
till it wasa refuge only for the rattle-snake, and the
wild beastblackenedsmokedrivenand blasted!
How diminished the house appeared to me,
when
I last
saw it! Once, it was boundless. I had seen little that
was larger among the habitations of men. But I
returned
to it. Could it be? I asked myself. I felt as
if I could stand in the middle, and touch the four walls.
It was not that the building had grown smaller; but,
that I had grown larger.
Parents! would you make villains, or blockheads of
your children? There is one infallible method. Send
them to a country boarding school; where, it is alike
the interest of the master and the mistress, to starve and
depress them; where, what profit
they
have, is filched
out of the very food of your babes.
There was one more, and only one more
mortification
of my boyhood, which I think it worth my while
to recount. I was sent to an academy. The
preceptor
was an able man; and I was soon, of course, under
his especial malediction. Some boys were set to
speaking
pieces; and one fellow, I remember, named Cobb,
blacker than ten thousand devils, harangued the
corporation
,
about
Horora now, fair darter of the dorn
.
I never shall forget it. I was on fire with ambition.
I was sure that I could do it as well. It was only
managing
my arms like a pump handle; turning out my
toes; and keeping time with the sentences. But, alas!
I was barefooted. It would never do, to send me up,
before the worshipful trustees of an
academy
,
barefooted
.
Ah! the pang that I felt, when I saw myself alone,
all, all alone, with naked feet, among so many shoes
and stockings! My very toes, poor fellows, were
cramped, I remember, with trying to hide themselves
under my feet.
Was that judicious in my parents? No. It was
sitting
me up, a proud boy, to all my school-fellows, for
a butt to their ribaldry and slurring. No little
bitterness
did my young heart secrete, on that occasion; and
no little blood did it discharge, before I was fairly at
rest. Nay, so unrelenting was the persecution that I
experienced, that the preceptor himself flogged me,
against the established discipline of the school, because
I went barefooted; not, it is true, that he
knew
that to
be the reasonbut it was the only one; for it caused a
conspiracy against me, which resulted in a flogging;
and, if I had worn shoes and stockings, like the rest,
he would have been afraid to flog me. On
him
, I have
since been avenged, gloriouslymost gloriously! I
have met him, face to face; and he is a minister of the
gospel now; and humbled him, to the very earthwith
his own weapons, too!upon his own
ground!
I was
about to say,
dunghill
but I hate indecorum toward
the clergy.
About this time, I had a remarkable dream. At the
time, I thought little of it, after the first two or three
days; and should have forgotten it entirely, but for
certain
events, which, after a long time, brought it fresh
to my recollection, with a frightful vivacity. I am no
believer in dreams. I have no regard for such as do
believe in them. I have never been troubled, or
alarmed
,
by any other, in the whole course of my life;
although
I have twice met with strange, startling, and
unexpected confirmations of themone of which, struck
me like a flash of lightningwhen I saw Emma, with
my boy at her breast, once, at a window;and I have
always reasoned in this way, concerning them. Are
they sent to us of God?then are they meant for our
good. But how are they ever for our good, where they
are so mysterious, that they never serve as a warning;
nor teach us what to avoid; nor rebuke us for what we
have done; but merely trouble our senses for a little
timeare forgottenand never remembered again,
till some event, to which they
seem
, when it has
occurred
,
to have had some reference, has brought them
anew to our recollectionwith a thousand imaginary,
or aggravated particulars, to alarm us; when the evil,
whatever it may be, has been done. So have I
reasoned
.
But let me tell this dreamfirst remarking, that
it could not have been made up, and compounded of
any previous ideas, or experience, in my mind; for I
had no ideahad never read ofthought ofseen
nor heard ofanything thing like what I dreamed of.
I dreamed that I was walking out, from a large city,
on a solitary pleasant walk, by myself; that, after a
K
time, I came in sight of a noble looking housealmost
princely in its materialsstanding alone, in a bleak
placethat had been enclosed by a walland looking,
even to the old, stately trees about, as if it were
abandoned
of all the world; that a strange curiosity beset
me, to approach it; that I yielded, and went up to
it; that I took hold of the great door, and shook it, till
the dust rattled down within it, and the noise echoed
through all the deserted chambers; and that I thrust
open the door, and entered, without any feeling of
shame or apprehension; and that I never left the house,
until I had ransacked every apartment of it. It looked
as if it had been suddenly left; and, probably, at night;
for, in every room, I found furniture in disorder;
candlesticks
,
or lamps, upon the table or mantle-piece,
entirely
burnt out. In some cases, the snuff was very
long; and, in two, the wax had melted, (I had
never seen a wax candle, at that time,) and run down
upon the carpet. In one room, was a table with cards
lying on itall covered with dustand glasses, with
a red sediment in them. At the landing of one of the
stairs, too, I found a lamp upset; and a dark stain
upon
the marble, where the oil had run out; and, in the
hall, a candle, that had either been thrown down, or
dropped, in great haste or terrour; for it was broken,
and had burnt a small hole into the straw carpet. I
examined all these things, I remember, with painful
anxiety;calledand shouted;but no sound came
back to me, except the echo of my own voice; and the
flapping of large crimson curtains, rotting at the
windows
;
and the loose canvass, that was falling out of the
frames, of two or three fine old pictures, in the great
hallwhich were discoloured and mouldy, with the
mildew of the place. At last, I thought, that I came
away, chilled to the heartvery sorrowful; and
wondering
why the people had left the housewhen, and
why, it had been left so long, with all its rich furniture,
to the spoiler, and the midnight robber.
The dream made a strange impression upon me, at
the time; not that it frightened, or disturbed mebut
it had been so astonishingly like reality; and so little
like a dream; for, in all my other dreams, even the
most vivid and frightful, there has been a resemblance
to something I had seen, or talked of, or thought of,
beforeand great incoherency; but here, there was
nothing
at all of it. It was all, for a week after, like the
recollection of something that had
really
happened to
me; and, I verily believe, that, if I had ever lived near
a large city, at the time, I should not have been
satisfied
,
till I had explored all the couhtry about; nay, as
it was, I would start, sometimes, and feel troubled for
a moment, in trying to separate parts of that dream,
from parts of my actual experience. However, it
passed
over, and was forgotten; and never would have been
remembered, I dare say, but for what happened many
a day afterward.
CHAPTER VI.
Man's Nature....Mine....Duelling....Cowardice...Guilt...First
battle....Am beaten....Education....Leister....Ingratitude of
children...Why....Encounters...Vengeance...Reflections...
Reformation...Magnanimity...Humbled...Cowardice....Effect
of self-possession...No longer quarrelsome...Jim Lee...
Desperate
affair...Strength...Comfort of a warm study.
Man
is, naturally, so like a beast of prey, in his
appetite
and disposition, that nothing is wanted to
develop
all the worst faculties of cowardice and cruelty,
but a little too much severity in training hima little
more uninterrupted negligenceor a little more
cruelty
.
I was born a coward. All men are born so. By this
I mean, that I would shun danger, if I could; and
submit
to insult privatelynay, publickly, till it became
insupportable, on account of its publicity. Then, like
other men, I made battle; or, rather, like other boys;
for I was the merest child, when the unrebuked,
unrebukable
spirit first arose, like a giant, within me; and
struck down all the base and pusillanimous feeling of
my heart, for a time. Go with me. It will do you good.
I was born a coward; but I did not like to have it
known. Therefore, I affected to be quarrelsome;
taking
care, however, not to quarrel with them that I was
afraid of. Nor would I always choose the weaker or
the smaller; for there was that in the eyes of many a
smaller boy, which prevented me from striking him,
while I could read impunity and invitation, in the eyes
of many a larger one, than myself. With the latter,
therefore, I quarrelled. Them, I bullied; but never did
I meddle with the former, but twiceand once, I got
soundly flogged for it; and the second time, I narrowly
escaped. But I was never beatennever, in all my
lifeby a larger boy, or a larger man. I know not
why; but, to this day, I had rather quarrel with a
larger
,
than a smaller man. Perhaps, it is, because it would
be no credit to me, to prevail over the latter; and no
disgrace, to be conquered by the former. But, be that
as it may, I took care, early, not to pick a quarrel with
one, that I did not
know
would bear it. What is more
common? A man is no sooner known for a coward,
than every poltron in society, is treading upon his
heels. Horsewhip a fellow; or, let it be once known,
that he will take it patiently; or, has refused to fight;
and he is sure to be challenged, or spurned at, on all
sides. What a catastrophe may sometimes happen, if
the challenge, against all probability, should be
accepted
!
Nothing but management, or a miracle, can save
them both, then; unless some such understanding could
be had, as I have known. A duel was got up, once, in
this way. Two young men gave each other the lie,
before
ladies!
They met. They would meet. No
apology
none!
would be given, or taken. A copper
was turned. One had the first fire. The handkerchief
was dropped. His pistol went off(perhaps under an
agreement
not to hit
an agreement, by the way, which
is generally superfluous among green horns, where the
disposition is ever so good)the other was discharged
in the air, as a matter of course. The seconds
interfered
.
The thing was made up. The parties rode
home in the same carriage, together. People
talked;
but what o' that? It is no such wonderful thing, that
one
ball should miss; and how was it possible to fire a
second, when your adversary let off
his
pistol in the
air?
The plan threatened to become fashionable. The
only
difficulty was, that the joke was sometimes carried
too far. More than one couple have fired at each other,
since, for a whole afternoon, without hitting. That is
quite too bad.
A few anecdotes will suffice, to show the growth of
a braver spirit; by braver, I mean a more long-sighted
and calculating onenot a more fearless one. For,
when I have stood, and measured rapiers with my
antagonist
nay,
when on one occasion, I drove a rough
sword through and through himtill the hilt struck
his breastI was literally delirious with terrour;
but, then, he had struck meand I should have
K 2
gone mad, for ever, if I had not slain him. Yes, it was
fear
a base and dastardly fearthatno matter. I
pray God to forgive me. But, I feel no assurance of
his forgivenessterrible as was the provocation
sudden
as was the retribution. I am not at rest,
here
.
Nonor ever shall be, if these convulsive shudderings
are to be relied on, as the true indicia of guilt. But, to
my story.
There was a small boy, the terrour of the whole
school, who had gone on with his imposition and
tyranny
over me, till I could bear it no longer. I struck
him. I was pale as death, the boys told me, when I
did itand I shook all over, I remember well. We
fought in a hot day, nearly all the afternoon. I was
covered with bloodfrom head to foot; but it was all
his
bloodnot my own; and when I had gone to bed,
I wondered to find myself alive. I was not even hurt.
I began to feel my own strength from that moment; to
remember my forbearance and collectedness. Thrice
had I desisted from the battle, in pity and compassion;
yet, thrice had the desperate boy renewed it, till it was
too much for human patience; and I left him, covered
with sweat, and dust, and gore; and lying in the
publick
highway. Yet, I was never rightly satisfied with
myself. He was too much smaller than Itwo or three
years older, to be surebut that was no comfort to
me.
The next day, his brother met meand he beat me
cruelly, as he thought, till I bawled out. He was much
larger than Itwice my size, and half as old again.
Yet, I was not
satisfied
. I had suffered myself to cry;
and I was ashamed of it. My head throbbed out loud
for an opportunity of revengefor another trial. It
cameyears and years afterward. We met, by chance.
He was a man grown. We were at a bowling alley;
we played together; drank together; and were about
coming away together. He had forgotten the old
affair
;
but I had not. I knew little of arms, then; and,
had I known more, I should have scorned to use them.
It would not have satisfied the craving of my spirit. I
had bellowed, lustily, when I had been beaten; and I
knew that I could not sleep quietly in my grave,
unless
I retaliatedunless I heard him bellowing; or,
sobbing
at least,man as he was.
I took him on one side; far. very far, from all human
help. I turned upon him. Prepare yourself, said I,
through my set teeththe boat is waiting; and only
one of us will go in it. I threw off my coat and
cravat
,
as I said this; and he saw, by my looks, I imagine,
that it was no time for parleying. To it, we went, on
the dry, hard beach, under the great vaulted rocksin
a solitude so profound, that our breathing and panting
could be heard a rod.
He fought me
handsomely;
but I left him upon the
ground. I was satisfied. I had heard him gasp for
breath; and cry out, with his mouth bloodyin a
strangling cryfor mercy, and for assistance. It was
nearly a twelvemonth, before that man recovered: nay,
it may befor he is since deadthatbut no; I will
not trouble myself, any more, with so foolish a thought.
There is weight enough upon me nowmen
will
spit
blood.
Not long after thisI speak of the time when I was
a boyI was struck by a paltry little fellow, whom I
had been lording it over, with impunity, for months.
A man was looking on; and I did not even return the
blow. To this hour, I have not forgiven myself; or
accounted to myself, satisfactorily, for it. If we meet
and meet, we shallthough our situations in life are
entirely differentI shall return that blow. I care not
for the consequences. There is an unquiet thought,
just
here
, that eats, and eatsand will never lie down,
till I am quit with that man. I dare not forgive him.
I have not confidence enough in my own courage, to
do it. If I did forgive him, I know that it would be
not magnanimityno!but
cowardice
.
How strangely compounded are we. I could have
crushed that boy. Yet, so thunderstruck was I, at the
suddenness, and unexpectedness of his rebellion, that I
had'nt the power to lift my arm. Yet, had a man
struck me, at the same time, in the same place, I should
have returned it, or died.
Nor was that the only time. On
three
other
occasions
of my life, have I received a blow, without
returning
it. By heaven! it were better for them that
gave it, each time, that I had let out their blood upon
the spot! This it is, that makes me quake with a
mortal
coldness, at the mention of such an indignity; this
it is, that hath made my sleep a trial to me, for years;
covered my stately forehead with sweat, even in the
arms of my wifethis!and many years have
happened
,
very manyand I was a mere boy,
when
it
happened
yet
I shall never sleep soundly, until I have
returned blow for blow, upon the whole three, or upon
their posterity. They were given me by cowards, like
myself, it is true; but no matter for that. They ought
to have been returned; if not with the hand, at least,
with a knife. How could I look my boy in the face,
else? How often have I told him, when I was a
practical
fatherhow often?never to take a blow?
never
!
and
that, if he did, though it were from a giant,
without returning it, I would renounce himcut him off
---abandon him---
for ever and ever!
And so I would.
I have endeavoured to make him feel that abhorrence
of a coward, which children feel, instinctly, for loathsome
reptiles---obscene and detestable creatures! How then,
can
I bear to---God!---do I ask this now?---now, when
my child is in his grave? No, no. How
could
I bear
it, I mean?
He was a brave little fellow. I could have made
anything of him. I once put him upon a high place;
and went away off, to a great distance, and bade him
jump into my arms. He was afraid. He trembled.---
He even began to cry---braced himself against the wall,
with all his might; and squalled, like a little devil. I
tried him again. There was no amendment. You are
a
coward
, said I, in putting him down. He had never
heard the word before. He knew not what the word
meant. As a word, it gave him no trouble. He
affected
to disregard it. He tried, by ten thousand playful,
innocent, endearing tricks, to make me forget my
seriousness
;
but all in vain; for I knew what it was to be
a coward---to have your heart full of cowardly blood.
I knew that it would lead to cruelty, deceit, and death.
Yea, it was all in vain. That was my
first
lesson; and
I meant that it should be effectual. Ah! how anxious I
felt. I cannot describe it. It is impossible. None
but a parent can understand me. Before I was a
father
,
I thought that I had a full conception of a father's
feeling. I thought of mine own, toward
my
parents.
Gracious heaven! how little we can judge by such a
method! No child ever loved a parent, as the parent
loved him. It cannot be. We attach ourselves more
tenderly to them, that are helpless and dependant upon
us, than they do to us. Our children forget us; wander
away from us; contract new alliances; and leave us,
even in our desolation, alone, and away from all help,
in our piteous old age; with no companion but our
infirmities
,
and our recollection of their unkindness.---
Nay, a man that has gone through fire and water to
save another, will love
him
, more than he will be loved
in return. Why is this? Is it to encourage man to
acts of benevolence, heroism, and benignity? It is.---
There is something very delightful in
conferring
a
favour
;
and it should be
more
delightful than receiving
one; or, else, we should always be looking, not to
give
,
but to
receive
. Yea, it is wisely and beneficently
ordained
.
And so too, with parents and children. Where
should it stop, the current of affection? How would it
ever reach the children, plenteously, if it ran upward
to the fountain; if it were not sparingly let out; or,
altogether
detained, in the reservoir of the
child's
heart,
until
he
became a parent?
We can only love with all our heart and soul. At
first, we so love our parents; then, our companion for
life, appears to divide that love; next, our
only
child
comes in for a part; and so, our love continues to
apportion
itself to the demand, like wealth. It is the real
opulence of the heart, indeed; and the portion of each
that we love, must be diminished, as the number
increases
.
Is it not wise, then, that the heart of a child
should cease to yearn so tenderly toward a parent, when
it hath children of its own? It is; for the helpless,
troublesome, sweet creatures, have need of
all
a
parent's
heart; a continual ecstacy of tenderness, to be
kept alive, for a single year. Another essay! by
heaven
!
Forgive me, reader---I did'nt intend it.
Let me return to my child. I had called him a
coward
,
and he had gone to his play, with an air, that made
my wife laugh at me and my theory, in spite of her
veneration
for both. After a while, he came to meput
his little arms about my neckbut, I refused to return
his caressand put him down, coldly, repeating the
words
you are a coward
.
He went the more vehemently to his playbut I
observed
,
thank God for it!while I sat reading, that he
would, now and then, stop short, in the mischief
that employed him; drop whatever he had in his hand,
at the timeand sit motionless, for a while, as if
something
troubled him.
O, I could have knelt down upon the spot; and
thanked
my Maker, in an agony of gratitudethat all my
dreaming, and all my theories, were about to be
realized
.
He came to me again. He was more serious. I
persisted
,
however, in spite of his mother's beautiful eyes;
and put him from me; but, he went no more to his play.
No.I sat and watched him, without letting him see
me. I observed every movement of his face; forgive
me, if I dwell a little, on the character of that boyare
you a parent?you cannot complain. Are you not?
wait till you are; and you will then say, with the
tears in your eyes, that you could listen for ever, to a
parent
,
when his own child was the theme.
I had business the next morning, that took me away,
into the country, for a whole week.
The moment that I alighted at the gateLeister (for
that was the name of my boy,) ran to me, and put both of
his hands eagerly into mine. I saw that he wanted to
say somethingand I waited for him to speak.
I'll
jump, father
said he, firmly. The tears were in his
eyes. I could have hugged the little rascal to my heart;
but, I dared notindeed, I
dared
not, till the whole
trial should be over. It might be hazarding
little
but it was my duty to hazard
nothing
. I led him to the
same place. I went further off, than before. I saw his
knees tremble. I saw his little face change colour.
To him, it was terrible; to me, nothing; for I knew that
I could catch him. He prepared himselfhe held
his breathhe shut his eyesand leaped! I caught him
and kissed himI sobbed aloudfor my heart ran
over.
Now, father
, said he, as soon as he could get
his breath,
now, father, be I a toward?
He could
not even pronounce the word; but, he never forgot it;
and, on his death bed, it would have given him
convulsions
;
it would have strangled him, to have called him
coward.
Let me return.Three times had I been struck,
before
I resolved never to be struck again, without
returning
it; once, by a fellow, who came up, deliberately,
in front of me, (I was a little chap, and alone; and he
was backed by a score of boys, beside being much
larger than I)and gave me the blow in my face and
eyes. I had nearly met him, once afterwardand on
a desolate island. He had a narrow escape. May it
happen again! Though we should both be
shipwrecked
upon itthe island would never be desolate again,
if a dead man, or a spirit, could prevent it.
The next was a similar case. I was in the country,
dressed a little better than my companions; and about
as haughty and insolent a little jackanapes, I dare say,
as ever lived. A great bully was put up to quarrelling
with me. He succeededstruck meand I left him in
peace. YesI cannot deny it. Ah, heaven! what
would I have given then, for the brave, desperate heart,
of some boys that I have known.
There was another caseanother, that I had
forgotten
but
yet,
he
is dead. He was a man grown, too
and I a child. I have never forgiven him, yet; but I
think it probable that I
shall
, when next we meetif I
am permitted
first
to get a blow at him. We were in
different sleighsand he ran me down, at the rate of
about sixteen knots.
StayI remember another;it was a base, cowardly
affair. It was dark; and I was pursued by a mob of
boyssome one of whom, gave me a blow upon my back
as I had turned at last, to go away, thinking it all
over. On him, if he be the right one, I have been
avenged
.
We have stood upon the deck of a vessel together
and I have branded him there, leisurely, in a loud
voice, for a
coward
, before them that knew him and me.
He submitted, patiently; and well, I am sure, was it for
him, that he
did;
for, if we had once crossed our hangers, I
would have fed the sharks with him, from where I stood,
for, afraid of myselfI have learnt every system of
defence
and
can wield any weapon, like a master.
These things lie, like hot lead upon my heart. I
cannot forget them. I would not; and, although, on
more occasions than one, I have behaved like a
man
,
since; where the peril was ten thousand times greater;
yet, I am not, and never shall be, reconciled to the
unutterable
dishonour, that an unreturned blowgiven
before I was ten years of age too, has left upon my
memory.
Incidents, such as these, trivial as they may appear,
are sufficient to establish the character of any man.
I feel them within me, like the symptoms of
insurrection
,within
a beleagued province. I would be
able to look my children in
the face
, hereafter, when
I am inculcating my greatest lesson; and hear them
say, without flinching, father, did
you
never receive a
blow
never!
without returning
it?
Sir---I would
give my right hand---this! with which I now hold my
pen, to be able to answer NO.NEVER!
Since these early days of my humiliation, I have
learnt every species of defence; with the sword and
without it---and may venture to say, I think, without
hazard, that there are few men capable of standing
before me, with, or without a weapon, for ten minutes.
And what is the consequence? Am I more quarrelsome?
No, indeed. I can endure many things, now; and
forgive
many things, now, that I would have died to
avenge, a few years ago. And why is this? It is
because
I feel a confidence in myself. I know, now, that
it is not
fear
which influences me, when I avoid a
quarrel
;
and, what is better, other people know it too.
There was a time, when I could not
forgive;
when I
could
not
be magnanimous; for, although I was very
strong and stately, to appearance; yet, I had no
confidence
at all, in my own courage. The strong and
brave are always less petulant and waspish, than the
weak and cowardly; and the skilful, are emphatically
the strong. It is difficult for any man to avoid a
quarrel
,
when he knows that the world will attribute it to
fear
---nor, is there any virtue in such forbearance. Yet
how much
more
difficult it is to avoid one, where
he,
himself
, is doubtful of his own motive; or, where he
knows
that it is fear. Have you never endured some
insult, which made your blood tingle, and your ears
ring afterward, when you thought of it? You have.
And what did you determine on? Was it not, to---
never endure another?
I have now come to a part of my life, that gives me
pleasure. I rise. I walk the room. I strive to
subdue
the brave, high tumult of my arteries. I cannot.
What inexplicable sympathy is this? Why does my
forehead redden? Why are the big veins upon my
hand swollen? My teeth set? My breathing, short
and violent? A thought; a single thought, hath done
it. Years have rolled over me. I am at peace with
all the world, unhappy and alone; willing to forgive,
and be forgiven; yet, at the mere thought, of two or
three events, that have happened to me, many a year
ago,--all the channels of life are distended; and the
blood is racing and ringing through them, just as it did,
when I struck the first blow, that I ever gave, coolly
and deliberately; and, by the God that made me! I felt
like the young leopard, after his first battle. It is
strange! wouderful! but so vivid, so burning and
distinct
are all these tingling emotions now, that, I can
hardly persuade myself, that they are not the
substantial
evidences of recent insult and wrath---deadly and
triumphant wrath.
I had been wronged by a school-fellow; deliberately,
cruelly wronged. He was very formidable to me; and
the terrour of the whole school. I was in bed; and I
lay and thought of the consequences; and at last, I came
to the conclusion, that it was better to be whipped once,
L
handsomely, by him, than to submit to such continual
goading. At least, I could give him some trouble, I
was sure; and
that
might make him more heedful, for
the future. But, when should it be? It was no very
pleasant subject of reflection; for, I was pretty sure,
whatever should be the result, of being flogged by my
master, at school; and by my uncle, at home;but, my
resolution was taken. I met him; struck him; and we
were torn asunder, with the greatest difficulty. I was
amazed at myself. I was unhurt, again. I had not
felt a blow. It is a remarkable fact, however, that in
all my battles, I was never injured, in any degree, but
once.
From that time, I was avoided by all the boys of an
overbearing temper; and loved by the quiet and feeble.
I was proud of it. A sense of justice sprang up in
my heart. I stood out as their champion; and, from
that hour to this, coward as I am!have I never pulled
down my colours!
I even became magnanimous. I felt my strength
had more confidence in myself; a high reputation; and
I was unwilling to hazard it. In time, I should have
become a good natured boy; but, it was my fate to be
sent away, where a new reputation was to be gained
by new trials and new conflicts. But, I had already,
had many a scuffle; and three or four tough encountery
that I have not mentioned.
But, all would'nt do.I had got above my old school
fellows; and they were willing to humble me. For this
purpose, they associated together, with two or three
bullies, and hunted me, if I ventured out, of an evening
from pillar to post; but, will it be believed, strong as
they were, and exasperated to madness, as they really
werethey never could find one of their number, with
sufficient hardihood to front me. Nay, from that time
to this, I have never seen that living creature, who
dared to strike me, or who
could
strike meif he had
time to see my face. Stout men have trembled before
itmen, that have held at the time, a levelled pistol at
my heart. I learnt the use of one
look
, among these
boysone, which I never used, but in mortal
extremity
;
and never used in vain! No one could believe in
its powerfor, it has been a matter of life and death
to me. Once, have I seen the instrument of death, drop
from the hand of my deadliest foe, when he met it. It
is the simple truth, I assure you, that I tell. I am
telling
no story, for the amusement of women and children
it is only a straight forward tale, of what has
actually
happened, to a living manto myself; and, I have
no motive in telling it, but the hope of being useful; not
only to men, but to women and childrenout of whom,
men
are made; and of whom, we take less care, than
of our young colts, and brood mares, to prevent any
dilution of the blood.
I learnt, early in these encounters, that, whatever
is unusual, is intimidating. I saw that others, when
they were afraid, were sneaking and patient; or noisy
and loud. I took another course. I stood
naturally
before
themcalmhaughtyscornfulbut,
silent as
death
. They knew not what to expect. Perhaps they
were afraid of a weaponfor, I believe that it would
disturb
me
and awe me, or any other man, down to
the earthto see a creature standing unmoved as I
have beenwith fire and death at his very heart. I
should tremble to look on. I should be inclined to think
that he had some resource, in steel or ballsome defence
and that his assailant was in greater peril than he.
That manner has been common to me since; and will
be, until I stand where they that know me, can see my
heart dissolving with fear, while my countenance will
remain immovable.
At another timeI was yet a boyI happened to be
on a visit in the country, to a grand-father. In the
neighbourhood, was a rude, quarrelsome fellow;
fearless
,
overbearing, and cruel. He encountered me, one
day, when I was with a cousin of mine; affronted me;
and dared me up the hill, where he was. I accepted
the challenge, instantly, notwithstanding all the
remonstrances
of my cousin; for, I felt that a severe
whipping
would be more tolerable to
me
, than my own
feeling, if I should go to bed that night, without
having
upheld myself in my own opinion. The boy was
alarmingly insolent; and much larger than I. But, as
I approached, he retreated, and went on higher ground;
repeating his challenge, all the way. It was now my
turn. I saw that he was now afraid of me. My
readiness had disconcerted him. I was a stranger; and,
being so much smaller than he, what could give me
such confidence? Something, he was sure, that I
knew, and had
experienced
the efficacy of; some strange
superiority, that was a secret to him. It was then my
turn to crow; but, I had more discretion than boys in
general, I neither hallooed, nor bawled; I merely told
him, with a firm voice, and a steady countenance, what
to me, was the bitterest word in all our language
that he was a
coward;
and left him.
This event raised me, abundantly, in the estimation
of my cousin. It was a good lesson to him; and no
unprofitable
one to me. Our worst pain is that of
of terrour. the reality is never so cruel, as are our
anticipations. Lo! how I reasonand yet, here I am;
afraid of deatheven
now
, as no woman was ever
afraid of itin spite of all that I can say, or do!Well
my confidence in myself, grew greater and greater,
every day. I wrestled; and ran; and leaped; and found
no competitors. Why, then, should I be quarrelsome?
Why had I been so? Merely, because, in my heart, I
felt that I was a coward; merely, because I was
afraid
to be meek and forgiving; for, many and many a time,
had I sought a quarrel, solely because I was in doubt,
whether, if I refrained, it would be from gentleness,
magnanimity
,
or cowardice. That it should be from the
latter, was often so terrible to me, that I have
provoked
,
wantonly and deliberately, a feud with some other
boy, merely because he was generally formidable.
How often will this happen, in society! Some
ruffian
,
of established reputation, for the murders that he
hath committed, with sword or pistol, puts upon you,
either from carelessness or accident, an equivocal
affront
;
what
can
you do?
You
, who are unknown,
untried
?You
must
fight him. There is nothing else
left to you. You can never
take
an apology; and still
less,
offer
one,
to such a man
. The world would say
that you were afraid, if you did; no matter, whether
you were right or wrongand the world would
undoubtedly
be right.
Coward
!go to your own roomkneel down by
your bed side!place your locked hands upon the
Bible
;
and pray to God, for a little steadiness. Do that
and you are panoplied in steel. No blade can touch
you. No ball can reach you. You bear a charmed
life. Let your deportment be that of a manserene
unchangeable; and the time will soon come,
coward
, that
you are, when a man would sooner thrust his right arm,
up to the shoulder in molten iron, than raise it against
you.
If you be assailed, defend yourself. Leave the
agressor
,
if it must be so, dead at your feetas a warning
to others; and a rebuke to the law
which, I must say,
is no protection, under dishonour;
but do not fight him,
because you have no reputation in blood. Do not
fight him, because you are a coward; or, because he is
not
a cowardor because you
dare not refuse to fight
him
.
Not long after this, I was put to a yet more severe
trial. The same deportment carried me through it,
unharmed. I had been threatened by a boy, who was
the terrour of the town. I was told of it, by another,
just when the former was in sight. I went,
immediately
,
over the street, to the place where he stood, and
bought some apples. His heart failed him. He never
opened his mouth. But, had I shown any symptom of
fear, I had been broken down upon the spot. These
were but experiments; but they were constantly
recurring
;
and went a great way, toward making me
familiar
with men. I carried them too far sometimes; and,
on one occasion, I baited a brutal fellow, of more than
twice my size, till he maddened in thinking of it, and
waylaid me, with a troop of boys, when I was coming
out of the water, cold and averse---more so, than I ever
recollect in my life, before, to a squabble. He had
given
out that he meant to make an example of me; that
he would compel me to kneel down, and ask his
pardon
.
I but spoke a few words---nay, I believe that I
did say, that I begged his pardon; but I did it with a
L 2
laugh, and standing; and he was glad enough to take it
in any way, to find an excuse for backing out. I could
see
that;
and so the matter ended.
But I had now become a boy of some notoriety. I was
no longer quarrelsomethat is. I never
sought
a
quarrel
;
but it was pretty well understood that I was quick
as lightning in my temper; and never
avoided
a
quarrel
,
when it came in my way.
In all towns, there are apt to be local jealousies,
conspiracies
,
and associations. There were some in mine.
They were distinguished by the name of
upper-enders,
lower-enders
, and
middle-enders
. Leaders were chosen,
and some bloody affairs took place. I was rather on
neutral groundand, as neutrals generally
are
,
spoiled
and buffetted by both parties--by both belligerants, I
could say. I could bear it no longer. I collected a
number of boys, one evening, to scour the streets---and
give battle to anybody and everybody, who should not
answer to our satisfaction, when the countersign was
called for. I was a sort of chief, as if by common
assent
with
a little usurpation. We had not gone far,
when, lo! the Philistines were upon us! I had some
laughable notions of chivalry; and, full of stories, that I
had recently read, I agreed to meet the Goliah of
the opposite host, in single combat. We met; and it
was
there
, that I was very severely hurt, for the only
time in my life, on such an occasion; but I beat my
antagonist
,
till he bawled out for a
pole!
a
pole!
swearing
that he would only fight me
across
a
pole
. While
we were arranging matters; and I was beginning to
recoverfrom a confounded knock under my right ear,
that he had given me, we were separated.
We met, afterward; and I felt no little secret
satisfaction
,
when I found out who he wasand what; and
that he had no disposition to renew the battle. He
carried twice my weight of
metal;
but he was, literally,
beaten black and blue, before he had time to get his
breath.
Every day, I could perceive that the boys treated
me with more respect: and, although I was bitterly
scolded at home and abroad, by my father, and my
master; and evenby Elizabeth herselfand by
Hammond
,
the dwarfof whom, more by and bynothing
could avail to make me leave off the practice of
defending
myselfas it is known to be lawful, to do, in an
enemy's country, by
offending
others.
Still there were two or threee persons, of whom I
had a constitutional dread; among them was a smart,
spirited fellow, with whom I had fought, when quite a
child, at least one hundred times; and, always, without
gaining an inch. There were few, that dared to touch him.
For years, he had not quarrelled with anybody. His
reputation was a shield to him. He grew arrogant
insupportably so. Everybody observed it; but nobody
dared to undertake his chastisement. We were on
the best termsvery intimate; and perpetually
together
.
Our masters had both failed in business, about
the same time; and we were thrown out of employment.
Every afternoon, we were together, pitching coppers;
drawing lots; or cutting cards; or playing nine pins
for porter or cider;we were about sixteen or
seventeen
,
I should supposehe, about a year the older. I had
put up with a good deal from him, before that dayfor
it had never entered my head to dispute, seriously, with
him, for dominion; but the time had now come.
I happened to have a new coathow, heaven knows!
whether by theft, charity, contribution, or how. It was
very beautiful, although second handedand the whole
town knew of it; the first too, that I had ever worn,
with bright buttons. I was not a little proud of it;
and he was not a little envious. I am sure.
We had some scuffling together, and I knocked off
his hat. He attempted, again and again, to retaliate;
and, at last, tore the
lappet
of my coat. I grew serious
immediately; and told him not to persevere; but he did
not heed me. He had often seen me
as
serious,
before
,
but never so determined.
If you make the attempt again, Jim, said I, I
shall strike you. I said itbut I did not mean it.
I was not brave enough for that.
Will you, said he; and, immediately after, he made
the attempt; and received a blow from me, that sent him,
staggering, against the wall. It was some minutes before
he fully recovered; I was perfectly astonished at myself;
and he seemed like one doubtful of his own senses
what!to be struck by
me:
it was incredible. He
approached me, soon afterjust as if nothing had
happened
and,
before I was aware of it, struck me, two or
three light, swift blows, in quick succession. They
did not hurt methey only jarred my blood a little; but
they were spitefully given. At the same time, he
added
Go
down with me, behind that building, (
pointing
to a large warehouse, on the wharf, below,) and
I will flog you.
With all my heart! said Iand rose to follow him.
A
fight!
a
fight!
shouted the boys.
I followed him; but, when we had arrived there, he
seemed to think it too publick a place; and, as it was
then quite too late for trifting, we agreed to walk on
together, toward the
Backfields
, until the boys were
weary of following us; or, to turn upon them, together,
and beat them back; but our countenances were
sufficient
,
when we faced them. They looked at us; and had
not the hardihood to track us, a single step further.
We soon found a spot fitted for the battle. It was
nearly a mile from the place, where our wrath had been
kindled. We had walked along, side by side, in silence,
the memory of our ancient friendship, tugging at our
heartsas yet, unwilling to be dislodged. It was a
memorable spot to me. Near it, I had been nearly
skinned alive once, by one of my dear uncles;the
church was nigh at handand a burying ground too,
for ought that I knew. It was a hot day; and, lest
people might see us, we descended into a clay pitand
stripped. I gave the first blow; it was a timid one
and we fought till both were entirely exhausted. We
renewed the battle. I pressed upon him, till he fell;
and then saw I, that he was afraid of meyes,
afraid!
for he lay upon his back, and kicked at me, with his feet,
as if it had been
possible
for me to strike him, while he
was down. I waited till he was up. He next gave me
a bloody nose; and he waited, in his turn for metill I
had gone down to the water, and washed my face, and
returned to the field. Soon after that, I gave him a
black eye; or rather, a blow, which, he thought, would
produce one; but it did not, and I waited till he could
see, before I struck him again. Thus we fought
till we could scarcely draw breath. We stood and
panted, before each other, with our mouths open, and
bloody; and without the power to strike a blow, like
two wild beasts, that have wrestled their hearts away.
My object was achieved. I had conquerednot
that I had whipped
him;
for
that
I did not pretend to
dothat was not what I had gone down forbut
I had conquered my own fear of him; and given him an
opportunity to whip me, as he had threatened; and he had
been unable to do it. Therefore, had I
conquered;
for I
had defeated him in his design.
We returned together; and, the last words, that he
said to me, when we parted, were, a threat to strike me
again, the first time that we should meet.
If you please, said I, coldly, I shall give you an
opportunity, to night.
I did, as I promisedI gave him the opportunity;
but he never availed himself of it. He dared not. We
became fast friends; and are so, to this hour; and I would
not cower with him at my side, against any two men
that might happen to meet us, in this worldalthough
now, I could beat the breath out of his body in ten
minutesand whip half a dozen more, just like him,
one after the otherin consequence of my skill and
science.
Not long after this, I was in a strange place, alone,
but very confident of my power. I was grossly
insulted
.
I was too far from the man to knock him down;
and I was afraid that my wrath would get cool, if I
did not punish him upon the spot. He was then
surrounded
by three others, two of whom were his
brothers
.
More than an hour had passed, ere I had the
opportunity that I wished. He slept in the next room
to meat a tavern. I heard him go inI knew his
voice; and my bed shook under his tread. I waited
till all was still as death in the house. I trembled.
My heart collapsed. I had pistols, and a dirkI took
them out of my trunk, loaded thembut God stayed
my hand. And yet, I could not forgive the insult. I
went to bed; and there lay, the sweat distilling out of
my very bones and heart, it did appear to me. A deep
sleep fell upon me, a troubled dream. I could endure
it no longer. I arose. There was a cold moonlight
abroadthe streets were terribly still; and the long
yard; and distant garden, back of the house, full of old
treeswere silent, like a subterranean wood, tenanted
only by apparitions. Perhaps, my own thought
frightened
me; but, I do declare that, never,
never
before, nor
since, have I felt such a supernatural awe upon my
spirit, as I did that night, while I was endeavoring to
recal my dream, and the circumstances of the evening.
It appeared to me that I was the only living creature,
perhaps, upon the whole earth. How could I know that
my insulter was alive? I trembled; but, when I would
have put my hands into my bosom, I found that I had
pistols in themmy fingers seemed to have grown to
them. I could not, for some time, so rigid were the
muscles, disengage them; but I succeeded at last, and
the tearshot, scalding tears, fell into the pan as I
opened it, and saw all the preparation of death so
complete
.
When had it been made? By whom? By
myself
,
or my evil spiritthe old Tempter, while I was
sleeping, or deliriousayeand I had been in bed
with them, loadedslept with themupon
them!
My
blood thrilled. My dream came to mea new
horrour
shook me. I dreamt that I had stabbed a man.
Might it not be, if I had done so much, unconsciously,
that I might have done more. Who could say that I
had not consummated the crime that my heart had
meditated
,
and my hands had begun. I tried the barrels
with a shaking arm. They were loaded. But the
dirk. I hurried to the table where I had left it when
I went to bed. It was gone. I searched for itand
found itgracious God!my dream flashed upon me all
at onceI now remembered that I had dreamed of using
it. I grew sick and faint. I staggered to itIt was
driven, up to the cross, through the back of a chair at
my side. I plucked it out, in a moment of
desperation
and,
it was several minutes, before I could bring
myself to believe that the point was not bloodyso
horribly vivid and distinct had been my dreamand
such unutterable terrour had I felt. I sat downI
clasped my head in my hands; and thought it all over.
What had saved me? what good angel had turned the
dagger against the chair, instead of a human heart
my own heart perhaps?These were alarming thughts
but they kept me from doing vengeance; and I knelt
down, and thanked the Almighty, from the bottom of
my heart, that he had suffered me to be angry and sin
not. I even forgave my enemy, and prayed for him.
How refreshing, how ennobling are such prayers. I
went to bedI sleptI, who had not slept for years--
like an infant, upon the bosom of its own mother.
When I awoke, the whole of the past night came to me
again, like a long, troubled, and distracted dream. I
looked for the dagger and pistols; and it was not till
then, that I was fully sensible of my escape. I
discharged
them from the window. We met at breakfast.
the scoundrel was rude and insolent again to me. I
sat near him. I would have given all that I was worth,
to have been away. I bore it, till I could bear it no
longer. I pushed away my cup. I leaned forward. The
people saw me; and their faces changed--and they
were all silent. Sir, said I, looking him steadily
in his face, you are a bully; a scoundrel; a liar; and a
coward. That you are a bully, no man would doubt.
That you are a coward, is evident, from your conduct
toward two or three smaller men than yourself. That
you are a liar, is perfectly self evident. That you
are a scoundrel, is written in every lineament of your
face.
The wretch was absolutely breathless; he was like a
man thunderstruck, for a minute. All eyes were
turned
upon us. There was a silence, like death. He
stood up; and I pushed back my chair, and stood up,
and confronted himlike a man. I say, like a man
because I felt then, that it
was
like a man. The
people
looked at the table, as if they saw blood thereand
just as they were when I spoke first, there staid they,
as if turned to stone.
I saw him preparing to raise a horse-whip over me.
Stop, said I.I was willing to tell him, in season,
that, if he
touched
me with that, I would never quit my
hold of his throat, at which I was preparing to leap,
until his soul had left his bodybut there was no time
for it. He raised the whip. I sprang upon the table
it fell, with a tremendous crashand the next
moment
,
we were upon the floor, rolling and blaspheming
together, and all covered with blood and broken glass.
The next thing that I recollect, was, a blackened and
swollen face, almost touching mine; a frightful sobbing;
and the report of a pistol, close to my head.
It must have been discharged near to me; for I was
blinded, and stunned, and choked with it.
The lesson
was
a terrible one to himand it was
three months, before I recovered from it. It appears
that he drew a pistol, and fired it at me, while we were
together;and, that I had nearly strangled him, before
I was torn off from him. I was not wounded, but
stunned; and lay, for some time, in the blood, like a
dead body.
Not a year after this, I heard a cry of
murder
in a
lonely house, when I was passing it, very late at night.
I was alone, and unarmed; my blood thrilled, with
terrourmy heart stoppedI called myself a coward;
burst open the doorran up stairsfound a room
crowdedseveral women and children shriekingtwo
or three ruffians standing about, as if recruiting for a
second battle; and a stout, damnably visaged fellow, in
the middle of the room, with his knee upon the breast
of an old man, whom he had overthrownand a chair
raised, as if to knock out his brains. I am very strong
very
when greatly exasperated; and a certain air
of authority, on such occasions, which I have learnt to
assume at discretion, may have had its effectyet,
stillthere is something incredible left to be accounted
for.--Before you could have numbered ten, I had
wrenched
the chair awaytumbled the ruffian, heels over
head, down the steps; and cleared the room of every
living creature, except the old man, the women and
the children. I know not how it was donethey
were scattered as if the lightning had been among them.
Such things
will
give one confidence in himself; and
where one has the sense of right; and hears the cry of a
woman, or a childor that of murder; it appears to me,
that, if he were a dwarf, he could face a giant.
Believe me, I mention these evidences of my early
strength, that some things, which are sacredly true
that happened at my maturity, and soon to be
related
,
may not be considered fabulous. In
desperation
,
men will do that, which no human force could
achieve at other times. A culprit that I knew, has
lately leaped over a high wall, in his chains; and
beaten
through a thick oaken door;literally beaten
it to pieces, with the irons upon his arms, before he
could be pinioned. People will lift, and carry burthens,
at a fire, which they cannot stir, after it is over. Many
men cannot hold down a mad-man; who is weak, when
in his senses. So was it, with me. Passion is
madness
with me. It is a whirlwind. My very
blood-vessels
are distended to rupture. No human strength
can withstand me. I have pulled a tall man down to
the earth with my left handheld him there
immovably
rifled
his pockets; and then dragged him to the
door; and tumbled him out into the street. The next
minute, I could not have done the same, to a child of
twelve.
I was once nearly pressed to death, by the wheel of
a gig, which had run me up against a stone wall;
another
turn of the wheel would have torn out my bowels,
with the hub. I braced myself against the wall, and
sent, by one desperate exertion, horse, gig, and a lady
that was in it, down from a high bank, into the road.
Evening.Half past nine
.
Is there any thing in this world so delightful as to
escape from companytiresome and civil beyond
expression
people
that you have been owing a visit to for
months and months, and putting off the evil day of
payment
,
till it could be put off no longerto see whom,
you have gone, at last, just in season to get an
invitation
for their next partyis there any thing in this
world so delightful, as to escape from them, at last
M
though you really love themand dodge into your cold
study, where, on looking at your watch, you find just
three hours left to you, of a winter night for meditation
alonealtogether alone.You rake open the red ashes;
pile on the green wood; and, ere your lamp is lighted,
find the beautiful blaze breaking upward, through all
the tangled interstices, of the small wood, before you
could believe it possible; and then you turn, and listen
to the pealing and crackling of the bark; and see the
coloured flame, working its way, hither and thither,
among the wickerwork, like some strangely bright
animal
,
imprisoned in a natural bower. O, how cheering
is the blaze of such a fireas this!as this!when you
are all living alone! Who would ever get married?
---I was going to say, but that were too profanein a
widower; who would ever hang himself,or his head,
if he might sit alone, when the rest of the world were
all asleep; and feel such gentle companionship as I do,
in that fire. Aha sparkanother! by heaven, this
hickory wood is bad stuff, for a fellow that finds his own
carpetand such a carpet! No, noit is better to be
married, if it be only to have something to take care of
the fire. I never could endure a close stoveone of
these cursed cast-iron comforts of lifemere substitutes
for comfort; so cold, unsocial, and dark.I would as
soon sit by a cast iron countenance, all the winter
throughor go to bed to a. There! Being
thoroughly
warm, now, I will leave this chapter, and
begin
another.
CHAPTER VII.
There
seems to be a great deal of meaning in a late
practiceintroduced, I believe, by Lord Byronof
leaving blanks in the story. Some further
improvements
may yet be made; and there are poets who, if
they should make their blanks a little more frequent
than they do, would act yet more wisely. I mention
the thing with uncommon diffidence;they might make
them more frequently, and of a greater length. The
more the better. If there be significance in
one
blank,
surely there must be more in a hundred. So, the fools
reasonforgetting that one simple word, in a sentence,
pronounced emphatically, may thrill like electricity;
when you would fall asleep in the noisy monotony of
sound, if many were made emphatick.
Might not the practice be introduced, with effect,
into
novels? I think it might; and if the chapter,
immediately
preceding the blanks, be made to end adroitly,
a busy imagination is all a tilt at onceten thousand
pleasant, or wicked meanings, are imagined, until the
conclusion is come uponlike a coiled rattle-snake
that somewhat was there, quite too shocking for the
publick eye, where the blank now iswhich the
printer
excellent
manstruck out; leaving the blank as a
guide post, to the inquisitive, for whatever scene of
horrour or profligacy of thought the reader may
choose. Let this chapter be a blank, then; and, if the
reader blush, she will have nobody to blame but
herself
.
What have I said? Nothing. I have only
stopped
thrown
down my eyesand minced my words, a
littleas modest ladies dowhen
I cannot afford to waste any more paperthough,
like that consecrated by poets, it be covered withor
cut up intostarsfor fly traps, hair papers, or
constellations
.
CHAPTER VIII.
Treachery....Sentence begunnever ended....Modesty....Men
and Women...Ribaldry...Advice....Apostrophe...Reflections
on Women.
It
is now my intention to pass rapidly over a series
of little adventures, that happened to me, in my
boyhood
,
in a somewhat regular manner; after which, I
shall proceed with my story, just as my humour urges
me, regardless of aught but my own amusement. And
here, let me begin with an affair, that occurred to me
while I was quite a boy. I have never forgotten it:
hardly, for a moment, has it been absent from my thought,
I ought to say, from the day that it happened; and then,
I was quite a child. I tell it now, lest I may forget it;
although I hardly know how to introduce it. But, why
make any apology? Is'nt the book full of such
episodes
?
Enough for me, that this one had some
influence
on my whole future life.
While I was a mere child, though I do not recollect
my age, I remember that there was a wedding at one of
the neighbours. I lay and thought a good deal about
it, the night before, without well understanding what
was meant by it. I grew uneasy. My insatiable
curiosity
that
devilwas at work again. I determined
to conceal myself in the bride's chamber. I didand
you will smile, when I relate what I saw, before I was
discovered. The poor girl, a remarkably timid,
delicate
,
modest, gentle, innocent creature, came up stairs,
attended by two romping bride maids, who attempted
to pull off her clothes, and put her to bed, by main
force. She resistedand they, finally, consented that
she should undress herself. So, she began;first, she
pulled off one glovethen, fetched a deep sighthen,
rolled it up(the glove, I meannot the sigh)then,
pulled off the otherthen sighed again, from the very
bottom of her heartand began to roll them both up
together
.
The girls became impatient, and snatched the
gloves away. Then the bride took off the ribband that
bound her waistand began rolling that up slowly, as
if she never would be doneinch by inch, and with all
her mightbreathing a faint sigh, at every turn.
Pho, pho! give me the ribband, said onewhat a
fuss you make about it.
Lord! cried the other, I would'nt mind it, at all.
O, yes you would, answered the poor bride
seeking
,
by every artifice in her power, to prolong the
ceremony
;
for the groom was getting impatientand I
could see him pacing to and fro, in the hall below,
taking
out his watch at every turnand shaking the whole
house with his tread.
Then the poor bride began to pull off one of her
stockingsand thenand thenI came away.
And now, to the main story. Among many hundred
scrapes, some of which were truly laughable, quite too
laughable for relation, except the company be all men,
or all women; all married, or all single; and nearly of
the same age, tooStop! that puts me in mind of a
matter, upon which I will step aside for a moment.
Women
! hearken to me. I know something of that evil
propensity, which is common among you, when you
are oncefor a single momentadmitted to an
acquaintance
with certain mysteries. Widows and wives!
Women of beauty and excellence!how many of you,
are there, who, if ye happen to be
very
intimate with
each other, and sitting together in a tight room, by
yourselves, would be willing to have a man overhear
your conversation? Ah! you are startled. I have been
among you, on many occasions, when you knew it not;
by your side, when you saw me not; at times, when the
thickness only of a thin board, kept us apart at
night;nay, less than that, sometimes. I have heard
your murmuring in your sleep; your half articulated
thought; your deep, deep
inaudible
soliloquy:God!
how you would have shivered at the near sound of a
man's voice! I have overheard you in couples; been
with you, on sacred occasions; heard the young,
blushing
,
and innocent creature, who, were I to judge from
the blue tenderness of her eyes; the bashful sweetness of
her untasted lip; would fall down with affright, and
M 2
hide her burning forehead, and gushing eyesas if she
had been caught naked, by a ruffianif one impure
thought; or one immodest allusion, had been uttered in
her presence;lovely and timid creatures, whom it
would seem impossible that indelicacy could approach;
spiritual ones, who
could
notso your heart would
delight to thinkwho
could
not understand the look or
language of impuritylooking as if butter wouldn't melt
in their mouths. Yes. I have been
with
them;
by
them,
at their most secret moments: and heard themalone
in couplesin their bed-chambers at churchin the
wood and the waterutter such things!woman!
such things that my very heart hath turned pale at them.
Yea, and mothers; wives; and the newly married the
holy and consecratehave I not heard from their lips,
what, had their husbands heard from themtheir
lovers
or
their childrenO, what had been their alarm,
and sorrow, and amazement. Woman! if thou art
worthy
of the name, thou wilt never utter thatnever
listen
to that, which thou wouldst not be willing to say
aloud, before any man living. I have known some,
some few;they were the white waxen flowrets, that
cannot even be breathed upon, by an impure heart;
transparent and beautiful blossoms, that are sullied by
even the breath of unholy passion;stars that wane
and dissolve, if approached, even at midnight.
profanely
.
They
were worshippedthey! Ask your own
hearts. Let me ask thee, dearesthast thou never,
never
, in all thy life, uttered that to a woman, which,
for thy right hand, thou wouldst not have had a man
to hear? Yet, thou art purepure as the drifted snow
born of rain and coldtears and chillinesshigh up
in the heaven.
Look at methou of the dark, imperial eye;thou
stately creature, of the regal front, and tread of
dominion
whom
but to think of, brings the sweat out
upon my mouthand have I noteven Iheard thee
mean
that, as thy sweet, clear voice fainted in my ear;
seen thee
understand
that, at which, when thou wast
all alone, thy cheeks kindled, and thine eyes filled, at
having meant or understood? Have I not?
Hear mewoman! dear woman!there is not that
being beneath the skyno, not one, that reveres you
as I do. I would not see you profanedI would not
even imagine it. I would preserve you untasted
unbreathed
uponwith innocent lips, and unpractised
eyes. And, therefore, do I counsel you. No matter how
your fellow-women, of more experience, may affect to
countenance and encourage you, when you are
shrinking
,
with your first lovenestling in it, like your first
child, at your own bosom; or trembling, and blushing,
and warming all over, as you strive, vainly strive, to
adjust your shawl, so that no eye may detect the
thrilling
secretof your happiness, if you love your lord.
No matter how they may strive to win you into
their
way, there is a sanctity, a sweetness, a something
unapproachable
like
witchery and enchantment---the
virginity of the blood and thought---about you now,
that will be gone the first moment that you listen to, or
repeat (for
that
will follow,) the words of meaning,
that shall be uttered where you are. Do not listen to
them;---do not, I entreat you. They that laugh at your
pruderyeven
they
, will love you the better for it.
To love, and be beloved, should be the religion of
women
.
Not that to suckle fools, and chronicle small
beer, are to be your only employments. No;but I
would have you, what heaven meant you to bethe
mother and the wife; the companion, friend, and
counseller
of man; his homehis heaven; a something, with
whom he may mingle his immortality, thought, and
essence
;
sure that it will be purified by the communion,
whether your lips are thrilling together, or oceans are
rolling between you.
Would you be this? Would you? Awake then; put
on the imperial beauty that man loves; that, which
conquers
,
while it lifts up the compassionate, supplicating,
imploring eyes of love to us; be yourselves; be modest;
rebuke the licentiousness, which is growing upon you.
Let your foreheads expostulate with it.
By heaven, I have a mind to speak plainly. I
will!
I have overheard women, modest women, say, what I
have blushed, afterward, to think of; and I have no great
pretensions to modesty. I have seen high-minded women;
women, whom I do respect, and could have loved,
betray
a quickness of apprehension upon some subjects;
a dexterity of application, that took my breath away;
and brought the water into my eyes. I have been afraid
to look them in the face again. But othersO, I have
known more than one blessed creature, who never un
derstood aught that she should not understand; or, if
she did, they only could see it, who knew when the
colour
of her eyes changed, with shame and sorrow.
Woman!you know not your own character! Why
do you expose your naked arms, and naked shoulders?
Why do you wear flesh-coloured stockings, thin as
cobweb
,
with lace insteps and clocks. Look at me. I
put the question home to you. You
cannot tell
.
It is the fashion
. Pshaw! Why do you expose your
bosoms?particularly, when you know them to be
beautiful?or, why do the more knowing ones, cover
it with a transparent gauze? Dare you acknowledge
the true reason? Are you not ashamed of it? Is it to
excite the envy of women? In part, it may be. Or,
is it to move the passions, and excite the blood of
men?
of the voluptuary, and the sensualist? You tremble
at the thought. The tears come into your eyes. Yet,
how can you deny it? Ye
do
these things
that
cannot
be denied. Tell me
why
ye do them. Is it that
you do not think of the matter? Shame on you, if that
defence be a true one! Can a modest woman uncover
her beauty, without thinking of it?without
knowing
it? As soon would she go entirely nakednot, all at
oncebut, gradually, and after a little time. But,
perhaps
,
you will take that back. I always think of it,
you may saybut
it is the fashion
. What!is that
the answer of a creature, when the nakedness of her
heart has been uncoveredher most holy enchantment
revealed to the wanton multitude. If
fashion
can so
utterly overcome the natural instinct of modesty, in
any
womanI care not who she may beas to reconcile
her to an exposure, that, if it were
not
fashionable, she
would blush atI should have no hope for herno
confidence in herin Turkey, or Italyor
any where;
if the fashion of the age were ever so shameless, or
beastly. ExampleFashion, then, will make you do
what you disapprove. O, woman, what more could your
bitterest enemy say of you! In short, either you
do
approve
of such things, or you
do not
. If you
do
, you are
no longer a woman; for it is the characterthe
essential
character of
woman
, to shrink from the exposure
of her charms. If you do
not
approve of it, and yet
yield to the fashion, you are more of a woman, to be
sure, in one thing; but less, in modesty, and far less, in
principle. Why, even boys are more modestand
grown menwhere indecent tales are told, than you
sometimes are.
How mistaken we are. Humour and ribaldrynay,
even
wit
, when it most elates us, like the delirium of
intoxication, will always leave us mortified and
humbled
.
How often have I seen a great man lose his hold
upon the veneration of other men, by coming too near
them, and their infirmities, with some paltry joke. And
yet, strange as it is, we do love to see the great and
good forgetting, thus vilely, all their greatness and
goodness. Judges of courts have I seen, gloating on
obscenity and lewdness, about a tableministers of the
gospelaged and venerable menmen of wisdom and
pietyfathers and husbandswho should, if they had
life in them, when a ribald joke was uttered; or a
scurrilous
toast; or a blackguard song; have arisen, and
rebuked
the ruffian to the dust. By heaven, I would as soon
show an indecent print to my own daughter; or sing a
bawdy song before modest women; nay, be guilty of
any shameful outrage upon modesty, before my own
mother, sister, or daughter, as utter an obscene
sentiment
or allusion, in the presence of an old man. There
is an awful something to me, in the bearing of old age.
I feel, when I see a broad old forehead; and a bright,
venerable eye, shaded by the thin grey hair of great
age, as if I am with one, that is holier than I; a greater
favourite of heaven; and much nearer the time of
meeting
with his God;as if I am performing before one,
that is about to carry news of younger men, and of me,
into the habitation of all menthe ancient heavens.
How horrible it is, to hear such men uttering, with
a death-bed sensation, some blasphemous jest. It
makes me indignant, weary, angry, and impatient. I
could arise, and rebuke them for it. What! I would
sayare ye fathers?husbands?and will ye bear
this? Call in your wives!your daughters! Let them
listen to, and mock at you, till their tears blind them!
Oh, no, no! Men will not be taught; and old men, least
of all; and, although every man knows, that he never
heard another tell a smutty story; or make an
immodest
allusion, without feeling his respect for him
diminished
;
yet, every man, when
men
are assembled together,
I never knew an exception in all my life, at a large
dinner tablewill say things; and listen to them, (which
is the same.) and chuckle over them, too, as if there
were a luxury in their wicked raciness, pollution, and
pungency, which was irresistible; things, at which they
should weep for shame, for having permitted them to be
said in their presence, when they are alone.
It is inconceivable that men will do this; but, how
transcendently worse is it in
women!
What a
horrour
do we feel for the impious, the intemperate, or the
bloody minded woman; yet, to our horrour and hatred
for these, are added a faintness of the heart; a sick
loathing for the
indecent
woman. And this is so
instinctively
man's nature, that he will turn away with
abhorrence from
her
, in the last paroxysm of his own
moral corruption. And yet, there are scoundrelsah!
how many!who appear to delight in bringing down
these poor creatures, these spiritualities, to the base
earth. Nay, are there not many nobler creatures; men
of high bearing; resolved minds; prompt and lofty
energies
;
who are for ever wandering upon the very
confines
of the forbidden; tempting the unwary among
women
,
by the voluptuous warmth of their manner; their
hazardous prompting; their continual invitation; just
to overstep, for
one
moment, the barrier of snow; or, if
that may not be, just to let their thought wander over,
or their eyes, for a moment!
It
is
common. I blush to say it; but, heed me
woman
thou,
who hast no brother to tell thee this; thou,
whose lover
dare
not, even if he imagine it possible that
thou
shouldst need it; whose husband
will
not;do thou
listen to me. Be assured that, with all our art, and
all our apparent pleasure, when we see thee forget the
modesty of thy nature, we
do
feel a pang; we
do
,
assuredly
,
even at the profanation of our own hands.
Hallow
thyself, then. Be what thou mayest be:a vessel
into which our hearts may empty themselvesbreath
and bloodwhen hurried almost into the grave, by the
misfortune, and the sorrow, and the apparitions of
life.
Do not believe that we love you the better, when we
laugh most heartily at your witdo not; it is a mortal
errour. We may laugh; but it were a better
compliment
to you, if we
wept
, when we see your pure hands
so unworthily employed; or your mind distilling poison;
or your beautiful bodies anointed with impure passion.
But why need I preach to you? Neither you; nor the
old men; nor the wise, will heed me. You are afraid
of being laughed at; as if it were not better to be
laughed at, by all the world; and loved by
one
, to
idolatry
;
than to be waited on with sensual, though ever so
rich offerings, by all the men of the world. But it is
not so. Be modest, and they dare not laugh at you.
Affectation only is ridiculous. Sincerity and nature
never are. Let your modesty be natural, then;
unostentatious
;
shutting itself up, like water-lilies with the
dew in them; or soft eyes, when they are first kissed.
Depend upon itwe shall all cease to laugh at you,
before
you
know it; and love and pray for you, before
we
know it, ourselves.
And men, tooold menwhy should I preach to
them?the feeble of heart? Have I not seen people
get drunk; smoke, even when the sickness of their
heart was like death, that they might avoid all
imputation
of ignorance upon a subject, of which to have a
knowledge
,
is to be base and brutal? Have I not, again and
again, set at a table, where stories, and songs, and
toasts, were heard, which not a man there, would have
had it known abroad, among women, that he had heard,
for his right hand. It only wanted a wordone word,
from some brave youthful heart; and the scoundrel
face of immodesty, had been banished from the spot.
But who should speak? The old dared not;---the young
trembled, and were afraid. One voice only was heard;
one
---and it was that of the youngest in company; and
what was the result? This---
this!
Is it not
honourable
to the nature of man? Is it not a proof that the
Divinity will abide within us, in spite of our
profanation
?
Did I ever know it fail? No, never. All hands
have united---all hearts---and we have looked into each
other's faces, after we have heard the malediction
pronounced
,
as if wondering that it had been delayed so
long; and that we had so long born a brutal
profligacy
and licentiousness, at the table. And I---yes, it was
I;---I will not pretend to deny it;---I am not ashamed
of it;it
was
I!I have gone home, a prouder and a
better man, for it. That would seem like courage in
me; but it was not. I shook all over, when I lifted my
voice among them.
Yet, think not that I would have you
fastidious
. No,
I hate that. I know not which is most disgusting
immodesty
or squeamishness; or which is least so. Are
they not the same thing? The truly modest woman
will speak of the duties of a wife and a mother---though
she be unmarried---when the conversation
naturally
falls that way, as she would of religion. So much
depends
upon the mind, and place of the thought. We go
to church, and hear---what we cannot repeat. We take
up the Bible, and read aloud, to them that love uswhat
we could not read in any other book. The truly modest
woman, in such a case, will never falter when she
comes upon the bad word; the same voice, the same
look, the same attitude will continue; but the
immodest
woman, will be sure to make such a fuss about it,
that she tempts all that hear her, to get the Bible, and
hunt for the place, where she was reading; and dwell
upon it, at some time, when they are alone. No;---I
would have a woman so modest, that her tears should
fall continually, when she was alone, if aught that she
could not repeat, to her
husband
, or
lover
, or
son
, or
father
,
had been said in her company; yet able to sit
upright
in her chair; look me patiently in the face; and
speak, without emotion, of many a prohibited theme.
Society is advancing. There was a time, a few years
only have passed, when a woman, in America, or
England
,
would not have spoken of a pain in her
breast
, for
all the world; all her pains, in that region, were then
described by the most awkward circumlocution; as a
pain
in her
side;
a pain
here;
a pain
there;
the
stomach
ache; a pain
near
the shoulder, &c. &c. But how is it
now? Nothing is more common, than to hear a lovely
girl, with a bosom just heaving up to the wind, like
something hidden and terrified, speak of a pain in her
breast
, just as of a pain in her head. And what is the
result? A
man
thinks no more of it. But, if she hurt
her knee, or broke her leg, or her
thigh
O, there is no
telling of
that
, before any man; and her awkward,
roundabout way of describing it, has often a very
mischievous
effect upon his imagination.
Upon my word, dear womanyou must be a woman,
and a
dear
one, too, if you have got this farthe
patience
and curiosity of no
man
, could have sustained
him;this speculation on modesty was utterly
unpremeditated
.
I know not how it happened; perhaps from
coming home, from a house where I love to go, the
mistress of which, a most fascinating and superiour
woman,
will
understand, now and then, what she ought
not; and will make a man, if he have any blood or
pulse, understand it too; had disturbed me so
confoundedly
,
thatreally, I began to think of old times,
whenBut it is too late to begin another chapter
to-night
;
so I will, if I
can
, huddle together a few more
remarks on this subjectwomanand then go to bed.
Why do you
strip
when you go into company? Do
you know your own interest. You sit covered, and
muffled up to the eyes, before them that truly love and
respect you; and you go, with your very bosoms naked;
aye, your
bosoms
, whereon, if a man really loved you,
he would as soon another had placed his hand, or his
mouth, as his eyes; aye, your
bosoms
the pillow, where
a husband, the lord of your heart, and the father of
your babes, will yet lay his aching temples, with the
thought of rapturethat he sleeps upon something
holy
unvisited,
N
unprofaned. Woman!woman!how
dare you so trifle with that sanctity, with which heaven
hath delighted to invest you? O, could you but feel,
for one moment, that delirious enjoyment, which the
heart bounds to, when it is near the unvisited heart of
a loved one---ah! you would shut yourselves up---veil
your eyesand shade your beauty---as some flower of
Iove, which, to be truly dear, may not be blown upon,
by the common wind of heaven! Look to yourselves.
A plain question is before you. Why do you expose
yourselves so---publickly, and to strangers? You are
ashamed to answer me. I am glad of it. I respect you
the more for it. There is yet
something
left to love in you,
after all. Why are you always in advance of our
opinions.
Let me tell you why you dare to do this. It is the
fashion
. The fashion! What a plea for a modest girl,
who shivers with alarm, if her lover find her with her
neck uncovered, in her own room; yet, goes into a mob
of leering, sensual profligates and debauchees; and
stands, half naked, before their gloating and drunken
eyes. O, shame! A woman that will do this, will
by heaven! what will she
not
do? It is either pleasant,
or it is not. If it be pleasant to HER, it shows a nature,
that would, on a fitting opportunity, throw her upon
the town; if unpleasant, and yet she
do
it, in obedience
to fashion, where would she stop? Where the dutchess
of Kingston didCherubinaor the Venus of the bath!
She will uncover her armsher bosomand as much
of her beautiful limbs, (I dare not say legs,) as very
short clothes will permit; and wear flesh-coloured
stockings
.
Why? Let her ask her own heart. If she have
any, it will gush out with tears and penitence. Is she
so covetous of admiration? Did she know the thought
that such a display excites in the heart of a
man
, she
would blush all over.
Nay, what is religion with you? Whatbut a
periodical
fashion? I once heard one man say to another,
in passing through a large southern city of America
What a multitude of people go to church, here!
True, said the other. What a multitude of women
have new bonnets, here! said his wife. Zounds! what
a satire upon your piety!unintentional, to be sure,
yet how true! Since then, I have observed, that people;
and women, in particular, are never so devout, as when
the change of seasons, from cold to warm, or from
warm to coldno matter whichfirst comes onfor
then
, they are in all their newness of dress and finery.
Nay, on a swarming Sunday, I would bet ten to one,
without looking, that there was a change in some
fashion
or otheror a late arrival of new
bonnets
.
Your extravagance, toomerciful heaven! What
will become of you, at this rate, if you never marry; for
you never will, unless to a fool or a bankrupt? And
what will become of your husbands, if you do? I feel
what I say. Unless you reform, you will be a nation
of miserable, neglected, uncultivated, peevish creatures,
who are virgins, by necessityfor whom no man ought
to care; for you will be companions for nobody; and
with
whom, no man but a fortune-hunter would dare to
mate; and he, only that he might vie with you, for a
little
time, in your foolish prodigality. Am I severe?
You deserve it. How much is your father worth? How
many children has he? What is the income of his
property
,
at six per cent.? What are his household
expenses
?
How much do
you
you, yourself, expend for
him, in the course of a single month? Answer me these
questions, and you will soon forgive meunless you
are wicked enough to persist, in spite of calculation;
and willing to see your father beggared and disgraced,
by your intemperate folly. Women!ye had better
have a few laces and bonnets the less, and a man to
protect you, when your father is dead, and your family
scattered!
You charge us with marrying for money. Rightit
is a choice between positive starvation, and the
chance
of escaping it, that we look for. A friend of mine used
to say, I will never marry for money. But I cannot
support a wife;it is out of the question, as girls are
now educated in America. I can marry a woman with
one hundred thousand dollars. Now, suppose that I
refuse
her;
and marry one, not worth a farthingdo I
not,
in reality
, give one hundred thousand dollars for a
wife? Aye, indeed do I;and I cannot afford that;
particularly
,
when I have to support her, after marriage.
Never marry an heiressnever; it is a part of female
arithmetick, that she, who brings you ten thousand
dollars
,
is entitled to spend five thousand a year; nor can
you persuade her, that such an expenditure will ever
affect the principal.
Woman, forgive me. Did I love thee, less---did I
revere
thee, less---I should deal more tenderly with thee.
I should say,
verily, thou art beautiful;
but, as it is, I
can only say---
God forgive thee!
Were fashion to bid
thee, thou wouldst go utterly naked among the very brute
animals!
God forgive thee!
CHAPTER IX.
Affair with a teacher of broadsword...Readiness to do good, as
well as evil...Murder! Murder!...Escapes a flogging...Another
and a duel!...Frolick in New York...Little matters...
Blackguard
scrape...Serious matter with two soldiers...Affair at
Lancaster
,
Pa. with a clergyman.
I will
ramble no longer. I am weary of it.
Hence-forward
,
my path shall be direct. A few more trials
a few more proofs of an untried spiritthe brief valour
of a coward; and I go to a theme of deeper intention
that of
Love!
thence, to my history, as it hath truly been,
with all the shadow, storm and brightness of it.Yes!
I will stand shivering upon the brink, no longer.
Reader, whoever, and whatever thou art, have
patience
with me, for a little time; and thou shalt find
that I have not detained thee too long upon the matters of
my boyhood. With all my suffering and humiliation,
that
has been the only pleasant season of my life; the
summer time, though the rain did, here and there, beat
upon me, and the hot sun scorch me; yet, I cannot bear
to think of it; for
then
, I was innocent.
Not long after the last transaction, in which my
breath and blood mingled with the hot breath and blood
of another, while our limbs were locked and rivetted
together, in a brief, but mortal tumult of wrath, I learnt,
by accident, something of the broad-sword exercise. I
was not very expert; but I was fearless, strong of arm,
and quick of eye; and soon found, that I was more than
a match, for some of the scientifick. This made me
vain and boastful. It happened, one day, that I was
passing a door, about which I saw some boys assembled.
I stopped, and inquired the cause. It was a fencing
school, they told me; and the instructor was then giving
lessons. I had never been in one; never seen any other
fencing, than the ridiculous stuff, upon the stage; and
I entered the room, without the slightest disposition to
be known. I saw some pretty good playing; and, in
N 2
the centre of the floor, I observed a pair of swords, steel
broad-swords, lying across. I would have asked the
reason, but I was unwilling to expose my own
ignorance
;
and I stood, several minutes, waiting, like some
awkward fellow at a dinner table, watching the
conduct
of all about him, afraid to touch a single dish, till
he had profited by the management of a more experienced
hand, in approaching it; cudgelling my brains, to
discover
the purpose of these two blades, lying athwart,
in this way; and looking about, upon the scholars and
spectators, who were about thirty, I suppose, in
number
,
to see what they would do next. While I was
listening
,
a bustle was heard at the door, and a man
broke through, calling me by name. It was a friend
of mine, who had heard, heaven knows how, that I had
come to fight the broad-sword teacher. Some minutes
passed, before I could make him understand me; and I
did not succeed, till I saw several of the scholars
gathered
round the master, and looking and pointing at
me, while they talked to him, with an eager and
vehement
gesture. His countenance grew inflamedand,
just then, as the devil would have it, I happened to look
down, and see the crossed blades, at my feet. I should
have stood on them, at the next step; or, perhaps,
displaced
them, with my feet. I stooped, and took up one
as I hope for mercy, with the most pacifick
disposition
in the world; in utter ignorance that it was
accepting
the challengefor
point
and
blade
too, which had
been offered, in foolish ostentation, by the teacher,
rather
as a matter of show, than of a real defiance, to all
who collected, when the scholars were there. Hardly
was the hilt in my hand; hardly had I rested the point
upon the floor; felt the edge, and bent the blade; when
I heard somebody breathing hard at my side. I
turned
.
The instructer himself stood there; his countenance
white with angerholding the other sword upon guard
as if prepared to cut me into ounce pieces. I do
confess that I was frightened. I knew not what I had
done; but something, not entirely right, I was sure.
It was a minute or two, before he could speak; and,
when he did, I discovered that our number was reduced
to about a dozenthe door locked, and benches piled up
against it, and a ring formed round us. The
scoundrel
began to menace me, by flourishing the sword
about, in the air; (it whistled, vilely, I confess) and
then to abuse me. He charged me with coming there
to insult himto bully himbut swore, most
bitterly
,
that he was not afraid of any man that ever
lived; nay, that he could beat any man on the face of
the globe, with a broad-sword. I would have offered
an apologybut there was no opportunityno time
for it. I was afraid of him. What could I do? He
had been told that I was a great swordsman. He had
seen me take up his challenge; as if it were mere play
with me, to fight with steel blades. I had not the
courage
,
to acknowledge my ignorance of the ceremonies
and regulations of a fencing academy. I was ashamed
to say that I had taken up the sword, merely to look
at it, ignorant that it was a challenge.
That
would
have appeared like cowardice; because, nobody would
believe that I, who played so well, could be so ignorant,
of the commonest thing in a school of arms; and, more
than all, I was afraid of myselftoo little master of
myself
,
to explain the matter like a gentleman. I looked at
himinto his eyesinto his very heart; and, as I did so, I
took courage; I saw that he was getting afraid of me,
in his turn; and that my cold, silent manner, (which
really proceeded from ignorance and fear,) was awful
to him. May I not carry it through? said I, to myself.
I looked at him with a pleasant countenance, I am told,
although it was rather pale.
I threw myself upon guard, in my own way. He
looked astonishedhesitated.
Let us go through the six divisions, first; said he
rather sullenly, before we begin.
No said I, unwilling to expose myself; I have
no time to waste. You have had the folly and rashness
to challenge a whole community, and to insult me, till I
can put up with it, no longer; and I shall do my best,
to punish your presumption. Come on.
The ring contracted. A little more room said
I, with a flourish of my sword, that whistled like a
rattan
,
in the wind. He was afraid. His countenance
fell. I could perceive that he was willing to
compromise
the affair; but my own accursed folly and
cowardice
,
prevented me from doing then, what I could have
done, with a single word. I might have appeased him;
and come out of the affair, with flying colours;but, I
was willing to carry a high hand over him. In short,
I continued to provoke him, until he struck at my head.
That was enough. I forgot, instantly, that we were
playing with steeland gave in my blows, though the
sparkles and ringing were terrible, for a minute or two;
just as if they were the wooden cudgels, with which I
had been accustomed, from my boyhood, to exercise
myself. I received a cut; or rather, a bruize; for, it
was with the flat of the sword, in my forehead--a rather
severe one too, for it staggered me, and set my ears
ringingat the same moment that I severed, with an
awkward blow, and altogether by accident, in
attempting
to cut
four
, the tendons of wrist. His fingers
relaxed, and the sword fell from his hand. I was
blinded
and giddymy face was covered with blood, and I
had half a mind to give him another thrust, when I saw
him stagger; but, I forebore, amid the general shouting
of acclamation and applause.
So ended this affair. A perilous one, indeed, to me;
for, my blood will run cold now, while I recall the
savage
and exasperated expression of that scoundrel's
features. I am sure that he would have slain me, if he
could; and once
once
I am willing to confess it, I did
try to kill him. But, we were so hot and furious, that
neither of us gave edge and point properly.
He spoke, afterward, of me, I heard and
always
maintained, what was truethat I did not
understand
the broad-sword. But, the world thought
differently
.
They could see that
my
way was not
his;
but,
as I had conquered him, and held my peace---just as if
it had been a certain thing with meand, altogether, a
matter of indifference, they naturally concluded that
mine was the
best
. Fools! If the man had not been
frightened; or, if I had not given him an accidental blow,
that disabled him, I should have been limbed and
hewed down by him, in three minutes.
Since then, I have had some amusing adventures, of a
similar nature; which, if I remember in their proper
places, I shall hereafter relate.But, to those of my
youth, now; for the purpose of showing that there was
a natural readiness in me, for good, as well as evil.
One bright, moonlight evening, and near midnight,
in the dead of winter, I heard once, when I was quite a
youth, as I was passing quietly along, to my solitary
room, a cry of murder; so near me, as I thought; and
so frightfully distinct, that my blood thrilled, and I
leaped upright, from the ground where I stood
expecting
to see the deed doing, at my very elbow. A
window was thrown up, violently, at a little distance;
a woman put her head out, and shrieked, in a desperate
voice,
murder! murder!
I had no armsnothing
but a light stick. I left my cloak in the street, and
ran to the house; and was just ready to stave the door
in, which I could have done, I am sure, with a single
effortwhen I heard the cry, from another quarter; and
saw the same woman again, wringing her hands,
running
about the room, which was light enough for me to
see every thing in itand shrieking for
the watch!
the watch!
By heaven, it would seem, in that city,
that the watch were leagued with every villain that
chose to depredate upon the people. They are
always
,
I believe, the most reverend, pacifick, sober, quiet,
and orderly old men, to be found in the whole place
the best of examplesgoing to bed, betimes, and
sleeping
soundly. I set off, in the direction to which she
pointed. The snow was deep; and a heavy thaw had
rendered it almost impossible to run through it; at every
step, I
slumped
in, up to my waist; but the cries
continued
,
till I thought that all the people in the world,
were either dead or deaf. I know not how longbut
it appeared to me, that an incredible time lapsed,
before
I saw another living creature in motion. At last,
I came in sight of a large sleigh, with two horses,
standing in the road, near to the vacant lot, through
which I had passed; and, just then, two persons
rushed
out of a narrow alley, near meas I then
supposed
,
on the same errand that I was. They appeared
terrifiedstopped.
Go that way; said Iand I will go thiswe shall
be sure of the villain, then.
Aye!aye! sir?they both cried; and sprang off,
up the blind alley, like two wild cats.
They appeared mighty zealous, I thought, at the
time, to obey mebut that, I attributed to a certain
air of authority about me, of which I have before
spoken
.
A few moments brought me to the spot. There lay
one poor boy, bleeding upon the snow, with his head
cut open, and the reins of two powerful horses, wound
round and round his body; and another, near him,
standing up, and shrieking at every breath, as if he had
a knife in him. I enquired into the affair; and soon
had the best reason in the world, to believe, that the
two men, whom I had just met, were the rascals that
had done the deed; and that their object was,
undoubtedly
,
to get possession of the horses and sleigh, as they
saw it pass them, with these two little boys in it, who,
it appeared, had been employed, one as a driver, and
the other as a servant, in a large sleighing party, that
night.
Had I known this, when I met the men, I should,
certainly, have collared them both, in my fright, upon
the spot; and I never should have let go my hold, I am
sure, until my arms had been cut from my body. Dead,
or alive, I should have clung to them. But who, that
was strong, and desperate with terrour and passion,
would not have done the same thing? The ruffians
were never taken.
Many and many have been the occasions, where I
have found this promptitude, this wild energy, of more
use to me, than the strength of Goliah. I was in the
theatre, once, I remembernay, I have been there a
dozen times; when it was my only safety;but, on this
occasion, a fellow insulted a woman near me. She was
unprotecteda prostitute, I believea stranger to me,
thank heavenand likely to remain so, all her life; for
I had no relish for dishonour and shame; but, she was
a womanand that was enough. I interfered; but the
fellow grew scurrilousand dared me out. The
eyes of the people below, were already upon me; and
no man could be more sensible than I, of such a
reputation
,
as I should probably acquire, by a scuffle in
the gallery of a theatrethat of a bully to a strumpet,
perhaps.Yet, I followed him; and before he had set
his foot fairly upon the floor, outside, I gave him a blow
that laid him sprawling. He arose, and was making
at me, like an old bruiserwhen I gave him my hand
saying damn it, Jack, fair play!would ye come
athwart a shipmate, in the wake of a fine womanhey?
He stoppedstared at me. Tip us your daddle;
boyblast my eyes! said hewhat'll you drink?
I was obliged to take
something;
so I look a glass of
wine, in lieu of a flogging.
I was passing a street too, one daytalking, very
busily to a companion; and, in leaning toward him,
with my opposite arm a-kimbo, I struck a large man, so
forcibly, in theabdomenthat he whirled about, two
or three times, grunting, all the time, with a loud
noise; rounded to, with a tremendous belch; and was
just on the point of levelling me.
Sir said I, touching my hat, most respectfully
I beg your pardonsir.
What could he do? I am sure, from the man's looks,
that he would have given half of his worldly property,
that I had not begged it. And I am sure that I had
better have given
all
mine, than
not
have begged it.
On another dayno, on another eveningone night
the devil! I shall never tell the story, in this wayI
was in a ball room. Some ladies begged me to lead
the way, through a door that was crowded. I went
before; and, in my sweetest manner, as I thought, made
way, among the puppies and fools that stood about it. I
had hardly returned, when a stout, brutal, vulgar,
blackguard
looking fellow, in a military undress, whom I had
before seen, and thought, (nay, perhaps saidfor
nothing
was more natural to me then, than to say, whatever
I
thought
of anybody, and to anybody)had no business
therecame up to me, and asked me what I had
turned
him round for.
My first notion was, that, some half pay scoundrel
had, probably, been cashiered in the army; and
willing to re-establish his character, by a squabble with
a peaceable citizen; was about to pick a quarrel
with me; as nobody ever had more of that careless
frivolity
of manner, which appears to promise impunity,
than I, on some occasions; and, as there was somewhat
of an air of fashion about methat, he had chosen
me
for the purpose.
Turned you round! sir; said I, in astonishment;
and yet, with a look of scornful, settled contempt. A
lady, who knew me well, said that she never saw my
forehead, or eyes, half so steadfast.
He colouredbegan to talk loudamong the ladies
too! My name is Codman, said he.
And what the devil do you suppose I care, said I, if
your name be Codman.
My
name is Bill Adams.
My manner tortured him like a mad bull. He
nodded
,
threateningly; and gave me a
loud
hint, to go down
stairs with him.
Now, I confess, that I expected nothing less than a
brutal scuffle; and a severe beating, into the bargain;
from the thick headed, broad shouldered ruffian; and I
confess, too, that I was mortally afraid; and that my
mouth grew, instantly, as dry as ashes. Yet, I
answered
,
immediately, with all my heart, sir; and led
the way. We arrived at the place, where a man, who sold
the tickets, was placed, at a table. My antagonist, here,
instead of knocking me down, for which I was
thoroughly
prepared, began to renew the dispute, in words.
I looked at him, from head to foot. Sir, said I, I have
already told you, that I did
not
turn you round, or put
my hands upon you. It is not my way; or, if it were,
I should never deny it. Somebody else must have
done it. (He had said that I put my hands upon his
shoulder, and whirled him, one complete revolution,
before
he could see my face!) What I said, seemed to
satisfy him; and he returned up stairs, growling,
bravely
,
as he went, like some animal that had ran his head
against a post; and muttering, just loud enough to be
heardIf any man turn me round again, I'll pull his
nose!
I smiled entered the room;and, before five
minutes
had elapsed, heard a man behind me, speaking
of some one, that had
begged pardon of
I did not
wait to hear the rest; but, kindling at the thought, (for
it never entered my head, that he could mean anybody
but me)I went up to him, touched him, and gave him
a nod to follow me. He obeyed. And I was just on the
point of kicking him, for he was much smaller than I,
when I happened to think of speaking to him, first. The
result
was
laughableand, a severe lesson to my
natural
vehemence and jealousy. His conversation had
nothing to do with me and
Colonel Codman
.
What! said I, not colonel Codman--of the
twenty-third
.
The same.
Is it possible!I cried. Why
he
has the
reputation
of being a gentleman, and a brave fellow. Are
you sure?
I made some inquiry, and soon found that the man
whom I had taken for a quarrelsome, overbearing,
vulgar, broken lieutenant, was in reality a man, whose
courage and courtesy, I had never heard questioned,
at that time
This changed the whole face of transaction. I
wondered
now, at his forbearance. I went to him. I
called him out. I made an apology to him for the
manner, in which I treated him, after he spoke to
me--telling
him what had been my opinion.
He took my handshis voice quaked, a strong
emotion
shook his whole frame. By God! said he (these
soldiers will swearwhen in uniform)
I would die for
you!
He was quite as glad as I, I am sure, at the
reconciliation
.
ReaderCan you see nothing of my nature in that
transaction? nothing of your own? precipation;
cowardice
;
folly; impudence; rashness; and magnanimity?
AgainI was walking the streets of New York, one
evening, locked arm in arm, with a determined, wild
fellow. We had just left the dinner table, and, I may
as well own itwere ripe for anything. We agreed
to turn out for nobodyto go into the middle of the
O
side walk, and take up as much room, with arm braced,
and elbows out, as we conveniently could. There is a
strange point of honour among boys, fools, and madmen,
on such occasions. Neither would have flinched, I am
sure, from a drawn sword. We were in Pearl street.
The first person, that we met, was a venerable man.
He came on
my
side. My heart smote me; but he had
to turn out. The next was a beautiful woman; a
mother
,
I dare say, or about to be onestill on
my
side! I
expostulated more reverently with her, bowing as I
stood stillshe had to turn out. The third, the devil
was
in the luck!--was a tremendous fellow
that
I
own-coming
on
my
side too. I did not like to encounter him;
and so managed, that, I threw my companion, who was
a little near sighted, and did not see him so soon, in his
waythe man looked at us; and, as if he suspected our
design, sheered into the gutter, as one would to avoid a
wild beast. By heaven, it was too bad! I insisted on
changing sides; but hardly was it done, than I saw a
fiery looking blade, setting himself, to all appearance
for the same spirit. I was desperate: we quickened
our pace; he did the sameand, such was the amazing
impetus, that we acquired, by moving together, that,
when my elbow struck him, he belched out a sound, as
if his bowels were crushedand was actually lifted
from the pavement.He tumbled up the steps near him;
and broke through the front door of a large, handsome
house, with the weight and violence of the fall!
fact
.
There was no time to parley, now. We turned the
next corner, at double quick time; and then ran home,
by different ways, as if the devil were after us.
And once, too, how unwilling we are to sufferwhat
we are most willing to inflict!I was walking one
Sunday with a
gentleman
(fact! though it was in a
large city crowded with people)a rascal ran against
me, with his companion. I called out to him, it was
of a Sunday, and the streets were fullthat he was a
blackguard scoundrel.
What's that? said he, stopping, and facing meit
was probable that he meant to intimidate me. Say that
again, if you dare.
I left my friend, a lame fellow, behindwalked
leisurely toward him; and then pronounced, in my very
best manner (for I
can
be very gracious) the same
words again.
The fellow turned on his heel, saying that he'd be
dd, if I didn't run against him first! But so it
wasI escaped a severe and disgraceful affair, solely
by my fear of myselfby my presence of mind, and
resolute eyes.
About this time, I am inclined to think that I had a
very bad heart. Many things occurred, that go far, now,
while I reflect upon them calmly, to make me believe
it. For example; a man whom I had once known, a
talkative, bragging, good natured, lying fellow, came
to see me. I was with a friend, standing at a
merchant's
desk. The poor wretch, of whom I spoke, had
a large warehouse to cross, before we could meet; and
he was confoundedly put to it, I remember, to keep his
countenance, while he approached.
I had determined to cut his acquaintance; for, I had
good reason to believe that he was a villain. I stood
still, eying him as he approached; he came up, smiling,
and talking all the way; and offered me his hand,
laying
it upon the desk, before my face.
Take that away, said I, without moving a muscle.
The poor fellow obeyed; aye,
obeyed!
By Jehovah!
if it had been me, I would have trodden the heart
out
, of
any man that had treated me so. I remember that he
went out; and, when he had gone, my friend, a dear
and true friend at that timewho loved me, stood
looking at me with amazement:the water was in his
dark eyeshe had known me
long
he had never,
never
seen me so deliberately stab into the very heart of
any human creature before. I never shall forget the
look of his eyes, when he saidwell, well!
I would not
have believed it possible!
They were full of alarm
and sorrow.
I have never forgotten his words; and, many a time
since, when I have been ready to strike down the
proffered
hand of some fool or scoundrel, I have hesitated;
striven with myself, and taken it, meekly, at last, as I
would touch a cold, dead serpent.
So ready was I at this period to quarrel with
everybody
,
who manifested a disposition to quarrel; being
continually goaded on by a belief that people thought
me a coward; and yet so ready to risk my life and
limbs, in preventing other people from it, as many and
many a time, to fight my way, literally, into a mob,
for the purpose of separating them, or rescuing some
wretch. Yes! often have I done this; and the
remembrance
of it gives me a consolation, that I want now;
now
, while my very hands are red withnononot
yetlet me stay where we are a while longerI dread
to tell that yet. I would keep from it, as long as
possible
.
There was a diseased sensibility about me, for nearly
three years, the vestiges of which, I fear, are yet in my
constitution; an unhealthy, jealous, irritable soreness of
heart. Let me give an example. A ferocious ruffian
had cheated me in some wood. I saw him a few days
after, attempting to cheat another. He had forgotten
me
. We stood upon a high flight of steps. I
cautioned
the person against him, adding my reasons.
Now, you may know, said the rascal, addressing
the other, that he is telling you a lie.
I raised my arm. I was on the point of knocking
him off the steps, into a place, where he would infallibly
have been killed; but I hesitated. The fellow seemed
unconscious of what he had said, and of his danger.
I went nearer to him. Our faces almost touched.
Repeat
that, once more, said I, and I will knock you
down.
Ah! said he, are you up to that, my fine fellow!
jest come down here, that's all: jest come down here, a
bit. Saying this, he ran down the steps, and stood upon
the side walk.
I followed down the steps, and went up to him, fully
resolved, to destroy him, if I could, though I should
burst every blood vessel in my body, if he repeated the
words. TrueI
was
, or
had been
, a liarbut what of
that? I was the more scrupulous of my reputation.
What terrified him? He was a large, thick set,
muscular
fellow. Nothing but my manner. He
dared
not
repeat
it; he did not, and I was glad enough, you may
be sure, that he did not, though, I do think, if he had,
that I should have left him dead upon the spot,or
myself
.
The fact was, that the time had passed for me
to think of being beaten, in that way, and live.
I look back now, with wonder, at that period of my
life; and ask myself, if I really was in my senses? What
could I gain, by a victory over such creatures? And what
a perpetual disgrace, even if I did, to a man like me! Is
it not probable, that I was a little, a very little
deranged
?
The people that I met, I remember, wherever I
went, looked doubtfully at me, and always became more
serious, and compassionate in their eyeswhile they
talked with me. Well, I was sore all overraw,
inside and out! The world had used me unkindly; and,
I was sure, would crush me, if it could. Beside, I
knew; and the knowledge fretted me night and day, like
young adders in my blood, that I was a coward at heart;
and it appeared to me that everybody else knew it, and
presumed upon it, at this time. Therefore, did I
quarrel
with
everybody
.
Soon after this, while I was yet quivering and
burning
all over, at the slightest approach of indignity, I
happened to be coming up a street, in a thoughtful
mood; a melancholy one perhaps, for there was little left
in the world for me, thenwhen I found the side walk
encumbered
with a disorderly assembly of citizens in
uniform
.
I took my way through them; and, soon after,
encountered two others, of the same troop; one of whom
as I passed him, uttered a sound, with a scornful
movement
of his lip, like
pshaw!
I stopped. Could it have been meant for me? Was I
mad? Where was my old nature, so lofty, so unsupicious?
How had it changed! and yet, though it was a
mark
of
baseness to suspect insult, it was a
proof
of cowardice
not to resent it, when obvious. My next thought was
to go up to the man, and knock him down, upon the spot.
But that would not do. I could'nt get my breath. My
hands involuntarily contracted-I looked at them. They
were bloodless, cold, and spotted with faint purple, like
those of a drowned man. My heart was all on fire. I
O 2
would'nt be rash, I thought; so, I went to my room. I
sat down; it would'nt dothe pages were yellow and
crimson. My penknife was bloody. All the objects
about me were dancing, with a fiery quick light. I arose;
I, almost-nay I could not have supported it another
moment
.
I rushed into the street; and went in pursuit of
the company, with a full determination of plucking the
fellow out of the ranks, by the collar; and breaking
him down to the earth, before them allyea! though I
had twenty swords in my side, before it should be done.
I could'nt find them. I went, again, in pursuit of them,
the next day; and left word for them both to call on me.
But, while I was returning, incapable of attending to
any thought but this, I saw them conversing together,
at the corner of a street. I joined them, immediately,
(not that I would not have gladly passed them, if I had
been sure that they had not seen me,) and requested, in
a cold, peremptory manner, that they would accompany
me. They did so; and the guilty one, I soon observed,
took especial care, to secure a retreat, by
letting on
, as
they say there, that he had only a moment to spare, at
that time; and by stopping everybody that he knew, and
being very,
very
cordial, in his manner. I understood
it well. It was just what I should have done, when I was
much younger, had I been afraid; but now, afraid as I
was, I played a deeper game.
I led the way into my roomI locked the door upon
them; and demanded a categorical answer to my
questions
.
They were very brief; and the replies perfectly
satisfactory
perfectly!
They were just, exactly, what
I could have most wished; for the two would have been
more than a match for me, unless I had taken out my
pistols
to them, at once. But had they not been so
satisfactory
,
I should have given a good account of one of them, at
least, I am sure, before he could have said
Jack
Robinson
!
I do not pretend to relate these affairs, in order, as
they happened, but only as they occur to my
recollection
.
The following has just come to me. I was preparing
to throw by the record; and, though it have little to do
with the rest; inasmuch as no scuffle ensued, yet it is
important, as it led to the development of a new
faculty
in methat of persuasion.
I was in the little town of Lancaster, Pennsylvania,
incog
. I was young, fiery, adventurous and desperate,
about to hazard an undertaking, upon which, all my
future prospect in life might depend. Worn out, and
exhausted with incessant study and meditation, I was
persuaded, one Sunday evening to go to a church, where
a Methodist gentleman held forth; a strong minded,
sensible
,
but zealous and imprudent man. I sat upon the first
bench, with a young fellow who accompanied me. In
looking about. I recognised two or three pretty women,
whom I had seen some days before. They had
promised to go with me, to church, this evening; and
had run away from me. We exchanged looks of
intelligence
.
Soon after, some persons kept going in, and
outthe minister stopped, and requested anybody to
put an end to the disturbance. I was somewhat
wearied, not with the sermon; not with the place, for,
light as my heart is at times, there is that, in the
sanctuary
of the Lord, call it what you please, a Conventicle,
Church, Synagogue, Temple, Meeting-house, Chapel,
Mosque, a Cathedraland I have been in allwhich
will make it heavy with awe when I am there:and I
feel much more reverence for sacred things, than I ever
affect, or professa fault, I admit, but a less fault, than
to feel
less
, than one pretends. I yawnedand,
perhaps
,
I stretchedyet no man listened to the sermon
with more attention than I; and though I neither
groaned; rolled up my hateful eyes; nor smote my
breast; yet, when I came away, I could have repeated
more of the discourse (without remembering the text,
too) than all the rest of the assembly. But my
manner
was not devout. In a little time, something
occurred
to disturb me confoundedlyone of the candles,
under the pulpit, had been badly dipped; the week was
all on one side; and, after a few minutes, it fell down,
with a bright blaze, and a thick smoke; and a smell
like beef steak broiling; six inches, at least, below the
candle stick. A great bony fellow eyed it, till he was
obliged to move, lest the pulpit should take fire. I
saw him get up; and he was so long about it, and so
long in his person, that I thought he would never finish
getting up. It was like a clock work-I had seen masts
and pumps, frequently, set in the same way. He went
forward a few steps; but his great cowhide shoes made
such a heavy clattering, that he kicked them off, on the
way; and went
barefooted
to the candle; snuffed the
burning wick with his fingers; and, when it fell,
forgetting
that he was barefooted; he set his foot upon it,
Heaven! how he jumped and bounced!-The hot tallow,
half a gill of which had fallen, and the wick all of a
bright blaze, stuck to his naked soles, like a serpent of
fire.
It was quite too much for me. I never had a heart
so base and wicked, as to delight in the suffering of any
creature; but, when I saw the wick drop, and his foot
lifted, I foresaw all the ridiculous consequences, so
vividly and instantaneously, that I snorted aloud; the
poor fellow kept jumping about; and half the
congregation
jumped with him.
That over; and the disturbance still continuing
people still coming in and going out; the clergyman
forgot
himself entirely. He lifted his voice; made a dead
stop; surveyed the whole congregation with an angry
and reproachful look; spoke of the disturbance again; its
effect; and of his previous request, that somebody would
go to the door and prevent itand added, scornfully
What! are you all
afraid?
My blood was up, in an
instant. I did not know what it was to be spoken so
to, by mortal man. That I had been afraid, many
and many a time, till my very veins shrank; was
certainly
a fact; but then, nobody but myself had possibly
known it; and, still less, had anybody ever dared to tell
me of it. I arose from my seat, the instant that he
had concluded; and touched my companion; (forgetful
that this movement might be mistaken for a defiance, as
if I meant to go out, in the very teeth of the minister)
but he dared not follow me; and I sat down again.
My only object was to go to the door, to show that I was
not
afraid
and, to the first man who should attempt to
go out, I meant to say, go back! And if he did not, I meant
to knock him down, on the spotas one of the door
keepers of the church; that was all. It would have
been a good lesson to the rash man, who had dared to
touch our passionate infirmites, with an imputation
of earthly
fear
and cowardice, in the place of worship.
Prayers soon after followed; and, I was not a little
amused, at the manner, in which the most
devout
among
the
Sisters
, kept their eyes constantly upon me; for I
was a stranger; and there was a spiteful eagerness in
their look that kept me on the alert. Naywhen
they sat downthey had a pleasant manner of putting
up their feet, on the next bench before them, with their
knees up to their chinsmuch as women sometimes
will, when they are all alone; or nobody whom they
care for, is
before
them, upon a fender; or upon the
and-irons
or
in the ashes.
These things did unsettle my devotional feelings, I
confess; and I know not whose would not have been
unsetted, by the same. If there
be
such a man, I pity
him. He must be insensible; and in him, the vital
influence
of religion itself would be wasted. Can the
insensible be religious? No.
The next day, I heard that the minister had been
repeatedly
to my lodgings, to see me: the good lady of the
house was inconceivably alarmed, by his deportment;
and, I am willing to confess, that I was not entirely
tranquil. I walked out, toward evening awhile; and,
when I returned, it was quite dark; but I could
perceive
that some stranger was in the rooma
clergyman
,
probably, by the formal wintry feeling of the
air. A dead silence followed. The people were afraid
to stir. My companion, (he, who had been with me the
night before.)I could hardly hear
him
breathe. I
had no such terrour of DivinesI had known many,
some august creatures, and somethe damnedest
scoundrels
.
(I don't often swear,) to speak plainly, and
after
the manner of men, that I ever did see. In a word,
I knew that, to be a clergyman, was to be
much
better,
or immeasurably
worse
than other men; for, is it not
more appalling, to minister with unclean hands, in the
very presence chamber of God, than away, and remote
from him? if one
can
be away, and remote from him.
This gentleman seemed inclined to preserve his
tremendous
bearing awhile longer. His questions were
general; but led, in time, to the matter in hand.
You were at church, I perceived, last night, said
he, to my companion.
Yeyeyes, sir; I bebe believe
I was
, sir, he
faltered out.
And who was the person with you?
Another dead silence.
I was willing to prevent further embarrassment; and
replied, in my meekest, mildest manner.It was I,
sir.
And what may be
your name
, sir? said the
minister
,
with the imperious tone of a schoolmaster,
questioning
a terrified schoolboy. My heart kept stillI
was never much afraid of old men, quakers, children,
women, or clergymen.
I smiled to myself. I foresaw what it would lead to
his arrogance, and my temperbut
What is your reason for asking it? said I, calmly.
I shall not tell you, sir, was the reply.
Sir!
said Ibut I checked myself immediately
willing to retard the explosion, as long as I could.
He repeated the inquiry for my name.
I shall not tell you
, said I,
until I know your
business
.
Are you ashamed of it? said he, in a voice
trembling
with anger.
I aroseI advancedand he arose, at the same
moment
,
as if to rebuke me at once, and for ever. I
measured
his heighthe was a large man. I looked at
the windowit would do, I thought; there was room
enough. He continued addressing himself to Mr.
Murray
,
(my companion)
what
is his name?said he.
You
must
tell me.
He does not know it, said I. I have many
names.
He hesitated; and then began to talk, in a loud,
threatening
tone, breathing all the while like a chafed bull.
Will you tell me your business? said I, again.
No! said he, snappishly.
Are you ashamed of it?
said Iimitating his own
manner, and using his own words.
He was approaching me. Stop! sir, said I, in a
voice, that arrested him like a thunder clap.
Stop!
You do not know me. Go with me to my room. Here
is no place to settle this affair(The window was
higher there.) But Mrs. Murray interfered, half
frightened out of her senses; she knew my temper.
Very well, said I, bring a light then, I would
have the gentleman see my
face
. I am not the boy that
he believes. Nay, I
knew
, that, if he had seen it, he
would not have dared to speak a loud word in my
presence
.
I have told you before, reader, that it was very
uglybut, in wrath, it was damnable; and even in my
childhood, it is said to be a fact, that my life was saved,
when a little sickly cousin of mine, that lay further
from the animal, was actually eaten alive, by a hog
it is a fact, I asure youand my life was saved, because
the light of the candle, left near the cradle, happened to
shine upon
my face
. The creature had no stomach for
such a repast. My body, she might have digested
but my faceby heaven! she had better been stuffed
with broken junk bottles, three corned brick bats, and
shattered cast iron.
Sir, said I, (I saw the light approaching)
look at
me, now
.
The light flashed upon my face, while I spokeand
the man turned pale; he did, indeed.
Sir, said I, you have dared to treat me, to night,
as a boy. Taking advantage of your size, and
profession
,
you have said that to me, for which, if you did not
wear a black coat, I would have horsewhipped you.
You are surprised at this plainness. It is my nature.
You have voluntarily thrown off the protection of your
sacred office; its conciliatory manner; dignity, and
calmness
;
and come unto personal collision with a man,
having
all the infirmities of man.
I continued, until he shook in every joint. Will you
go with me? said he, to the next magistrate? No,
said I.
Will you wait here, till I can send for you?
I will
.
He left us; and I soon followed him to the
magisstrate's
office. When I entered, I found him, behind a
sort of counter, uncovered; and walking about, in great
agitation: two or three persons there; and the
magistrate
,
a fat, good natured, sensible looking Dutchman,
and one of his own congregation too!for my judge.
I could hardly speak. I was inconceivably alarmed;
yet nobody observed it. I saw that
his
story had been
told; and that he had full possession of the magistrate's
mind. I was angry, indignant, buta thought struck me.
Might I not obtain a greater triumph, by turning the
tables upon the man
here
, than anywhere else? If I
could change the opinion of
that
man, the magistrate, it
would bea victory indeed!
I began, therefore (like the Vicar of Wakefield, when
he had sinned, and was afraid of reproof,) to
accuse
. I
took a firm, confident tone; charged
that
man,
there
,
as a minister of heaven, with a most unbecoming and
outrageous violation of duty: demanded his evidence;
and repeated, (for on the way, I had been dared to
repeat
it, and I knew that there was no danger in it,) that,
had he not been a clergyman, I should have
horse-whipped
him, for his insolence to me.
Horeswhipped him!
exclaimed the fat magistrate,
with a look of unutterable horrour.
Horsewhip the
Lord's anointel!
That is not a christian spirit.
No! said I, I am no
christian
.
No christian!
echoed helooking at me, as if he
expected
to see the blue flame issue from my mouth.
I had gone far enough, now. It had always been a
favourite theory with me, that, if you would make a man
laugh heartily, you should begin with making him weep;
and that, if you would make a woman weep, you must
begin
with making her laugh. Violent transitions are
naturalI would sooner undertake to convert the
confirmed
enemy of religion, than its lukewarm friend
into a devotee. I would sooner undertake to win that
woman, heart and soul, who
hated
me; trembled at my
voice; and wept with shame, and terrour, and anger at
my name, than any other. Here was a fair
opportunity
.
The magistrate, the minister, and the whole
assembly
were solemn as death. I determined to set
them laughing. They were mortally prejudiced against
me. Could I not change their horrour and hatred to
admiration? They shook at my irreligion; could I not
make their hearts heave with sympathy? They
believed
me a trespasser upon the holy place; a
profaner
of God's temple; liable to exemplary punishment;
could I not change their whole expectation; and make
them tremble for the consequence of their suspicion to
themselves? They expected concession from
me
.
Could I not obtain concession from
them?
I could. I
did. Reader,
it is a fact
, I did all this.
To make them think better of my piety. I added
in the same tone, with my last remark. NoI am
no christian! I know but few that are christians. I
hold it a high and responsible titleone that few men
can deserve. To be a
christian
, to my view, is to be,
not merely a creature born in a christian land; but to
be a meek and lowly one; acquainted with sorrow. No,
I am not a
christian;
I never may be; but, I could bow my
forehead to the dust before any that
is
.
The transition was amazing! A glance or two was
interchanged, at first, between the clergyman and the
magistrate:but, before I had concluded, for I said
much more, in a deep, tranquil, earnest tone, that I
knew would tell, they had forgotten to look at each
other. Their eyes were rivetted upon
me
with an
expression
of wonder; and something, abundantly more
favourable to me.
I then gave the minister a severe lecture on his own
forgetfulness of duty: called for his witnesses; repeated
a long part of his sermon; rebuked him for his
imprudence
,
at church; and, at my room; and explained my
conduct. He was astonished, thunder struck,
agitated
.
I told him why I had risen; and showed him what
might have been the consequence, had I pursued my
intention
at the door. He became more mild; hinted that
he would be content with an apology; and a promise
never to disturb any church again!
P
What! said I, after I have told you, that my
disposition
was very serious; that I arose, not to insult you,
but to fulfil your commands; that I yawned, not because
I was weary of your worship; but because, I had been
up late; that I laughed at such and such things, (
describing
the candle, and the women, &c. so vividly, that,
in a few moments, both of them were convulsed with
laughterand all the company joined,) do you look
for such a foolish contradiction of myself?
Nothing of all this had been seen. You saw nothing
improper, you say.Who did?The women
are they
pious
? They say that, in prayer-time, I was
ogling the girls. Where were
their
eyes, to discover
this? SirI wish that you would carry me to see some of
these pious ladies. I will give them a hint or two, about
their mode of airing themselves, that will tend greatly
to a more orderly mode of worship among you. (I, then,
described their mode of sitting; he coloured, and
looked
ashamed)No, sirI cannot contradict myself. I
have no apology to offer. I have told you what I did,
and why. Where was your
charity?
Charity hopeth
all things. You have condemned me, unheard.
You
saw nothing amiss, except, what you now confess that
you had misconceived. Yet, you take the report of a
woman, who ought to have had no eyes, no ears, no
feeling, when at prayer, for aught but the service; you
charge me with a most shameful and uninterrupted
out-rage
upon your formsand they are your witnesses.
Sir, it is false. Confront me with them. I, then,
proceeded
till
I was, really, so vehement and lordly, that
I astonished myself. I did not believe that it was in
me. I had never heard my own voice, before. It
appeared
to me, that I was inspired. Never had I used
such language, such argument, or such gesture. My
thoughts were burning and transparent; and there
seemed a self-arranging power in my words, that I
wondered at, when the tumult had subsided; and I
thought over the whole, in the solitude and darkness of
my own chamber. Two of my points were now gained!
Nosaid II cannot promise, never to do these
things again, for they are involuntary; but
this
, I will
promise: never to hear
you
again, if I can help it.
And then, I continued, with a severe, close, and rapid
criticism, upon his whole discourse; threw in some
allusions
to Whitfield, Jeremy Taylor, Blair, Wesley and
others;told some anecdotes, till I could see the eyes of both
glowing; and the lips of all, parting with a new spirit.
I went further; I told no falsehood; but I
knew
yes,
I
knew
that, without uttering one word of
cant
, I made
them all reverence my religious feeling;and yet, I
did not humour them!
And now, said I, look to yourselves! What have
you done? Arrested a stranger, and brought him a
prisoner, before youfor what? What is the crime?
This.(I repeated the charges.) Rememberit is not
your opinion
, by which I am to be tried
you
are not to
say, whether my laughing and yawning were
intentional
or involuntary. That is for others to saya
jury
.
And who are your witnesses? Your own congregation!
Are you not ashamed of your own blindness? They
are disqualifiedincompetentthey are your
parishioners
,
and a party in the affair.
They were both confounded, I could perceivefor,
neither remembered that it was a misdemeanor, of which
I stood charged; and, of course, that these people
were
witnesses; or that, at least, some could be found, who
had no interest. No!but they were terrified and
awed by my manner. Who was I?Nobody knew. My
coming was mysterious; and, as we are prone to the
marvellous, they began to think that I was, really,
something
extraordinary, in
disguise
.
I proceeded.Are you aware of the consequences?
You have detained me. You are subject to an
action
of false imprisonment. Keep me but a single hour,
and I will never leave you
never
, till I obtain a
judgment
,
that shall be an example, for ever, to such
off-hand
gentry.Gentlemen, please to take notice.I
shall hold these men answerable, for all losses, that may
arise out of this matter; and I warn them to release me,
immediately.
I could perceive the effect. They took a lower tone;
and, finally, would you believe it! upon my honour it is
trueinstead of making any concession, or being
imprisoned
,
as I deserved to bethe most satisfactory
apologies were made to
me
. I was promised, that I
should see my accusers, face to face, the very next day;
and they shook hands with me, respectfully, with tears
in their eyes, all round;and sent me home, in peace!
What a revolution! Yet, this was not all. When I
called, the next day, on the good man, the preacher, to
accompany him, on a visit to the ladies, who had
accused
me; for that, I had insisted on, lest they should
be led to suppose, that the apology had come from
me
, I found him
so
humble;
so
contrite;
so
civil, that I
abandoned the scheme; and, at his own
particular
request
,
walked through the city with him, side by side,
to show the people, as he expressed it,
that we were on
truly amicable terms!
Yes, reader, that is every word true; and, out of it,
has grown many an important lesson to
me
. I learnt
that punishment, prejudice, disgrace, may be always
avoided, by a little presence of mind, firmness, and
steadiness! even, though our heart fail usor even
where, as in my case, I had no heart at all, and my
blood was like water.
CHAPTER X.
Awkward recounter on the house-tops...Reflections...
Very
sublime
...
Very
...Illustration of do as you would be done by....
Merchandise...A Kentuckian...Patience! patience! patience!...
Peter Raymond.
There
is one eventit must not be forgotten
which has just obtruded itself, like a spectre, upon my
memory. I am sorry for it. It will wear, when I tell
it, as it isand all the dark, terrible consequences
are seen...but an unlovely countenance. It will make
you hate me, reader. Very well; I cannot help it. I
have set out, to tell the truth; and I
will
tell itin
expiation
,
if it may be; and then, lay me down and die.
Many things, very many, have I done, in the heat and
hurry of my blood; many, in the cool, dispassionate
movement of an evil spirit; but, I know of none, that lies
more heavily upon my heart, than this. It is not that I
did
what was an unpardonable sin. Noit is not that;
but it is, that I meditated, what, had I not been stayed,
by some hand, stronger than a mortal hand, would
have sent me, headlong, broken, shattered and mangled,
a murdererbefore my Judgewith my victim in my
armsa self murderer, toodying, in the very moment
of consummation. My God!My God!Why hast
thou
not
forsaken me!I stopI look at myselfat
my handsand shudder, all over. Can it be! I
ask myselfthat one, so feeble, so very feeble of heart
and limb, as I am now, can ever have meditated so
much--or achieved so much, of desperate wickedness, as
I have. Surely, it isno, nowould heaven it
were!
a dream. Let me tell it.
I was about eighteen. I was a clerk in a store. Near
me, there lived, the only young man, with whom I was
at all intimate. His master had a mortal aversion to
me,
then
(but that time had soon passed) and his head
clerk, a tall, thin man, hated me, yet more fervently.
It was winter. I was upon the roof of the store, (that,
P 2
of my master, was in the same row) shovelling off the
snow. The young man, of whom I spoke, was
employed
,
in the same way, over the store of his master. I
stood, after some little frolicking, by the front wooden
railing, and looked down, where I saw the head clerk,
whose name was Weaver. He was occupied in cutting
a way, through a high snow drift, in front of the door.
This was a matter of pastime, with us all, at that day,
like snow-balling. A shovel-full of snow rested upon
the railing; and I snapped some of it off, with my finger,
once or twice; so that it fell upon Weaververy
innocently
.
I assure you.
Directly after, I heard a good deal of bustle and
out-cry
,
in the street; and saw several people running over,
to the opposite side, as if to see what was doing upon
the roof where I was. While I was endeavouring to
conjecture the cause, I heard Weaver's voice, calling,
insolently enough, to be sure, to my companion, to
come down!
He
obeyedvery quietly; and, the next
moment, I saw a hand, with a horse-whip, followed by
an inflamed visage, emerging from the scuttle. I
could hardly believe my senses. I did not believe it
possible that any man, and least of all, that man, would
attempt to horse-whip
me
. But, I was not long
permitted
to doubt; for, the moment that he was fairly
upon
his feet, he began to draw the lash through his hand;
sayingnow my fine fellow,I have come to give it
to you. I have born your insolence, long enough!
I took the liberty to interrupt him. The whip was
raised. There was little time to be lost. Without the
whipsuch was the difference in our age; and such the
effect, of a constitutional reverence in me, for all that
were men, when I was a boy, that I am sure he could
have flogged me; perhaps with little trouble; but, I felt
equally sure, that, if he touched me oncebut
once
,
though it were accidentally,
with that whip
that he
would, probably, never leave the roof of the building,
alive.
Stop! said I. I could hardly utter a sound. I was
mortally afraid, and trembled violently. I was
choking
.
I only put up my handless, by heaven, in
supplication
for myself, than for him.
Do
notWeaver,
do
not touch me with the whip! said I.
He mistook me. He mistook my raised arm, for
supplication
.
He flourished the whip. I saw it in the air;
but, ere it fellere he could draw his breathor utter
a cryit was wrenched from his handbroken
hurled
into the streetand he was under me, in the snow.
Another moment!and I held him in my arms, and
was pressing against the wooden balustrades, with a
full determinationheaven have mercy on me!to
precipitate
him, and myself, headlong, upon the pavement
below. I pressed, and pressed, till he turned black in
the face with horrour; and the railing creaked
yielded
!
Another moment! and I had prevailed!another
moment! and we had both gone to hell together! But
somethingsomebodywas it a mortal hand?
plucked
me back; and I fell, overcome with exertion
breathless
,
and blinded, into the snow. He was upon me; but
so terrified, so incapable of taking any advantage of
me, though I lay, like a dead body, for a time, under
himthat, at last, I upheaved him, andI know not
howbut he disappeared down the scuttle, with the
speed of a wild beastdiscomfited at the mouth of her
own den.
Where was I? I knew not. My brain whirled.
The dry snow melted from my hair, and in my bosom,
till I was drenched with it. I ran down the ladder
nearly delirious with passion; went to the store where
he was; and, had he not retreated within itstood in
the door; and defended himself with an iron shovel, till
I had come to my senses, I should have strangled him.
Reader, look at this page
this!
Are the letters red?
Do they look as if traced in flame? Hear meif that
manhe is now in heaven, poor fellow!but he knows
that it is true;had he but touched me with the lash of
that whip, I would never have forgiven him
never!
never!
till his eyes were crushed from their sockets;
andEnoughit is too horrible. I shall go mad, if
I think of it. Thank heaven!O, thank heaven, that
it did
not
touch me!
And yetwould it be believed?though I would
rather
be shot through the heart, than be struck with a
horsewhip, I have been, oncenay, twiceon the point
of horsewhipping a man, for a mere trifle; and that too,
once, in the presence of his own wife. A fool, a knave,
and a consummate liar, whose impertinence I had born
for the sake of his handsome, vulgar wife, till I could
bear it no longer, once told me somethingI know not
what, and another might not have taken notice of it
at a large dinner table. I looked at him; and, for a
moment, it was a question with me, whether I should
spring over the table, collar him, and kick him out of
the room; or wait till he was in bed with his wife, and
horsewhip him there, in her chamber. But, he was
so
contemptible, that I merely looked at him, and said
O, how silent they all were!Look you, sirit is
nothing
but the presence of your
wife
nothing elsethat
saves you. But for her, I would take you by the nose,
this moment; lead you to the door; and horsewhip you
the whole length of the street. What more could I
say? The creature bore it; and he was so abject, that
what
could
I do to him, after that? Nothing. But, a
relation of his seemed inclined to take up the matter
a stout, formidable, determined fellow; and, one day,
he called me to him, as he stood at the corner of a
street, with a cowskin, or rattan, in his hand. I
expected
I
know not what; but the affair was soon
settled
.
I was prepared for him; and his brains would
have spattered the pavement, in the twinkling of an
eye, if he had raised the whip. I led him to a little,
snug room, wherehe utterly forgot his object; and
we parted, mutually disposed to cut each other's throats,
on the first decent pretenceat the first convenient
opportunity
.
It has never arrived; but it
may
, when we
least expect it; for my part, I care not how soonfeeble
as I amold as I amcoward as I amI have that
left within me, which would give a bloody account of
any human creature, who had once dared even to
think
of horsewhipping me.
You would imagine, perhaps, that I am quarrelsome.
I am not; that is, I am not the
first
to quarrel. I never
insult another, first. I am willing to give the first
blow; or the first word; or the first look; but never the
first provocation; and, where I feel assured of my
power
.
I can forbear a long time. Let me give two or three
instances; few men have shown more patience than I,
under injurywhere I was pretty
sure
of the event. I
will begin with the
first
that I can recollect.
I was living in a large town; and, late one winter
night, I was going home, with two other young men,
when we heard some scuffle ahead; and, on coming up,
found a number of young men,
chock full o' fight
, as
they say in New-England. I interfered directly; and
a pestilent little fellow took it exceedingly in dudgeon;
threw off his jacket, and began to flourish his fists
about. At first, I thought of quieting hima single
blow would have done it, for a fortnight; but a little
more reflection, showed me the folly of such a
procedure
.
There were a dozen, to be sure, of their party,
and only three of ours; but, I am sure, that neither of
usat least, one of us, I am sure, could have thrashed
the whole number. But, the more conciliatory I was,
the more obstreperous were they; and, it was with some
difficulty, I assure you, that I was able to get away, at
all, without striking some one of them.
We had gone about a dozen rods, when, elated at our
meekness, the young rascals hurraed, and set up a
shout. I stopped; listened; heard what it was; threw
off my cloak, in the street; and, with the others at my
heels, dashed into them. The affair was over in a
moment
:
not more than a dozen blows were struck; and
one of them, by a companion of mine, had floored the
largest of the gang. So ended that affair.
I was a merchant; but I had learned to resist
indignity
,
though I
was
a merchant. It had often been my
duty to kick somebody out of my store; or, to give some
man a card, requesting him never to set his foot in it
again: and, one day, a stout fellow, a Kentuckian, had
bought some trifle of me; and one of my young men
was packing it up, when he thought of making a new
bargain for it. I smiledand, as he appeared rather
dissatisfied, told him to leave it. My manner was kind,
I am sure. The article was unpacked, and returned
He still lingered; and, at last, I was persuaded to have
it packed up again, for him. But a second timemay
I be hanged, if he did'nt!the rascal had the impudence
to say, that he would'nt take it.
Won't you? said I.
We shall see
.
He was twice my size. I had only one clerk in the
store; and he was too much afraid of
me
, to be of any
service, in such an affair.
I went to the door; locked it; and approached my
man; fully determined to beat his thick skull in
if I
could!
He planted himselfbut it would'nt do. There
was something in my manner, that frightened him. He
pulled out his old leathern pocket book; counted the
money, with a trembling hand; muttered that it was
no better than robbery; and then, went into a
neighbour's
store, (I heard of it, at dinner) and there swore
most terribly, that he would go back, and murder that
damned, infernal, impudent
Irishman
, that kept
above! It was with no little difficulty, that he was
pacified; but, when he found that I was a yankeeonly
a yankeehe foamed at the mouth;and never came
near me again.
Was I not patient there? Who would have been
more so?
Again.A man had taken great and continued
liberties
with me, for a long time; we had boarded together,
and both of us were overgrown boys. One day, I had
returned from sporting. The room was dark, when I
entered; the family were all about the table; and I was
so blinded by the change, that I could not see. Both
of my hands were full of shot. I was about sitting
down, when he pushed away the chair, with his foot;
and I fellunable to help myself, of course; because
the hands always contract upon whatever they hold, in
fallingwith the back of my head upon a broad iron
stove. It was a wonder that my skull was not fractured
upon the spotor the stove. What did I do? What!
I neither drove a knife into his ribs; nor blew out his
brains, with the fowling piece at my side; nor broke a
chair over his head. NoI was too patient, by far,
for that; and there were ladies at the table. So, I
contented
myself with cursing him, till I was hoarse, and
black in the face, for all the scoundrels, poltrons, and
cowards, that ever lived. Was I not patient? But, if
I was, what think you of
his
patience? He bore it all,
like a lamb.
Again.At a tea-tableof which a word by and bye,
for the
ladies
or, what I reverence a thousand times
more, the
women
I was once obliged, in my own
defence
,
to throw a gallon of boiling hot water into the
face of a sea captain; who, while he was abusing me,
held a sharp pointed knife at my bosom, and dared me
to raise my arm. Fool! The women had been his
protection
till thennot my patience, or my cowardice;
but, when they saw my eyes, they fled; and we were
alone. It was about that time, that I began to discover
in the face of every body that came near me, an
expression
of concern, anxiety, and compassion. I know not
why it was. I was not mad; nor in a consumption; nor
so strangely fashioned; that men's faces should alter,
and their voices change, the moment, that they spoke
to me. Yet, so it was. And the womenheaven give
me patience!no matter how full of festivity were
their young heartstroubled me in the same way.
They might say that I frightened them; but they
frightened
me a great deal more, I assure you. What had I
done, that they should never speak to me, but in a
whining, melancholy, piteous tone, as if I were half
way into my grave? Why did their eyes alter; and why
were their countenances fallen? But, let me return.
I stood, with the boiling hot water at my side, in a tin
tea-kettle. I told him what I would do. He laughed
at me; defied me; and swore, by his Maker, that, if I
threw a drop upon him, or even moved my arm, he
would stab me to the heart; nay, he called me a
coward
.
That was enough. I caught up the kettleburning
hot as it wasbetween both handsand hurled it at
him; just so that his descending arm and knife,
encountered
it;it glanced, and wounded me in the temple.
It probably saved his life, and my own. He did not
die, to be surebut he might as well have died; for his
face was scarred all overand mine soon healed.
Now, for the tea-table. Woman, let your first
question
be, if you want to know the character of a man
Does he love tea?
for, if he love tea, he must be in good
healtha temperate mana domestick mana
regular
manfond of the company of women; and,
consequently
,
not
fond of grogtobacco
nor any strong
liquor
nor
addicted to the society of menwhich is a
very bad symptom. He had better be a solitary.
Nay, I have been patient on other occasions, more
trying. I have bowed to a man, that, I knew, ought to
feel it an honour, to be permitted to bow to me; and I
have seen him turn round, without returning it, and
smile in the face of another. And yet, he is alive at
this moment. Was I not patient?
Am
I not? What
did I? I merely went up to him, while he shook, as if
he were about to be summoned to his death; and the
man that stood by him, a large man, quaked in his
shoes, too. I can see them now. I merely went up to
him, and told him, thatmerely that---nothing more,
I assure you---my manner was very kind---that he
owed his safety to his insignificance; that, it was
condescension
in me to bow to him; that he knew it; that,
in short, (I was afraid I should die, before I could finish
the expostulation.) I would put him to death, where he
stood, but for my pity and contempt for him; that I
would now only put him upon his guard; else he might,
some day or other, offend some gentleman, without
knowing it, who might condescend to kick him, till the
breath had left his body. Was'nt I
patient?
And once more---only once more---I am weary of
these things---the very memory of them is hateful to
me---painful and hot, like recent anger. A scoundrel,
who had defrauded me out of a handsome sum of money,
came to me; and proposed referring to me, for his
character
;
promising to pay me, out of the proceeds of such
goods as he should so purchase. His name was Peter
Raymond. It is a pity that he should not be known.
What did I? Did I strike him to the earth; leap upon
him; and crush him to death? No;---I merely told him
that, if he ever dared to come within reach of my
arm, for the next ten thousand years, I would beat the
breath out of his body, or
soul
, as the case might be!
with a few other things, that, to him, for he was much
of a gentleman, it seemed, were inconceivably
unpleasant
.
And now, reader, I have done with
thee
, for
awhile.
Q
CHAPTER XI.
Boyhood...Love...First gushing of the heart...Fine specimen of
an unfinished sentence...Sleep...Reflections...Love in a child
...Lydia...Jealousy...Desperation....Hammond the Dwart...
Reflections...Death of Lydia.
Back
to my boyhood, again!to the sweet lips and
eyes of my beloved Elizabeththe summer time of my
young heart, when it was perpetually in flower, and
the blood rippled through it, making melody all the
day long, like the inward worshipping of a devout, and
innocent spirit. Aye, back to my boyhood, love! Wilt
thou follow me? The season of perfume, and purity,
when every hope sprang, pinioned, like a butterfly, from
my thought; and I was happyO,
so
happy, in spite of
all my suffering, thatthat my eyes run over, at this
moment, while I am thinking of it.
Though absent, I remember thee!
It was the first
motto, the very
first
, that was ever imprinted upon my
heart! I was made to love. I have lovedloved!O
how passionately!how deliriously! Yet, that line,
written, when my lips first learned to thrill at the touch
of woman's, that line may be read there, yet. I would
but I cannotI am too much agitatedthese crowding,
interminable, immeasurable thoughts, are painful to
me. I feel a sense of soreness, all over me, as of
over-wrought
enjoyment, intense, electrical, and very faint,
herejust
here
, about the region of the heart, that is
intolerable. I will go to bed. To-morrow night, if it
please heaven, I will take up the tale again, and tell a
kinder story; show my mocked and chafed spirit, with
a lovelier countenance.
Morning
.
I have slept since,
not
like a babe, upon the bosom of
a mother; but, like some timid bird, blown off, and
afar, from the green island that it loved; and
slumbering
upon the uneasy billowperpetually, though her
eyes be closedlifting her ruffled pinion, with an
agitated
,
tremulous movement, as if she were
falling
.
Such hath been my sleep. My senses have been shut;
but, wherever I trod, in my sleep; wherever I lay, I went
like the land-bird, dreaming upon the water; there was
foraye an unquiet motion about me, that worried me,
likeno. I will not attempt to compare itthere is
nothing in life;
that
I have learnt, sorrowfullynothing
in death;
that
I verily
believe;
and I shall soon be on the
way of
knowing
with equal certaintyso desolate and
frightful, as that agitated, cold dreaming. It is just as
ifgracious God! is it not?as if you were a dead
body
,
driven by the wind and waveand conscious of it
a sleeping man, tangled in the green, slippery
sea-weed
;
drifting away, all night long, over the dark and
glittering population of the deep wateras if all your
limbs were knotted and woven about, by thin, slender
snakes. But, why do I dwell upon it? Would I delay
the sweet consummation of all my suffering?put off
the evil day, as it hath been called, when I shall lie
down quietly, and dream notmingling blood, and
heart, and being, with Emmamy own dear Emma
O! I cannotreaderI
cannot
go on;forgive me,
awhileI
II am resolved. I have re-seated myself,
determined
to look steadily upon the past, the beautiful past,
with all its painted deceptions; and recount all that,
which hath reduced me, step by step, to what I am. I
have delayed it long. I have paused, and paused, and
procrastinated, and postponed, and fainted over the
work, until, if I mean to do it at all, I
must
go about
it, heart and soul; and toil, diligently; yea, very
diligently
,
night and daytill it be completed. Is it not
strange? I began it with reluctance; but, my heart
hath grown to it, at last; until I feel, that, when I have
done with it, I shall have nothing else to do, but to lay
me down, and die.
You would believe, from the continual and impious
levity, with which I have spoken of sacred things, since
our acquaintance; (for, are we
not
acquainted?) and
from the frightful vividness of my narration, where
blood has been my theme; and, from the apparent
fondness
that I had to scenes of outrage and violence; that
I have no heart. You are mistaken. You would be sure
that I have no tenderness; no feeling of reverence for
that Almighty Being, whose very name ought not to
be pronounced, or written, but with locked hands, and
downcast eyes, and bended knees; but, you would do
me wrong. I
do
reverence
that
Being. I do delight
to contemplate Him, as the
Only One
, to whom I am
accountable, even for what I am now saying
now!
while darkness is upon the earth; and the silence of the
grave about me. Why then have I permitted myself to
write the awful name so frequently, and so idly, upon
these pages? My answer is simply this. Every page
is a transcript of my thought. Whenever I have used
it, it has been, however it may appear, not from an idle
habit, but from a settled design. I would do that
naturally
here, which all do naturally in the world.
I
would write, as I talk
. I may be wrong. I am soI
feel that I am, in profaning his name; yet, as I cannot
be a hypocriteand, as I have set out with a great
design
,
of putting all the evil, and all the good, of my
nature, before you, I have not flinched from this; but I
shall be more scrupulous, hereafter. Hitherto, I have
rambled more, than I shall henceforth.
No tenderness in my heart!
Can
you believe it?
Do
you? follow me yet a little while; and hear me tell,
as I shall try to, simply and naturally, what things
have happened to me, in my boyhood; and then, judge
ye all of me. I pretend to nothing of sentiment I cannot
readily weep; I never whine, never complain,
never!
but,
if a heart thatno matter; follow me.
You would not readily believe, I suppose, that a
child of ten or twelve years of age, could feel the
passion of love. You would smile, I have no doubt;
and throw aside the book that told of such a love, as an
idle and preposterous fabrication. Yet, ridiculous as
it is, I
did
love, and love truly, before I was twelve
years of age. You laugh. But hear me out. I am in
no mood for trifling. I call not
that
love, which all
children
feel from their cradles to their graves, of the same
nature, for baby-houses, hoops, dolls, carriages,
husbands
,
wives and babies. No, but I call
that
love,
which thins a poor creature like the consumption;
bleaches the lips; lights up the eyes with a sad,
mournful
,
rich, and melancholy lustre; sets one a trembling
at the sound of another's voice; and keeps the untold
name, like the musick of a sorcerer, buried in the heart,
to be used only at midnightthat which wets the
pillow
with bitter, yet pleasant tearstakes away the
appetitesets people about all the occupation of the
day, like automata
that
which, when it is felt, will
not let you sleep; leads you to solitary places; and seals
up your mouth like death, so that you dare not, cannot
tell the secret.
Is not that love? If it be, and later days have made
to me a sorrowful certainty that it is-then did I feel
love
,
true, and devout, and awful love, before I was twelve.
And if that be love, which the world
calls
so; that sweet
uneasiness to be nearer, nearer, and yet more near,
to some sweet one:that which never weeps, never!
and, dares to betray itself, before all the world, by its
attention; that which courts not the shadowy and silent
place, where it may lie alone, and muse, and tremble
with its own inexpresible thought; but goeth abroad, with
an offering in its hand; telling its love to all the world
even
to the beloved one!if
that
, be love, I felt itfor
I felt
that
before I was nine years of age.
Pardon me, if I dwell upon it for a moment. So
hateful was my home to me, after the death of my dear
mother, and my poor little brotherand Fidelethat I
could not abide it for an hour. Even Elizabeth, she
whom I so love yet,she could not support me against
the incessant malignity of Sammy Kellymy life was
a burden to me. Near this time, I happened to meet
with a little creature, about my own age; and, soon
after
,
was happy enough to get into the same school with
her. I began to love her;but I made a secret of it.
I wrote little childish notes; crowded them into chesnut
shells; threw them over the school upon her bench; and,
although she did not give me any answer, I
succeeded
Q 2
in getting three or four distinct and emphatick
floggings
in
reply
from the master, for my trouble;but
what cared I for such things? Martyrdom, I knew,
was all moonshine to your
true lovyers
. Beside, mine
was one of the most orthodox passions in the world. I
loved one, who did not care a fig for me: and she, I
believe
,
loved another boy, who did'nt care a fig for her.
Even then, I had read of Petrarch and Laura; and learnt
what jealousy was; for, I hated that handsome boy, to
his dying day, almost for her preference of him. At
lastnow for an unequivocal proof, indeedI set about
making some poetry at her;my first notion was like
that of all beginnersto make an acrostick. You
will laugh at my simplicity. I was never made for a poet;
but, I persevered, and, with the labour of a whole
evening
,
when my uncle thought that I had the mumps; and the
loss of one night's sleepI, at last, perpetrated one line;
what it was, I do not remember nowa great pity, I
confess, where one is writing his own biographybut
the next was insurmountable. Her name was
Lucy
.
The L, I had managed; but, for my right hand, I could
not imagine another word that began with U, except
uncle; and
that!
ah I could not think of immortalizing
my uncle in my poetry. He was too hateful to me. So,
I gave up the acrostick; and! loved on, like the
sunflower
,
through shadow and shine, tillas it hath always
happened to them, that I have loved,she got
miserably
marriedpoor girl!
Butbear with me, now, reader. I
do
feel what I
am now saying. The sweet, innocent creature, of
whom I am about to speak, now, I
did
love, truly;
and even
now
, I could throw by my pen; cover my face
with my hands, and weep plentifully, at the memory of
her pale countenance, and holy, dark-lashed eyes.
They were very beautiful; and she, so timid, that I never
heard her speak aloud, when I was nigh. If every passion
was pure and intense, mine, for that child, was. I was
the younger of the two; and she, I believe, rather
taller
than I; but very graceful. I never spoke to her; I
never uttered her name; I never thought of her, but
with a strange feeling of shame and alarm; as if I were
profaning somewhat, that I would die to shield from
profanation. I was very awkward, and rude;such,
at least, was my character;yet
she
never thought me
so, I am sureNot that she was blind, or that I ceased
to be awkward when with her. No! for my
embarrassment
then
was so oppressive to us both, that neither
was sensible, I am sure, of aught but the other's
presence
.
I believe that she loved meI love to believe so,
yet. It is a comfort to me, even now, with my scarred
and bruised heart to believe, that so pure and holy a
creature
did once really love me. It gave me a better opinion
of myselfand more confidence in hereafter. You
know that women are always in advance of us; always,
at least, in sensation, growth and character; that a girl
of ten will have more of maturity, in her manner, than a
boy of fourteen; and that just at the age of twelve, when
a stout boy is exactly the awkwardest of human
creatures
,
except perhaps, a girl of ten,a sensitive
delicate
girl, has many of the truest feelings of passion
and love for such a boyI know thisI have felt it.
In comparison with me, Lydiaher name was Lydia
was a
woman;
and her endearing manner; her beautiful,
innocent, self-posession; her kind, benignant way
there was something in it, that would have awed me, had
I been a man. Nay, I began to have the feeling of a man.
I rose above the boys that were above me. I began to
love Elizabeth, (I do not like to call her Catharine,
though my father used never call her by any other name)
more like a brother, because Lydia, loved her;and I
soon learnt to bear, whatever that little imp of Satan,
my brother Sammy Kelly, chose to inflict upon me.
Nay, I went further. My heart began to heave with
ambition; my arteries, to beat with unknown thought.
And yetas I am a living manthe only notion that
I had of my own ailment, or of the remedy for it, was,
thatif I could only steal to her side when she was
sleepingin the shadow of some great treeput my
lips to her cheekand feel her soft hair, like auburn
gossamerblowing upon my foreheadI would lie
down there, and remain for ever and ever, afterward,
without stirring or breathing.
That one should love at so early an ageand love as
few men, and fewer women, ever have, or ever will
love,with deep terrour and tenderness,is certainly
a marvel; butwhat think you of jealousy, at twelve,
downright, burning, deadly jealousy;that, which
turns the heart green, and the eyes blood shot, in a
single nighteven
that
did I learn to feel at that age.
The first pangO, I shall never forget itit was just
as if a frozen serpent had suddenly coiled itself about
my heart, and struck into itwith one bloweven to
the core. I had not seen her for many daysnot for
many
days;and it had begun to bear upon me, when,
one evening, I happened to go by the door, and saw a
man; a full grown man standing upon the steps, and
talking; nay, romping with her. I stoppeda strange
dizzines and darkness fell upon me. I put my hand to
my eyes. I knew not where I was for a moment:a
mortal coldness stole down the ends of my fingers; and
I had a strange, melancholy notion that I was going to
die. I went by, however; I walked on, heedless of my
wayhour after hourand I found myself, at last,
near the water. It was quite dark; and the family, I
knew, would expect me. I thought of it; but, the
family
,
all at once; and even Elizabeth, were like strangers to
me. How came I by the water? I know notit had
been a place of bathing for me, many a summer before;
but I had forgotten it, so long was it that I had not
been there. Had some evil spirit led me thither? I sat
down upon the wharf; and looked about me, utterly
forgetful of the lateness of the hourthe deep, deep
silence about me; and the alarm that my absence might
occasion at home. It was somewhat chillyand the
water was beautifully dark and tranquil:Not a
ripple
would be seen or heard; not one!yet, I sat there,
while the tide was rising, until I was nearly
encompassed
by the water, as if I had been gradually sinking
into it. It had arisen about me; the tide was coming
in, with a continual, silent, shining swelland my feet
were wetthe rock upon which I sat, was unsteadied
the town was afar offand hushed into an awful
repose
and
now and then, a dim light could be seen
upon
the hill behind me, or on the opposite shore. I
thought of Lydia;and soon found that I had been
weeping; for, when I lifted my hands, from my knees
where they had been holding on. I know not how long,
they felt strangely cold, and, as I put them to my face, I
found it was wetand that my mouth was covered with
tears. I knew it notit was sweet to weep as I had
wept, without knowing it. Still my thought ran
upon
Lydia. I might die, I said to myself; perhaps she
would think of me,
then;
perhaps, weep for me,
then
, as I
now wept for her, and wish
perhaps
, that she had never
permitted another---toAh heaven!
That
thought nearly strangled me. I stood upright
all at once, the rock turned, and I was up to my
middle
in water. I was just ready to plungeand for ever!
when I recollected that the keys of the warehouse, which
were entrusted to me, were in my pocket. I took them
out; and was wading to the shore, with the same
feeling
of unutterable loneliness, when it occurred to me,
weary as I was of life, that it would be cruel to afflict my
dear sister; and her, who was so immeasurably dear to
me, by permitting them to know that I had drowned
myself, intentionally; and, therefore, I determined to
strip; leave my clothes upon the wharf, a little higher
up, where a ship was building; and then, perpetrate the
deed. This I did, in the hope that they would suppose
then, that I had been drowned in bathing; for, I was
accustomed to bathe alone, at night. I did strip. I
threw myself in. I strove, terrified, giddy with fear,
as I was, to find the bottom; and to keep there; but, I
could not. My horrour of death buoyed me up. I
could not drown myself. I tried harddesperately
but, it was impossible. My muscles refused to obey my
mind. They would wrestle and leap, in spite of me; nay,
they saved me, in spite of myself; but, only to repeat
the attempt. I remember going to the bottom, the
second time, with my hands clasped, and locked upon
my bosom, and my mouth wide openfor, I was weary
of holding my breathand that is the last that I do
remember
;
for, when I came to myself, I was naked, and
lying upon the loose and decayed timber of the wharf;
where the tide had left me. I attempted to arisebut,
I was very sore, all over; and, on putting my hands to
my face, it felt stiff, and tornas if it were encrusted
with blood. Where was I? What had happened? I
soon remembered it alland turned, ashamed and
terrified
,
to look for my clothes. They were gone. My
first feeling was that of rage; and I certainly should
have leaped into the water, a third time, and never
have left it again, had it been deep enough for my
purpose
;
but, it was not; for, the tide had left me. I could
see the black slimy bottom; and I turned away from a
death like that, with loathing and hate. But, what was
to be done? I could not return through the town,
naked
,
cold, and shivering. While I was meditating on
this, with strange, agitated, bewildered eyes, like one
that cannot believe himself awake, I saw, what I took
to be some person, sitting, or lying, by a corner of the
cooper's shop, which stood upon the wharf. I spoke
a good deal alarmed; for, I knew that it was very
late, as the lights in town were done moving about; and
that
, in the light-house down the bay, could be
distinctly
seen. I spokeand a creature, that I soon found
to be a large dog, of the Newfoundland breed, came
to me. Next to my own clothes, nothing could have
been so welcome to me, as the shaggy coat of this
animal
.
He fawned upon me; and I observed that he was
drenched with wet. It was
he
he that had saved me. No.
I was mistakenfor, another creature soon appeared,
as if emerging from the darkness, carrying my clothes
in its arms. I trembled with terrour, as it
approached
.
It resembled my own brother; but, I had never
seen my brother employed in anything that looked like
kindness. I took them; but, could not help wondering
at the hideousness of the creature. It was not so large
as I, yet, the head was twice as big as mine; and the
voice was like a man's. I dressed; and, it was not,
until
my blood began to feel warm again, that I
discovered
,
by the strange rolling of his eyes, what it was. It
was Hammond the Dwarf. My flesh crept. He was
the horrour of the whole town. I instantly felt my
pockets, to see if they were rifled. I remembered his
preternatural strength; and how, when I had mocked
at him once, and spit upon himand laughed at his big
head, he had merely said, boy that he wasand the
tears gushed out of his eyes, when he said it.True!
true!big
head
big
head
but big
heart
too.
Had
he a big heart?If he had, why did he let me
beat him, and spurn him, and curse him, as he did?
Why had he pursued me, lame as he was; and hunted
me, within a few months, till Elizabeth, who knew
how hateful he was to me, had cautioned him not to
come near me? And why had he abandoned me, as he
did, uttering a threat, that chilled my very blood? Was
that his ferocious dog? Had he come now, for
vengeance
?
Why did he not speak? Why did he stand
there, just before me, with his great unwieldy head, as
if he saw me not?Such silence was intolerable. He
walked on, up the hilland he stopped;I could hear
him breathing hard. Might he not watch his
opportunity
,
and provoke the dog, that fierce creature, upon me?
I expected it. But he did not.
We went onhe never opened his lips, nor I, mine,
until I was in sight of my homenaynor even then,
but he called off the dog, and went his waylimping,
piteously. I turned round, and looked after himthere
were his long arms, and great feet, and waddling head
by heaven! it was like some monster, made by different
workmena piece at a timeat different jobsas if
one part had got cold, before the other was put to it
yet, my heart smote me, for my ingratitude; and, I
yearned to go after him, and saywould God,
Hammond
,
that you were not so hideously ugly! I
would
love
you, if I
could!
My foot was upon the doorand,
I saw him, as he turned the corner, under the lamp, put
his long hands together, in the air; and stop; and hold
down his head, for a moment, as if he were cruelly
affected
nay,
if my sight did not deceive me, there was
a motion of his hands, (we were not far apartand he
stood in the light of the lampbut, he could not see me)
as if he dashed away the water from his eyes.
I went to bed, and dreamed;ah! such dreams, of
frightfulness, fire and death! and, I awoke in the morning,
with a high fever. Still, still I thought of Hammond;
more, perhaps, than of Lydia; for, there was, I know
not what, something of an ugly soreness about
here
, that
troubled me. What right had I to laugh at him? Who
was he? what had he ever done to me, that was cruel,
base, or unkind? Nothing. Was it weakness that
made him so patient of insult? Oh, nohe had no
match for strength. Was he a coward?
he!
Hammond
a coward!he, who struck the master himself, once, in
the full school?No. What, then, had kept his hands
from me? I knew notunless he knew that I was a
coward, and was ashamed to beat me. Yet, I hated
him; and was willing to believe that, either he or his dog
had saved me. I could not bear to be under any
obligation
to him, or to think of it; and, the affair wore
gradually
off my mind; for, he soon went away, somewhere
to school, and we had heard nothing of him, for many
monthsAnd LydiaAh, that blossom had been
breathed upon. The purple of death was already
staining
it at the heart. I would not believe it. I had seen
her;and, for the first time, had dared to put my hand
into hers, and look her in the face. It was our
last
meeting!
Never shall I forget her countenance. It
was deadly pale, for a moment; and
then
, her hand
trembled; and I saw a pale shadow, rush over her temples,
and neck and lipsand then, through her half shut
eyes; there fell a moist, rich lightand there were
tears under the lids, tooI remember that, wellwell!
they
went directly into my heart.
We never met again
.
But, that light, and those tearsOh, I never shall
forget themand, when we meet again, for meet we
shall, if heaven be merciful to
me
I shall know her,
by them. I shall see her, just as we parted last. Years
have rolled away---centuries may follow---before we
meet; but, if she be unaltered, I shall remember her,
though we meet where it is
dark
---by the touch of her
soft little hand, and the kiss---the hasty, doubtful kiss,
that she left upon my eyelids, when I pulled her down
to me, in the convulsion and tenderness of my heart.
Yes, reader, she died
died
.I have brought
myself to write the word, as I did, many years ago, to
speak
it, when it was nearly death to me. She
died
and, when it was all over, and the loose earth had
lain, for many a day, unvisited, unwet, upon her dear
body--I went to it, and knelt down by it, and wept upon
it; not because I had heard of such things, or read of
them; but, simply, because it was very sweet to be near
her, as I most wished to be---now, that she was gone,
in tears. Heaven! of what materials are we made---
weeping at night, upon the ground---that has hardly
done echoing to the green sod, thrown upon a beloved
one---and wrestling, the day through, in mortal strife
with others. Her grave --it was aromatick....I knelt
upon itit is not long since...and the buried tenderness
of her young heart came up, out of the earth, like a
volatile
exhalation, to my sensesII had, well nigh,
never left it again---I.
R
CHAPTER XII.
Musing...Lydia...Temper...Mary...Emma..Matrimonial trial..
Jealousy...Reminisencies...Incident...Kissing...Before
marriage
...Mary
again...Another Mary.
It
was no light matter, with me, to forget Lydia.
I have set up in bed, at night(Elizabeth knows it
for, she hath found me, in the morning, there, with my
arms athwart, leaning, overcome with drowsiness,
against the wall.) all night long, and travelled over
every incident of my life, in which she had been
concerned
;
recalled the tone of her voicethat tender
musickthe wordsthe look of her eyes, when I felt
her heart throbbing against mine, till I shut my own,
with a sense of loneliness and rapture, while the tears
ran out of them, as if they had been squeezed out of
my eyeballs, half in pain, half in extacy. My eyes
would smart; and yet, for my life, I would not forego
the luxury of weeping.
It was a long, long time, that I thought of her,
dreamed of her; and my temper grew, even in my
solitary
musing, gentler, and more indulgent; as if she
were yet near me, with her compassionate dark eyes,
looking in upon my heart, and agitating the blood
there.
Do you doubt, now, that I loved, and
truly
, at so
early an age? You cannot. Such sympathies are not
to be misunderstood. Many years have passed; very
many; and yet, I cannot write that child's name, to this
hour, without emotion---a melancholy, sweet feeling, as
as if her tresses were blowing over my forehead, half
in delusion, half in reality.
It changed my temper, as I have said; for, I have
always
been prone to reflect that which I loved, whatever
it was; and I have loved, passionatelydevoutly
timidly
as
the creatures, that I loved, were passionate,
timid, or devout. Nay, it would not be too much to say
that, to this moment, there is a wandering melancholy
upon me, at times; and a mournful dreaming, as if of a
woman that did love, and dared not tell her love; nay,
knew it not herself, it may be, and died.
For some years, I felt all that a
man
could, whose
heart had been widowed early, too early; and, I knew
not one hurried pulsation, one agitated breathing of
passion for many years. In the mean time, I had
contracted
many solitary, strange habits; and would go
away from all the world; and lie along upon the grass;
and pore over the blue water, that spread itself below
me;dreaming waywardly, oh, such dreams! till my
very heart would leap, at times, like an untrained steed,
to the touch of a fiery hand. It was Ambition's!She
came to me, gauntleted, glaived with steelred from
the furnace! where she had been forging a panoply,
worthy
of a mightier heart than mine. I spurned at it. I was
weary of the conflict; faint, and sick, with the thought
of blood. I only prayed that some
woman;
some one,
it mattered not whom, if she were altogether mine,
devoutly
,
passionately mine, might be made to love
me
.
My prayer was
vain
. I had no soothing in my
temper
.
The women that I saw, were childish. They
were ashamed of me. They had no notion of love; of that
deep, inward, unutterable love, of which I thought.
Nor, had I, then. I knew not what love was. I only
knew that, if I could find some one, that would
tremble
all over, when she heard my voicethat would sit
mute as the hushed nightingalewhen we were alone;
and be happy, if her cheek rested upon my shoulder,
and her fine tresses were blown out in the wind; that
then
, I should be happy. Would I have profaned her?
No. Would I have told the tale? No. Would I have
made the mystery even the subject of thought, to
another? NoNo!I would have buried it, young as
I was, with myrrh and frankincense, in the deepest place
of all my heart; and never have let the delicious secret
out, but when I was alone, where nothing, that had life
in it,
could
have surprised me.
Yet, there were many about me, that loved; and
talked of love, till I was fain to understand the
meaning
of the word. But, such was not the love that I
felt; of
that
, I could not talkI could'nt name the name
of loveI dared not even think of it; and, though she,
that I had so coveted to be near, had been long dead;
yet, there was a sore place, somewhere in my bosom,
I knew not exactly where,which I prayed to have
tenanted again; and yet, I was frightened at the thought
of it. Long and long, did I wander about, trying
image after image to the vacancybut none would
fit itnone! At one time, my heart would collapse;
and then, it would distend again, while I strove to
insinuate some idol into the solitary, silent place.
It would not be. The shrine was overturned, defaced!
defaced! and, if it were ever to be supplied, I learnt to
believe that it would bewhen I should be sleeping.
My belief hath been verified!A creature did steal
into
it, at last!like a brilliant serpentwhen I was off
my guardbut, that must not be told here.
Yet, there were times, tooshort seasons of sun and
fragrancewhen, for a moment or two, I was deluded;
and once, I rememberwhen I had pored over my own
heart, till my brain ached; and I was ready to lie down
and weep myself blind, that heaven had shut itself up
to me; and that no field was open to me upon earth; and
that woman, even woman, was prohibited to me;once!
there was a very beautiful creature, who came near to
me, for a moment. Her eyes were large, full, and of the
deepest blue; her hair a glorious brown, heavy and rich,
like a mass of neglected silkunspun, unwoven; her
face dimpling all overfull of laugh and witchery
O, how utterly unlike Lydia. Yet, I might have loved
hernot with that holy, distant, reverential fervour,
with which men worship the cold star-light, when they
are madbut with a passion half earthly. But, she
was a
coquette
. And her beautiful mind was rank with
luxuriance; putting forth incense for everperpetually
in bloom---approachable to all the world. Could I
endure
this? I!---No. The woman that I love, I would
have consecrate to
me
---to
me
, alone. Such is my
temper
,
yet. I will have no companionship in love. In
property, in friendship, I can go as far as another---as
any
other; but, in love---O, I would sooner die; yea,
die, after all my experience and mortification, after
I have broken one heart by it---sent
one
beloved
creature
to an untimely grave, even while she doated upon
me, to distraction---yet I would rather die---hated and
feared---than live---with a sharer in my love. I am
called jealous. Let it be so. I
am
jealous. I glory
in it. The lips and eyes of the woman that I love,
should be unprofaned. I would sooner enjoy a
community
of wives, than of love. Understand me---will
you. There are some that will not; some that
dare
not.
There was Hammond. He told me, plainly, that the
woman who married me, would diedie, of a broken
heart. She did. He told me, too, that I was jealous.
I
am
. I know it. But he did not mean that I was
watchful, or suspicious. No; he knew me better. He
only knew, that, what the world called an
innocent
freedom
if
permitted by my wifewould be the death of
me. He said so. He told her so. I told her so. I
took her hands. I looked her in the face. Emma,
said I, I may be wrong; it is very possible. But, it is
better that you should know
all
, that you have to
expect
;
all
, that you have to fear. There are some things
that would kill me, love; which, it never entered your
innocent heart, to believe of any importance. Men
come to you, and take your hand. They go away, and
they take your hand. I can bear
that
. They dance
with you; and they take your hand. I submit to it; for
I see that you are happy. They lean upon your chair;
and say many things, in a manner, thatpardon me,
Emmayou will, if you become my wife, put an end
to, without any solicitation from me. I would have
you happy. I would leave you free. I shall ask you
of you, not to see this man, nor that; for, but point to
no questionimpose no law upon you. Neither beg
any man, whom you would be better acquainted with;
and I will bring it about. You know that. I ask no
condition from you; I exact no promise; and, when I
die, if I should die first, I shall sayEmma, farewell!
If you have loved me, you will never love another, who
does not resemble me. There are few in this world
that do. But, when you find one, that does resemble
R 2
me; or that, you believe, does; marry him. I shall watch
over you, even in
his
arms; and be happy, believe me,
dear
very
happy, if you are so. but, there is one
thingone that, at this hour, I do not fear to say to
you;it would be my death to see the lips of a man
no matter what his ageno matter who he isupon
your face. I would not wound you. But such things
are;
and I would put a stop to them. How? I would
convince your understanding; and then, I shall be
happy
;
then
, I shall feel that I am safe
safe;
because you
will respect my opinion, not as a capricious
law
, but
as the wise opinion of genuine love. That done, you
will be as jealous as I, of such liberties. Emma, I will
not even permit the parson, when we marry, to kiss
you. You smile. Your father and brother may
may
,
I say, because I would be understood. It would not be
rifling you, if they did. You can reason. Ask
yourself
,
if it be not making such favours too cheap. A kiss!
by heaven, Emma, I would as soon my wife should go
to bed to another man, as to be kissed by him. She
may go to bed, if she please, to her father and brother;
that
will not disturb me. She might go to bed to a
stranger, innocentlyand return to my arms, as if
nothing had happened; unsullied, unprofaned. You
are disturbedhurt. Hear me out, love, said I. We
must deal plainly, while we are upon this theme; but,
could I ever love her after, as I had before? No. I
might
not
blame her; a mistaken education; a deadened
sensibility; or, a mere
unwillingness to give pain
,
because
it was one of the privileges of a frienda dear
friendmight be her justification; but, do you think,
that I could ever love her again, as I
had
loved her?
Ask yourself, Emmawould it cost you no pain,
none
,
to see me caressing another woman? If it would
not
, I
should be sorry indeed. If it
would
will you not
spare me? Remember, I ask no more than I would do.
From the hour that I am yoursnot your husband,
Emma; but, from the hour that we have
loved
, I have
been, and will be,
yours
, and yours
only;
and I shall be
to my last breath. How would you bear it? Do not
call me unkind, cruel, or capricious. I am not. I tell
you, beforehand, all that you have to expect; and, if
you should break my heart, hereafter, do not charge it
to my jealous temper. All my jealousy, you know, now.
Can you endure it. I love you too muchtoo much,
to think of sharing you with any body. Have I
convinced
your understanding? Am I reasonable? If yea,
then we shall be happy. If I have not; I have only to
saypity me; take compassion upon my infirmity; you
know what it is;
dare you marry me
, knowing it, as
you do? If yes---say so. I shall be happy. You will
never hear of it, again
never
. It will be enough for
me to know, that you are my wife. My confidence will
have a sublimity in it. I shall feel, wherever I be, that
you will remember your dignity and love; and that no
living creature will be permitted to approach you,
profanely
.
But, it may be, that you are not convinced.
Look about you, for a moment. Who are they, that
treat this matter with the greatest indifference? Who
are they, that are most willing to have their wives
kissed? Are they not such as have been long married,
very long? When there is,
perhaps
, somewhat of
satiety
and indifference in them. If a man be
indifferent
to
a woman, will he care, though the whole army,
pioneers
,
and all, have tasted her sweet
lips
? But who are
they
, that regard the matter most seriously?quaking,
to the very heart, at the thought of another's daring to
kiss their loved ones? Are they not the newly married,
or the newly loving? Which is the passion, that
you
would inspire? The new, or the old one? Reflect for
yourself. By their fruits shall you know them.
What is most dear to us, we are least willing to share
with the world.
What is least so, we are prodigal of
.
Thus did I talk to Emma. She was a noble creature.
The tears stood in her eyes all the while; and she was
fully convinced; but she put her two hands into mine,
and said, just so that I could hear her. I thank you,
William.
I understood her. She had the courage to become
the companion of one, who was the terrour of all the
women that knew her;
one
, against whom she had
been cautioned, as a terrifick combination of jealousy
and
love
, to be sure, but
love
, that wrought with more
deadliness in him, than hate in other menbut
one
that
never deceived
one
, that told her, the whole measure of
his infirmity and transgressionand onceO, never
shall I forget that moment. It was my reward for
whole years of sorrow and of suffering. A venerable
man, the friend of her childhood, with whom, when
she was parting, probably
for ever
, put his aged lips
to her foreheada viper rather!a burning coal!
I showed no emotion. But she,
my
Emma---my own
dear, imperial Emma, she felt that she was
my
wife;
and that no man on earth, crowned and sceptred, though
he were; priest, or layman--old or youngwas worthy
to touch her forehead. The old man tottered and
trembled in the beautiful rebuke of her eyes. Yet there
was no fierceness in it. It was lofty, calm, and gentle;
and he departedhow! with ten thousand times more
respect for her, that he ever had before. For a moment,
he glanced at me. I saw that he could not understand
the simplicity of our hearts. Perhaps---heaven forgive
him, if he did;he thought Emma was
afraid
to
permit
it, before me. I could laughbitterlyvery
bitterly
,
even now, at the thought; and I do love to imagine
whether he would have found her kind, if she had been
alone. By heaven, old as he was, beloved as he was,
if her husband had
not
been near her, he would have
been scorched to ashes. I went to him. I laid my hand
upon his shoulder. I looked him up in the face. I was
a good deal moved, but I smiled; for, in the deep
agitation
of my blood, there was an unutterable sweetness,
and thrilling; as if some new fountain had just been
broken up in my heart; or some gentle fingers were
feelin
pleasantly about it. You do not know Emma well,
I perceive. She became
my wife
. ButI imposed
no restraint upon her. We had some peculiar notions;
and, when we give our
hand
, to an honest man, it may
be that we mean more, than many, who would give
up the
lips
of a wife or a daughter to him.
The old man embraced me upon the spot. I felt that
I was right. The reward had come, at last; and, over
powered by it, I went to my study, and threw myself
upon my knees,devoutly, I do believe, if there ever
went out of my heart, or ever dwelt within it, one
devout
thought. Emma soon joined me:and I could
not forbear reminding her of her courage, in marrying
one so high, and abstract in his notion of woman.
How had you the courage! I exclaimedso timid a
creature as you were, to throw yourself upon my bosom,
love?it was the crater of a volcano.
True, William; very true, was her replybut,
timid as I was, and
am
, I would rather be consumed,
by a bright flame, than live, for ever, in a dull one.----
This from
you
, Emma!
you
. I exclaimed, in
astonishment
.
We had then been married three years;five had
gone by, since we had first met; and I had never heard
her utter so daring a sentiment as that, before. I held
her to my heart. I remembered the sweet intrepidity
of her eyes, when we first met; and I trembled for her. She
was in deadly peril, and knew it notnever dreamed of
it:and, many and many a time, before we were
married
,
hath fallen asleep, upon my bosom; and slept as
tranquilly there, as a babe would, that had
overwatched
itself, in contemplating the diamond scales of a
serpent. But when she awoke, there were her innocent
eyes, just as when they went to sleep, full of love and
security. I reminded her of the tremendous moment,
when we had well nigh parted, for ever and ever:
when one that was dear to her,a long and tried
friendalmost her brother---one, that had watched over
her, in sickness and in health; one, whose feeling, she
could not assail idlyor wantonlywould have
touched
her cheek, at parting. He had followed her; our
arms were linked togetherand I could have
prevented
him, almost without an effortbut I did not. It
might to be done again. I stood aloof, by heaven I did!
and saw him, in the presence of his own wife, touch her
cheek. OI could have stretched him dead at my
feet!I could have fallen upon my knees; clasped her
dear hands in mine; wept upon them, and sobbed out,
farewell! farewell, for ever! I had broken away from
one woman;
one
, that I dearly lovedfor the very same
thing; and here was another
another!
I had well nigh
abandoned her on the spot, and all womankind with her,
at the same time. If I had, I never should have trusted
to anotherno, never! I should have turned my back
upon them all; in bitterness, pity, scorn and
detestation
,
as creatures wholly unworthy of me; and
unworthy
of my love.
It was many minutes before I could speak. I could
not leave her in the street. We were already at the
doora moment only, a wordmight be between our
love, and everlasting separation. I shuddered; I
staggered
I
felt faint and giddy. I spoke. She was
innocent. True, and if she had not beenI should
have gone to her, and laid my head in her lap, and
blown out my brains there. But it was before
me
, and
before his own wife; and he was like a brotherwhat!
and is that to comfort me, that you think so little of
such a favour, as to be surprised when I turn pale, if
another take it before my eyes; before his wife and
because
,
he is
like
a brother!
Think of it
. I cannot bear
it. I may be wrong. If soit is constitutional. I
reminded her of all this; of all that women, foolish
women had said of me, and of my nature. Fools! idiots!
do they not know that it is a wretched compliment to
any woman, for her husband to stand by, unmoved,
when another man kisses her? I would sunder myself,
for ever, from a woman, whose heart did not ache, as if it
were crushed, at the thought of it. I would never do
it, never! alone or apart. That would I never do, away
from my wife, which I would not do, if she stood by.
No; she should feel assured, that the lips which he had
consecrated at my parting, would return to her again,
pure and hallowed, with her last kiss yet upon them.
To my last breath---my very last---they would be
sensible
to no other touch---no other flavour,---no other
thrill. Reader, pardon me---I have wandered far, very
far; but the thought of Emma, the dear sufferer, came
over me, and carried me away like her own voice,
when I hear it, night after night, issuing from the wood,
behind the place where we first told---no, not
told
, that
were impossible till long after----our love---and I go
astray, after it. Let me return. I was telling you of
one just now, that was too kind to all; too ready to bestow
her smile, and lavish her caress---upon all the world.
Her name was Mary. I knew her but a little time then;
but I have met her since, more than once; and left her
weeping, the bitterest; and yet, perhaps, the most
salutary
tears, that she ever shed. She had taught me how
to approach her. I profited by it; and ere she had time
to look about her, she found
her
feet entangled, and
her
own heart aching; not with love; but with shame and
vexation. I might have loved her; and, had I been
nearer
to her, when I could have moulded her to my will;
and, had she submitted to it, as she might; for she had a
kind heart, I
might
have been her friend---and, perhaps,
her husband. But she had a cousin, (
her
name was
also
Mary,--a
woman
, even in her childhood; a creature
not beautiful, but noble; dignified; and, in every
respect
,
I do believe, better fitted to make me the wife
that I ought to have had---than any that I ever met
with. Her thought was like mine, but better; her
ambition
like mine; but less terrible, and more religious;
her temper inconceivably better; and her love would
have been more rational; but
as
deep and
as
breathless,
as my own, for her. She is now married. Heaven
bless and protect herReader---it is all in vain. I
cannot tell the story in any other way, than as it
occurs
to my memory,by fits and starts. I cannot
preserve
any chronological order---I can only record my
own associations. Bear with me.
CHAPTER XIII.
Hammond the Dwarf...Sammy Kelly...Confoundedly scared...
Apparition...Unfinished sentence...Hammond's Temper...
Patience
...Strength...Courage...Self
possession...Readiness.
I have
already spoken of Hammond the Dwarf. It
is now time that I speak more plainly; for, the hour is
arrived, when there is not an event of my life to be
related
,
in which he had not, in some way, directly or
indirectly, a strange, wayward influence. Let me
begin
early, when I first knew that I hated him. It was
in my earliest childhood.
I have already given you some notion of the spiteful
little devil, my brotherSampson Achillesotherwise
called Sammy Kellyand of the life that I led at home.
Such was my deadly antipathy to the creature, at last,
that my blood would curdle, if my flesh touched his;
much as if I had trod, with my naked foot, upon a toad.
The wicked readiness and dexterity of the imp, are
inconceivable
.
I had ten times his strength; and ten
times, at least, have I saved his life, when he was
utterly
at the mercy of some beast, or carriage; for, not a
dog would pass by the door where he sat, with his
tongue lolling out of his mouth, and his long white
fingers
clotted and ringed with bruised and broken worms
---not a dog, that did'nt stop, to bark at, or worry him.
Yet, more than once, have I been on the point,---I may
as well own the truth...of provoking one at him; or,
letting
go my hold upon him, when I was dragging him
out of some puddle. He was a beast--a monster--in all
but intellect---and that was instinctively devilish. His
seat, in the door-way, on the steps, in the corner of the
kitchen, was coloured with glittering insects, that he had
crushed, and stuck to the floor; or strewed all over,
with the hair of cats, or the feathers of young birds,
that he had picked naked. Yet, poor thing! it was never
thought possible that he could harm anybody. And,
when I have been tempted to pitch him into a kettle of
hot soap, or an empty flour barrel, for his cursed pranks
upon Elizabeth, I have been withheld, solely by a
doubt, that he might, by some possibility, have some
sort of a rational soulor, that he was too much of a
devil to be hurt by it. Up to the hilt, has he driven a
little sharp pen-knife, into the calf of my leg, chattering
all the while, like a strangling baboon.Again, and
again, has he blistered me, with hot water; and once, it
was well nigh the last moment of
his
lifedid he throw
a crucible of melted lead at poor Elizabeth, when she
was very littlea part of which, fell upon her foot, and
burnt, and sunk into ittill her shrieks could have
been heard, for a mile; yet, when I was only going to
pour the rest of it down his own ugly throat, some
fool or other, my uncle, or father, perhaps, interfered
and had well nigh poured it down minefor
meddling
with the poor innocentas if hot lead from
his
hand, would'nt burn a fellow. But, I taught him
a better lesson, at last. He hurled a brick at me. I
just took him by the nape o' the neck. He had another
in his handwhich, in his childish, pleasant, harmless
way, he was just ready to throw into my face and eyes;
but, I only took hold of his neck, and he yelled out,
much as if a red hot blacksmith's vice had caught him
there; and dropped the brick.Neverno,
never
, after
that, did he venture to lift his hand against me, when
we were alone. I learnt how to manage him, in some
degree, from that moment; for, idiot that he was, he was
not so very a beast, as to repeat, what he knew would
end in pain to himself; and, but for Elizabeth, whom
he tortured incessantly, in one way or another;
worrying
her, with vermin and bugs; filling all her little
boxes and playthings, with whatever was most hateful
to her, I should have gone on, peaceable enough. I
have thumped him for it, till he was spotted all over;
choked him for it, till his eyes were starting out of
their socketsbut, he would never shriek out; or
complain
;
and, the moment that my back was turned, he
would be at his mischief again; growling, all the time,
like a bear, with a sore head.
S
About this time, just when I had pretty well made
up my mind, to let the next dog that should attempt it,
throttle him, at his leisureI happened to be out, late
of a holiday afternoon, in a dismal wood; dark and
swampy, and tangled, where I had gone after black
whortleberries. It was already dusk; I was alone, and
had far to goand withal, was a terrible cowardas I
have already told you. I was just clambering over a
high fence, I remember, with the dish in my hand, full
of whortleberries; and getting ready to leapwhen I
uttered a loud cry, and dropped them. Below me,
were a pair of large rolling eyes, of frightful
vividness
.
It was a creature, with a big head; and its long
arms were reaching up toward me.
SaSaSammy
dear!
cried I, as soon as I could
get my breathis it you, Sammy?
I was never so glad of any thing in my life; but, I
soon recollected myself. It could
not
be Sammyhe
had never left the door of our house. My heart
bounced
againand my teeth chattered with affright, as I
saw it, clambering up the fence, toward meand Iby
heaven, it was like the night-mare to me; I could
neither
move, nor bawl, nor speak. It almost touched me
and I leaped down upon it, in desperation, and ran.
But, it pursued me, and overtook me, and spoke to me.
I looked downbut, my terrour was so unspeakable,
that I could see nothing; and, I actually yelled out with
horrour.
It turned, and left me, at last; running along the
ground, like a shadow; and, whistling, all the while,
with a loud, clear whistle, like the wind, in December.
I followed it, in amazement, for a moment, with my
eyessaw it leap ditch after ditchand then, aim
directly
for the swamp. I took to my heels, and ran,
as if I had escaped a deviltill I came to the house.
There
was little Sammy;
there
in the corner! just where
I had left him; with a poor little pinched up, sore-eyed
kitten, in his lap, mewing, most piteously, at every
touch, as if she had been tortured, till she was
dislocated
,
and raw. On any other occasion, I should have
snatched her away; but; on this, I forgot all humanity;
or, rather, all the little that I hadin my eagerness to
be alone, where I could meditate, without disturbance.
Well,it was
not
Sammy, I had said, to myself,
for the hundredth time.But, what the devil was it,
then?A monster? Yes. But, that cannot be. Can
there be such another as he? What a fiend it must be!
How it ran and whistled! Yesthere are more of them.
I must get a dog. I won't go abroad again, after
whortleberries
,
without a dog.
I went to bed; but, half a dozen times, did I awake,
screaming with affright; and fancying that the creature
was chasing me yet, and chattering over my shoulder
just overtaking methat his boneless fingers, were
just touching meI could feel them mounting to my
throathear his whistle; andGod of heaven!
Was it there, still!
I leaped from the bed. It was no dream. There sat
the little monster, in the moonlight, just upon the foot
of my bed, looking me in the face, and supporting its
head, between its two paws. I shook, in every joint.
I was ready to sink into the floor, with affright. It
laughed.Oh no! no! no!it was not he!no!it was
not
he
It was poor little Sammy, himself. I could
have wept tears of joy. I even ran to him; and would
have hugged him, but he hopped down from the bed,
and waddled away, into his kennel. My cries, it
seemed, when I inquired into the affair, had disturbed
him; and, he had come to enjoy themto listen to them
they were musick to him;---and I might have lain there,
bellowing till this time, for all that
he
cared.
Still, I could not get the creature that I had seen, out
of my head. I was afraid to go to sleep again; and, it
was a twelve month, before I had the courage to go
near the spot, where I had dropped the dish and the
berries. To me, there was an association, so natural,
(for, all the experience that I had, led only to that
conclusion) that, whatever was monstrous in people,
was devilish, like little Sammy---that, if I heard of
a calf, with six legs, or a kitten, with two heads, I was
afraid to go near it.
But, a whole year afterward,--(I had made two or
three attempts before)---I went to the place. There
was the dish still---a large tin dipper---just where it
had fallen---but upright. I looked at it---there was a
thick, black mould, in the bottom of it; as if the berries
had all been gathered up again, and left there, after I
had gone. I was almost afraid to touch it. But, I
did, at last, and found that my conjecture was right.
Some time after this, a cousin of mine came down,
and stayed with my father,
for
to go to school; as
they said. The moment that he saw Sammy, he started;
and, when we were alone, he told me that he thought it
was Hammond the Dwarf.
What! more dwarfs? thought I. Why, what the
devil are such creatures made for? I did not know,
then, as I do now, that vermin have their use---that they
tend to cleanliness; for, people will wash themselves,
to get rid of lice; and scald their bedsteads, to get rid
of bugs; when, but for lice and bugs, they would live
till they rotted away in pestilence and nastiness.---So
with reptiles and serpents---I once heard a good man,
speaking of God's kindness to us; in proof of which, he
remarked, that lions and vipers bear only one young
at a time! (
[5]
[5]
The Editor of the Morning Chronicle, Baltimore, once wrote the same thing, and
reasoned
in the same way.
Lions!) while such as were useful, bore
frequently, and in litters. Ah, thought I. Would it
not have been, to the full, as kind---if there were none
at all, or if they were utterly barren. Why worry us
at all with them? I can not explain the riddle, even yet.
But, Lions, Vipers and Dwarfs are necessary, and
good....I am sure....for,
hath not God made them?
I soon learnt from my cousin, that, in a little log hut,
near the whortleberry swamp, (where I had been) was
a family of wretched creatures; and, among them, a
dwarf, that looked like little Sammy. This gave me
comfort; and, I determined to see it; for my cousin
promised to bring it about; but, though we went twice
near the place, and saw all the rest of the family, we
always missed Hammond.
But, when I had nearly given up the thought---I was
then about eleven, and began to be known as
Neck or
Nothing
, by every bodyI returned, one day, from
a fight with a school-fellow; and saw, just as I was
entering
the door, another creature, like Sammy, sitting
upon the steps, opposite to him. I stoppedand
shuddered
.
They were looking in each other's faces; and
neither made a sign, or spoke a word, for ten minutes.
I was called, and had to go in, between them; but, as I
did, the stranger rose, and went with me. He was
taller than I, though; and, his great, white glittering
teeth---and the most beautiful mouth in the world,
though his eyes were horrible---threw me into such a
perturbation, that I knew not what I said or did. We
sat down to the table together; and, I could not eat a
mouthful. I kept my eyes rivetted upon Hammond,
(for it was he) and I was amazed at his manly air; it
was thoughtful and old; and when he spoke, (though he
was but thirteen) I found my father listening to him,
with great earnestness; nay, Elizabeth I saw, more
than once, looking at him, not as if she hated, or
loathed
him---and, when I saw that, the tears came into my
eyes.
His manner was new to me---he went and sat down,
by Sammy Kelly; and, though there was a dead silence;
and all eyes were turned upon them; and the spiteful
glitter of Sammy's looked like that of the bruised
rattle
snake; yet he did not appear to observe it. His voice, I
thought, was very strange---it produced, I hardly know
how to describe it, a tingling, unpleasant titillation, on
the drums of my ears---and a kind of echo, in my
heart.
My father treated him like a man; and, I confess, that
I never felt so like a boy, in all my life. When he left
us, I sat down, and thought of him---with a feeling of
fear; and, it was more than a month, before I could endure
to sit in the same chair that he sat in---or even, at the
same part of the table. Yet, he would come to me,
obtruding
himself upon my thought, night and day: and,
at last, he came again; when, I began to see into my
father's project; or, rather, that of the minister. He
had undertaken to give Sammy a companion, in the
hope of spiriting him up. It had that effect; Sammy
S 2
began to show signs of intelligence, that startled me;
but, it was always, except to Hammond, a wicked,
mischievous intelligence; nay, such was the incessant
activity of Hammond, that he soon led him to play and
exercise; and he grew healthy in his appearance; and
began to learn his book, heartily. And, one day, (they
had grown really attached to each other--a proof to me,
then, not of the humanity of either, but of a hellish
affinity
,
in their nature; it will give you some notion of
Hammond's
strength, and presence of mind;) we were all
in the water together. Hammond swam with such
prodigious swiftness and force; being, in the shape of
his body and limbs, very like a frog---that he made the
water foam all over his shoulders. Sammy was with him;
and, before we came out, a crowd of boys had gathered
about the shore, though we had chosen the place, on
account
of secrecy; and were hooting at them, and
pelting
them with dirt, for a couple of sea monsters.
I rushed out, like a mad creature, and fell upon them;
but the more cowardly Hammond never stirred a limb:
and kept playing about, with Sammy at his side, or
upon
his back, like one long armed ape transporting
another
,
till he was weary and then, he came out;
dressed himself leisurely; and helped Sammy into his
clothes, taking no notice, whatever, of the boys. But
they, profiting by his forbearance, at last turned all
their insult upon him. I should'nt have cared a
farthing
for thatnay, if they had murdered them both, at
another time; and on a fitting occasion; but somehow it
went against my grain to see my own brother, bitterly
as I hated him, so piteously mocked at;and when
they came near
him
, I interfered. But Hammond
stepped
before me. No, master William, he said,I
shall take care of your brother. They shan't touch
him.
The boys than set up a shout, and renewed the attack. I
saw Hammond's eye glance about, rapidly, as if in search
of something,at last, it was rivetted a moment. The
next!heaven only knows, how he got there so soon
his long arms were twined about the neck of the largest
boy of the whole; and down, he lugged him to the earth.
The others rushed upon him; but Sammy, I declare I
began
to love the creature for a momenthe flew in
among them; squalling, and biting, and scratching;
kicking
and cuffing; tooth and nail; and I was just putting
my hand to the yoke, when lo! the thing was all over
three or four of the boys were caught, and tumbled
about, and, as fast as one got up, he was thrown down
again
without a blow
. It was immeasurably
ridiculous
three
or four were constantly rolling upon the
grass together; and Hammond was straddling about,
among them, like some great, strong, gentle, lubberly,
good natured beast, amusing itself with pulling and
pawing about his enemies.
I stood and laughed heartily, when I saw his good
natured face; and all the boys joined at lastand the
whole affair was quieted without the shedding of one
drop of blood.
I often thought of it, afterward. I wondered that I
could not do it. I remembered how carefully he had
handled the boys, as if he were really afraid of hurting
them; and laughing every now and then, when he
received
a blow, just as if it were all in play---but never
returning it. Was the creature a fool? I said to
myself--
undoubtedly
I answered; for, I was sure of it.
Having come to this comfortable conclusion---it
encouraged
me and I went on nourishing my own hateful,
irritable disposition.
But no---he could
not
be a fool. No boy talked like
Hammond. No boy made such progress in his studies.
No boy was so universally loved and laughed at---as
Hammond. His strength, too, was prodigious---the
greater no doubt, from his education in the woods; for,
I have seen him run up a smooth, blasted tree, like some
wild animal. And once, I must tell you that, while it
is fresh upon my mind. I have already mentioned that
the dogs would stop and bark at Sammy, when they
saw him. This Hammond soon put a stop to. But,
one day, a large dog carried his encroachment a
little too far---he bit Sammy. By heaven!---if
Hammond
did not run down the roof, where he had just gone
for a kite,---at the first cry of Sammy---like a wild
cat to her young. How he escaped with his neck is
wonderful, for I am sure that he did not come more
than half way down the spout, (ours is a two story
house,) before he leaped upon the dog. The creature
rolled over in the mud, as if its vitals were crushed out;
and his yelling soon brought the master, a stout boy,
from the next door---to his relief.
Hammond stopped, and looked at him: and even I---
I trembled at his look. It was calm and settled. The
boy did not dare to approach; but contented himself
with calling off the dog, and, as soon as he could breathe,
provoking him at Hammond.
You had better not, Harry, said he
But the boy persisted.
Hammond crouched down, and watched the dog, with
an incessant eye; and hands rapid as light, while it
barked and leaped at his face; and at last, sprang at his
throat. The next moment, there was a quick
yell--Hammond
had caught the
dog
by the throat; then, by the
hinder legsit was quicker than thoughthe swung
him round, twice or three times; then dashed out his
brainsaye, broke his skull into shivers, and
spattered
his brains out against the pump!I was terrified.
It was all the work of a moment: but it
was
frightful,
to see even an animal, killed so suddenly.
So much for his strength and readiness. Now for
one example, among hundreds, of his presence of mind.
That never deserted himI have been in a boat with
himin a carriagein the extremest peril; nothing
ever seemed to alarm him. I have known him to start
from a sound sleep, at the cry of fire in the room,or
murder; and go as composedly and thoughtfully to
work, as if he had been expecting it. But the first
case that I remember, was this. It startled me, then;
but it has amazed me since, when I have compared
the operation of his mind with that of grown men,
who are thought instantaneous and electrical. We
stood upon a high building, once, together. By a
careless
tread, I had dislodged a quantity of broken brick
and rubbish, from the staging; and saw it falling
directly
upon the head of a man below, as he was walking by.
I reached forward with a cry of horrourand was just
on the point of calling to him, to
take care!
when
Hammond put his hand over my mouth, and prevented
me.
I was provokedbut the man escaped.
Why did you prevent me from warning him? said
Iyou wished to see him killed.
Warning
him!what; when he was going byas
he did, safely
warning
himfor what! that he might
stop, and look upand be blinded, certainly, if not
killed.
I blushed at my folly. How was this creature, so
horribly disproportioned? how was he, forever, in
advance
of me? I began to hate him bitterly; at last, the
more bitterly, because Elizabeth took his partnay,--
it were a pity to deny ituntil I carried my hostility
so far, as to abuse him before the whole schoolaye,
even to spit upon him. Yet, he bore it allhe never
struck me. He never even cursed me, in return.
At last, sick and weary of my continual persecution,
he forbore coming to the house. Elizabeth, I have
always
thought, was concerned in it; and I had not seen
him for a long, long time, until that night, when it is
probable that he saved my life; the night, I mean, when
I threw myself overboard, with the intention of dying.
But I have now come to a more interesting period of my
history. I must pass over my childhood. I began to
have the feelings of a man. I had forgot Hammond;
and had only heard of him, now and then, as
remarkably
addicted to his books, and very formidable in
disputation
.
I had been away from home, for nearly six
years, during which time, some of the adventures, which
will be related in the following chapter. happened to
me; and, on my return, I found Hammondnot no-not
yetnot yet.
CHAPTER XIV.
Goes abroad...Indigence...Desperation...Series of adventures...
Mad house...Prison...Dream...Family of Friends...Caroline
...Reality.
During
my absence abroad, no matter where, I
learnt to look about me with a steady eye, and an
assured
aspect; to forget all that I had suffered at home;
the ten thousand petty and contemptible mortifications,
that had drained the fountain of my better feeling, dry,
drop by drop; the many substantial wrongs, and
smarting
insults, that had left me sore and sensitive, all over
literally fulfilling the destiny of him, to whom God
hath saidGo!go out, from among my peoplea
wanderer among the nations. Be thy hand lifted
against every man; and every man's hand against
thee. Still, there were times, when I would cover my
face, and weep, at the recollection of my dear mother
and Elizabeth; and almost forgive my father, my
uncle
,
and my brother, the dwarf.
My handsome brother
Jeremiah!
is it possible?
I have utterly omitted him, in my narrative. Well,
well, it is not too late, to say, that he was neither friend
nor enemy, of mine. I owe nothing to him, as a
brother
nothing.
He was a fat-headed, handsome,
lubberly
boy; with just about brains enough for a retail
shop. We were never much together; and, while we
were, I do not remember a single incident that ever
disturbed
me, or him; except, perhaps, when I tumbled
his clothes, or soiled his shoes, in my carelessness; for
he thought of little, in this world, but eating and
drinking
sleeping
and dressing.
I went abroad
why
, I do not feel that any mortal
has a right to demand. Enough for me to say, that I
stood by the death-bed of a womana grown woman
that I had loved(she was ten years older than I;)
that I saw the black convulsion; the writhing and
shivcring
of her whole body and limbstill I grew dizzy
and faint; that she gasped out my nameand pointed
to the sky. At that moment, there was a total eclipse
of the moonall righteous God!and the earth shook,
just as she had foretold! What wonder that I am afraid
of death, when shethe beautifulthe bright
destroyed
herself for her love of me; when I saw the foam upon
her mouththe sweat upon her transparent, cold
bosom
her
white teeth glitteringher parted lips
twitching
with convulsionand her eyes all blood-shot!
yet, still she knew me, and loved me; and her eyes were
brimful of light and waterand she pointed to the
mooneven as I had dreamed, many months before
and the earth actually did shake. I felt itsaw it
and all the people in the house felt it shake, and spoke
of it. And there was IGreat God!---Maker of men!
have compassion on me!--was there any delusion, there?
O, tell me. How happened it, that both of us had
dreamed a dream, so frightfully alike?both written to
each other, when the wide water was between us, at
the same time?and both lived long enough to forget
it; and never to remember it again, until we saw its
final accomplishment?a total darkness!a death-bed!
and an earthquake!all at the same time?
* * * * * * * I had
always
saidnever attempt to prevent her from
destroying
herself. If she be in earnest, and resolved, you
cannot
prevent her; and the sooner it is over, the better.
On the contrary, if she be not resolved; and only
threaten
to do it, to frighten
me;
the surest way to make her
do it, is to watch her, and attempt to thwart her;the
surest way to prevent her from doing it, is, to show no
concern at all about it. No woman would ever kill
herself
,
if she thought that nobody would be troubled about
it. Generally, the threat is only a trick to alarm us;
and to get a power over us by that alarm:but,
beware
!
If you interfereyou put yourself into her
power
.
She repeats the threat, till, at last, she is obliged
to attempt the execution of it, to avoid your continual
ridicule. And she does make it, finally, in the hope of
being prevented at the very
last
momentas cowards,
after threatening to fight, go into the field, in the hope
of being bound over to keep the peace, when they have
got there. So reasoned I;alas, alas!I did not
dream that she was then the desperate, terrible
creature
that I found her. She dieddied almost in my
arms; and I left the country.
While I was awayit was in a foreign and far land
I was reduced to the most distressing indigence; and,
at one time, so fierce and unbending was my nature,
that, I stood, late in the evening, upon the border of
a river, near where the boatmen used to take in their
passengers; and I hesitated whether I should repeat
the experiment, that I had once before attempted; and
go toI won't say whereby water; or wait till I was
starved into a transparency; or provoke some
scoundrel
,
for numbers were continually prowling about me,
to quiet me with
his
stiletto; or, to take
mine
, and levy
a contribution in my turn. I resolved on the latter
with an unaccountable repugnance, I confessbut, such
is the fact; perhaps it may be explained by the difference
of countries; and, perhaps, by the difference between
stealing from a desk, or an orchard, at home, money
and applesor robbing, abroad, a pocket, or a man.
Be that as it may, I was determined not to starve; and,
though I shuddered, and the sheath rattled strangely in
my hand, when I grappled the dagger in my bosom
the last toy that I had on earthyet, I
deliberately
determined
.
I do not deny it, or palliate it;it is too
late, now, for me to care for consequences. I
deliberately
resolved, to raise my bread, that night, though it were
at the price of blood. It was very dark. The
atmosphere
was cold and drizzling. The flag-stones
slippery
.
And I was just in the act of leaping upon a man
that passed me, when my foot slipped, and I fell;the
sheath flew off, and my hatand there I lay, stunned
by the fall, and grasping the dagger, till I heard a cry
of
murder!
and the watchman sprang his rattle, at the
next square. I had still sense enough left, to know,
that, if I were caught in this predicament, it would,
probably, go hard with me. I had no stomach for the
gallows, just then; anything else in the world, would
have been more welcome the supper of an
ostrich
;
cast iron, and broken glass; or even that of a
poet. So, off I set, while, rattle after rattle, was
instantly
sprung, till the whole city was in an uproar;
and, once, I had well nigh consummated the adventure,
and preventedwhat mortified me, excessively, to
think ofthe catastrophe of being hanged, when I had
not
deserved it. A venerable old manfor few others
were employed in that cityblind and deaf, for aught
that I knowwas kind enough to put out his setting
pole, and attempt to hook me, as I went by. His
lantern
saved him; for, as he turned it upon my face, he
caught the gleam of the dagger, which I still grasped---
and stood, as if it were already in his heart---luckily for
him; for, heaven only knows what I might have done,
had he put his hand upon me.
This
I know, and this
only---that I would not have been taken alive, though
twenty old men had been the price of my liberty. I set
out for food only. It was a mercy, that I did not
end
with murder. Thus it is, with every man, in the career
of vice. It is in vain to stop; your descent quickens,
every moment, until you are breathless, and powerless,
and bloody. What a beautiful moral!
I ran, till I was exhausted; till I could not run
another
step. I staggered against a wall; and stood in the
shadow; and tore open my bosom; while the sweat
gushed out of me, as from a sick man, in a steam bath.
My hat was gone! Could I have left it behind me?---
and where I fell? The sheath, too!---my name was
upon
that. The thought was terrible. Ten thousand
fearful apparitions came out of the fog and darkness
about me, with big heads, and eyes; and stood and
nodded
at me, till I cried, like a child; leaned against
the wall, and cried, and sobbed, with faintness and
remorse
.
I know not what else happened to me. A dreary
interval had gone by; and, when I awoke, it was
exceedingly
dark and cold, about mea glimmering
only
could I perceive; and that seemed to me, to come
through a grated window, far above me. I arose; I felt
round the apartment. It was bare of furniture; and the
walls, I could perceive, were of massy stone. My foot
T
struck something solid. I examined it. It was a huge
iron bolt. Where was I? What had happened to me?
How long had I been there?for weeks?or months?
perhaps, for years? Oh, I could have knelt down,
and buried my face in the earth, to hear the sound of
any
voice, but my own---
any
sound, but that of my
own convulsive sobbing? It was but a little time
so it appeared to me, for a momentsince I had
meditated a robbery;
meditated!
gracious heaven!
might it not be? Was not this the fulfilment of my
prophesy
?
Was I not,
really
, a
robber?
a
murderer
? Who
could tell me? Might I not have done the deed? I had
beenO, how often!on the very threshold of itand
might I not? As my thought wandered through all the
encompassing thick darkness, my imagination took a
vivid and intense delight in torturing me. Who
could tell me? Was I not a murderer?confined?
condemned?doomed, for ever and ever, to this cell of
blackness and desolation? OrO, I threw myself
down upon my knees; and yelled, as if some giant were
dislocating my bones. Thick flames arose; and far
thunder. Strange shapes rushed in upon me. I was
pinioned, hand and foot; rivetted and locked down, to
the iron floor. I ground my teeth to dust; and tore my
flesh, in my convulsion. Where was I? Would
nobody
tell me?
nobody?
I cried.
Nobody!
echoed the wall.
I shut my eyes. I lay without breath or motion. Yes,
yes. The truth had come at last. It was plain. I was
a dead man. I was in the charnel house. Or, had I
been buried alive? These were not chains;they were
bands of linen! I heaved and wrestled with them. Yes,
it was cloth---
cloth
, not iron, that bound me. God! how
thankful I was!---a noise!--musick!--incense!--warmth!
Ha! the sorcerers!---the unhallowed magicians, that do
their mysterious working, within the hollow earth;
they
had broken upon me! I heard their sweet,
terrible
incantation. It was like the voice of children.---
Yet. I lay there, breathless and motionless, awaiting
the issue. It began to work. Soft hands went,
touching
,
over my forehead, and lips, and eye-lids. The
marble dew of dead men gathered, and froze upon me.
The green mould of the cemetery, I could feel growing
within me. But the charm wrought more potently.---
I could feel the earth stirring under me, and about me;
the crumbled population of the sepulchre, assembling
their ashesvitally obedient to the still, delicate
summoning
;
I could hear their gasping and pantingthe
noise of their knitting joints; but IO, merciful
heaven
!they
were turning
me
into stone. I could feel it!
My bones thawing and yielding; my flesh hardening;
congealing; petrifying. I could feel it all; at every sob,
the thick blood and smoke, oozing from my heart; and
fire issuing from my nostrils; my very eye-balls
sweating
,
and discharging their light. Yes, yes!the
frightful
curse was accomplished, at last! I had been buried
alive---that death, of all others; the fear of which, had
haunted me to distraction, during all my life. O, it
was insupportable. I grew faint. The lights went
outthe vapour. Stars waned, and went by me,
shooting
.
I was all alone; the sky passing away, over my
head; my heart filtering yet, like molten iron, through
every pore of my flesh, and encrusting my body, as
with red-hot armour. I shut my eyes the harder. I felt
the work going on. I called upon no mountains to cover
me. I determined to endure the process---however
terrible
it might be, however long---without a murmur.
The scorching heat came nearer. I compressed my
eye-lids together, till they bled; and there was a
hissing
then in my brain, as of fire suddenly quenched in
blood---or of many serpents, coiling and knotting in
flames. I clenched my lips---and lo! the whole place
glittered, with incessant and brightly coloured
irradiations
.
I then knew how it was---all, all; and I grew
calm, like the great ocean; but, like
that
, my chest
heaved, and heaved, mightily yet, though the tempest
had gone by. Yes, yes, I cried, after a while, I am
mad
. Well! this had been foretold. But, how long
had I been so?---for days, or months, or years? I
shivered
;
and braced myself, with all my thought, as the
thought rolled, like a dark river, through my brain;
covered with wreck and devastation. I put my hand to
my head. I knew it not, by the shape. My temples
had sunk. My flesh was cold and sepulchral. The
hair was not my hairit was harsh and wiry; and my
heard was thick, coarse, and frightfully rigid. Yes, it
was plain, that I had been mad, for many a long year.
But, who was I? When did it first happen to me? I
was now an old man. At what time, did I cease to be
rational? Who was I?and what?and where?
There was a time, when I had a homea sister;my
heart thrilled;a time when I loved;my heart grew
gentle; and, all at once, it stirred, as in travail. An
image of my beloved was born of itO, how like her!
It was hardly bigger than a humming-bird; but every
lineament was perfect. I lay yet, with mine eyes shut;
and worrying myself, with vain and reiterated
attempts
,
to establish my own identity. What was real,
appeared to me a dream;what might be unreal, wore
the countenance of solid marble. But,
who
was I?
Again, and again, I repeated the question. At last, a
little light broke in upon me. I remembered having
staggered against a wall; and that, soon after, I saw
a gate open; and a man, whom I had long knowna
rich manunmarried, and aloneenter it; that I
grasped
my dagger, and followed him; that I found myself in
his chamber, when it was very dark. Yes, yes!I
remembered
all, now. I heard his voice againsaw his
eyes roll, even in the dark, with unutterable terrour
and brightness. I heard my own voice again, like an
echo. It said to the old manYou are richvery
rich. You have gold with you. I am a desperate man.
A little, out of your abundance, will make me happy.
Give me. I have no time to lose. Go to your coffers.
Give me, till I cry enough. My name is Adams
William
Adams. I would not slay you. I give you my
name; and, to-morrow, I shall go about my usual
occupation
.
It is one of adventure and peril. If I succeed,
I will repay youwith tears of blood; and die at your
feet. I shall take no pains to avoid you. You may set
the hell hounds of the law upon my track, before the
echo of my step has died away in your passages. You
may!
but mark methat game is one of death!the
forfeit is blood! If
you
can hang me, well; but, if you
do not, though you had twenty thousand livesfathers,
and brothers, and childrenI would never sleep, nor
slumber, until I had wrung out the last drop of black
blood, from
every
heart that bore relationship to you.
Give me!
you have heard my terms. Preserve me,
and be silent. You are old and worthlesssordid and
childless; you will die the easier for being disburthened.
What say you? Can you be secret as the grave? Nay,
nayI do not ask your
promise
. It would be idle to
both of us. Your
oath!
Pshaw! I would not utterly
damn you. No;but I will bind you to me, by a far
stronger tie
fear
. But utter my namebut breathe
it aloud, even in your sleepand I will, from that
moment
,
wage a war with you, that shall never know a
truce, till you are rotting in your graveor I, upon a
gibbet.
He complied; and I had born off the gold. I
remembered
it all. But, where was the sequel? How came
I
here?
Had he broken the seal? Was I in his power?
Or had Imy blood thrilledit might be, I thought,
that I had left the
blade
of my dagger, at last, in the
heart of a living creature.
Again, all my arteries were on fire. I felt ten
thousand
adders coiling about me; crawling over my
eye-lids
and lipstrailing their slime; the accursed things!
And there I was; Ihelpless, naked, and left to be
crawled over with impunity. Nay, I could feel
something
were
they worms?dropping, continually, from
the wet ceiling, upon my body. I struggled, and
shrieked
;
but nobody came
nobody;
and then I began to
remember
,
more distinctly, who I was. Yes, I
was
William
Adamsindeed I was; and all the dreams of my
mother; the maledictions of my kindred; the
apprehensions
of my sister; all were verified, at last. I was a
murderer, in a far country. Many years had happened
since
many
. I had a distinct recollection of several
burning seasons; and several cold, wintry ones, that
had gone by, since I was confined. Yes, many a year
must have passed. But, whom had I murdered?and
why was I not executed? Ah! the reason was plainI
was
mad!
mad!but where?
T 2
I now remembered, how I had been made so. I had
been decoyed to a lunatick hospital;I remembered it
well; and the people had been persuaded that I was
deranged
.
I remonstrated. They
humoured me
, and
left me. I repeated my remonstrances; assured them,
with dignity, that I was
not
mad; bid them try me in
any way that they pleased. They shook their heads.
Ask them that know memy relations. They
looked
sadder. I grew reserved. It was a confirmation of
their belief. I laughed and talked. Poor fellow!
they would cry out, with the tears in their eyesWhat
a pity! I would argue with them. They would
listen
,
patiently and piteously, to me; and suffer
themselves
curses,
ten thousand curses, on their stupidity
and compassion!to be defeated. I would detail my
history; my wrongs; aver my own sanity; ask
questions
,
which they would answer kindly to, and go
away, and forget; and when I would repeat the tale,
till their own eyes ran over, and I had become an
object
of universal curiosity, they would
pity
me, and
tell how strangely such things ran in my head. Devils!
The women, heaven for ever bless them, for it!--
they
believed me. Their sweet lips would tremble; and
their dear eyes would change their colour; and their
bosoms would heave, while they listened to me. But
they were only women!what was their judgment? the
judgment of naturenay of God himself, in
comparison
with my keeper? YetI was a lunatick; and, do
what I would, it was only a confirmation, in their eyes,
of my malady. It was insupportable, I saw how it would
endI became violent
that
they called a breaking
outand I was put into a straight jacket. I grew
melancholy, and passive.
This
they called subduing
me. I reasonedwrestled in intellect with them
solved problems in geometry; confounded the greatest
metaphysicians of the day; dealt with powerful men,
that visited meheaven knows for what purpose
answered all questions, and told for ever the same story,
of myself. But all this, instead of proving that I was in
my senses, was only a proof of my consummate address
and miraculous natural talent. It was impossible that
this should continue. I was goaded onnight and
day-irritated, and
pitied
, and
indulged
, till I could
bear it no longer. Then I became mad, indeed
outrageously
mad, as many a stout heart had been before
me:made so, not by Godbut by man. Then saw
they the difference. I rose in my wrath! I wrenched
bars, and bolts, from my prison houseI shook it to
its foundationthey assembled about me, with fetters
and tortureI leaped upon them, rended and
trampled
them down--till--I was covered and drenched with
their blood. And then!
then!
when I had lain down,
to sleepthey had fallen upon me, and bound meyes,
yes! I remembered it, well. This was their vengeance.
I was now suffering under it.
Ha!where was I. My chains were gone. The
darkness
and smoke goneflashes of thin brilliant light
broke in upon memy couch was a gentle one. The
serpents and dews, and damp wallsO heaven, and
earth!could it be that I had only been dreaming a
dream of unutterable horrour! I had opened my eyes for
a momentbut I had shut them again, smarting and
blinded with the light.It grew darker, what! was
this
only a dream, then? or might I believeoh,
might
I,
that what I had seenthe white armwas drawing
the curtains? a whisperahI held my breath
againagain!my touched heart gave out odour and
flame, in its gratitudethe thin blood rippled through
it again!God laid his finger upon it, and light issued
therefrom.
I set up in the bedI tore open the curtains.
There sat a venerable woman by mea strangerwith
a silver porringer in her hand;a table by her,
covered
with labels, and phials; pictures upon the walls, from
the Bible; a sweet child, standing on tiptoe, with the
door half open.
The old lady looked round, with a smile full of
benignity
,yet
with a dash of terrour. I know not how
I appeared. But my thankfulness that it was a dream,
gushed, all at once, out of my heart and eyes; and I
locked
my hands, and fell, with my face upon the pillow.
Something in my manner struck the good lady, I
suppose
;
for she afterward assured me, that she came to me
immediately; and that, from that hourbut noit would
be idle to go through all the circumstantial details of
my illness and recovery, until I was entirely restored.
That good woman watched over me, like a mother. But
my dreamO, to this hour, it hath lain here and
loaded
my heart like destinylike prophecy. The hair of
my flesh rises, when I think of it. I have never dreamed
it sinceI could notI am sure that I could not. I
should die, in the trialbut, who knows? I am no
believer
in dreams?who knows what that may lead to?
Men have become mad, with the terrour of madness
andno, no, have done with thishave done, I say!
I soon learnt the truth. I was in the house, at the
gate of which I had stopped. The porter had found
me: and, by the order of his master, a wealthy and
kind hearted man, I had been born to his own house;
and nursed by his own wife. For two weeks, I had shown
no symptoms of recovery; my life was one
uninterrupted
delirum; a settled, deep melancholy silence, and
stiffened sinews, like one ressisting inward torture; and
a fierce, turbulent outbreaking, as of a chained madman,
had been the alternations of my disorder.
At last, I was well enough, to go abroad. A few
days after that, the master of the house, a plain
substantial
old quaker, came and sat down by me, and
addressed
me in the following words.
Young man. I am willing to think well of thee.
But there is thy hat (giving it to me)and there is the
sheath of an implement of death, (giving me
that
, too)
which I am sorry to say, was found upon thy person.
Thee
assailed a man;hear me out, if
thee
please; and
lost thy hat, and the other contrivance at the same time.
Thee
was advertised; and a reward offered for thy
apprehension
.
I went to see the hat and other things, and
found by them, what
thee
was.
Thee
had come to my
house for a refuge. I could not give thee up
Art thee
guilty?
I was about to interrupt him--by correcting his
phraseology
!yes,
reader, at such a moment as that, it so
shattered my nerves to hear a man pull and
haul
(hale)
the English language about so shamefully, that I had
well nigh given him a lesson in grammar, on the spot!
but he went on; and, what is harder to believeI
permitted
him to go on.
If thee be guiltyI do not ask thee to own it
there is some money, (putting some into my hand)
go! and peace be with thee; when that is gone, return to
methee shall have more;but do not repeat the
deed of death. If innocent, and would earn an honest
livelihoodtell me who
thee art
, and what; and I will
take thee into my counting house, till something better
can be done for thee.
I was thunderstruck----mute, with gratitude, and
delight. The benevolent creature! How could it be,
that I had never known the true and genuine nature
of these plain men.
No, said I, emphatically---I assure thee that I
am not guilty....thou art somewhat pre.
He stopped....looked at me, with some little severity;
like one, doubting his own senses....Why, what
art
thee?
said he---
No wonder that the good man was astonished. I had
astonished myself. But so it was,---and so it will be
for ever, with all men, when the impressions of
childhood
are revived in them, unexpectedly. I was born
a quaker; partly bred a quaker; lived a quaker, till
they had disowned my father, after a series of stubborn
wickedness, backsliding and folly, consummated by
his marriage; and, to this hour, I never can speak to a
friend
, but in the natural language of a
friend
, that of
thee
and
thou;
and what wonder? It was my mother
tongue.
No, said I. I perceive thy astonishment. I
have been one of the society. I have been disowned,
for transactions, of which, when thou art willing to hear
me relate them, I will give thee a plain and true
account
.
I am no murderer; nor, have I a bloody heart.
I was nigh starving, however, on the night that this
event happened; of which thou hast spoken; and I
carried
a dagger. I deny nothing. I shall tell the whole,
just as it happened. I had no desire to slay any man;
I only desired to terrify some one into giving me some
pence--no, not
pence
I would have dashed him and them
to the earth, if he had offered me aught but
gold
. What!
sell my soul for a few paltry farthingsNo!That
was all. I threw myself
toward
him; not
upon
him; for,
my foot slipped; and I fell, leaving my hat and the
dagger
sheath. What
might
have happenedby
possibility
,
if he had resisted me, it is horrible to think ofI
was very desperate. But my design was
not
to
murder
.
I ran off, in a paroxysm of terrour; and stopped
not, till, overcome with giddiness, delirium, and
remorse
,
I was found at thy threshold. Thou offerest
me, generous man, a place in thy counting house. Look
at me. Thy confidence will not be misplaced. I am
an injured man. I will not wrong thee. I have no
testimonial
none
to offer thee, of my character, or
capability
I
can only say
try me
. Put me to the
proof. Treat me boldly. Put confidence enough in me
to ruin thee, if I am false; or thou wilt never truly know
of what I am capable.
When I had finished, I was amazed to find myself
standing up; the good man holding both of my hands,
and looking me in the eyes; just as a father would look
into the eyes of a prodigal son. His wife sat by him,
rocking, too and fro, in a great arm chair, with her
handkerchief to her face; and, her gray silk gown
rustling
,
like the autumnal forest, in a still breeze; and
little Caroline was there too, clinging to her father's
side, and gazing upon me, with such innocent,
unaffected
delight, that I could have fallen upon her neck, and
kissed her breath away.
I have already mentioned a strange dream that I had,
when I was quite a boy. The very first night that I
slept in the house provided for me by Mr. Austen, (the
quaker, whom I have just mentioned) after our
conversation
,
I had the same dream again. But, before I relate
what I am about to, let me mention, what, I dare say all
have experienced, in
some
degree, at
some
time, in relation
to dreamsthat, many things, of which I know not the
use, or the name; and, more particularly, articles of
costly furniture, that I had seen in my dream, I had
afterward
met with, one by one; and learnt the name,
and use of; and that, I have been often startled, and
provoked tooby some resemblances to the old
mansion
;the
great picturesand the frightful disorder of
the whole house; as if the family had all been broken
up, at midnightwhich I met with, sometimes, in my
travelling, for a single moment, in my after life. I
ought not to forget, too, that, when I first read about
Pompeii and Herculaneum, and the appearance of
the houses there, that I was very forcibly struck with
the coincidence between it, and what I had seen in my
dream; so much so, indeed, that I could not be satisfied,
till I had got hold of a particular description of Pompeii,
and of the excavations there; and seen drawings of the
houses. But then I was easy. The great house that
I had seen, was not at all like their houses. Nor, was
it like the picture of any palaces, or publick buildings,
that I had often seen. It was different from all, and any
that I had ever read of, or formed any notion of; and
yet, there was nothing remarkable in it. It was only a
large, noble looking mansion, such as a gentleman of
good fortune, would be likely to build for
himself
and
it had, withal, a little of a foreign air, which struck
me, instantly.
Wellat last, I dreamed of it againwhy, I knew
not; for, I am certain, that I had not thought of it, or of
my dream, for ten or a dozen years. But now, it was a
little varied. I was in the same house. I knew it,
immediately
.
But somebody had been there, since I was.
The rich old furniture was entirely gone, from some
of the apartments; and other of a homelier fashion, had
been substituted, in two or three of them. The great
pictures were gone. The candlesticks, lamps, and
wine glasses were all gone. But, there was the stain
upon the great marble slab, at the head of the first flight
of stairs, where the lamp had fallen.Readerbelieve
mewhoever you arebelieve meI am telling you
the simple, plain truth, whatever you may think of it.
It is a truth, too amazing to be told, to the world, in
any other wayand yet. I never shall be easy, till I
have told it. I do not want the courage to tell it, and
to swear to itfor, there are people, or
were
, a little
time ago, who had heard me tell my dream, many
years before the event took place, of which I am soon
to speakbut, who would believe me, if I did? Nobody.
I put it in this shape, therefore, that people may do as they
please, about believing me. Yet, nevertheless, as I hope
to see my Maker, face to face,
that is true
. To return,
then. The dust had been carefully brushed away from
the wallsthe great crimson curtains airedit was
evident that somebody had been there. Yet, why were
the windows all closedand left too, without being
bolted, or barred? Why was the door only shut,
without
being fastened? And why was it yet uninhabited?
not a dognor a catno living creaturenot even a
fly nor a spider could I see. I stampedthe noise came
back to me, in a hollow, dead echo. I shouted
several
timeswith a loud voice; but, no answer could I
hearnothing, that sounded, as if I were not alone. At
last, I was weary of it, and came away; but, in
returning
,
I passed the door of a handsome room, which I
had forgotten to explore, at this, my second visit. I
remembered that, when I was there before, I had
descended
into it, by three small steps. I pushed it open;
and, finding the whole singularly light and cheerful.
I bounded into it, with an explanation of astonishment,
holding my hat in my handmy hair wet with
perspiration
,
from having been so long in the sultry, confined
air, of the other apartments. I was standing, I
remember
,
a little edgewise, toward a side of the room,
where there was a very large, handsome cabinetand
trying to recollect, what kind of furniture had been
there before; but, while I was doing so, something
moved
at the other end of the room. It was broad
day-light
,
and my heart was in my throat, instantly; and,
before I turned my head, a flash of light followed; as if
something, in a brilliant white drapery, had passed by
a large mirror, that I was looking into. I turned;
and beheld a fine looking girl, with fair hair, and
agreeable
eyes, watching me, with an air of perfect
indifference
.
She sat leaning back in a large chair, at the
further
end of the room. I attempted an apology; but,
the words all stuck in my throat. I could neither speak
nor breathe, nor swallow; and, I remember, distinctly,
her appearance, when I approached her; bowing,
blushing and stammering out a sort of excuse, that I
had been there before, and believed the house to be
uninhabited
.
She wore a thin, blue-striped muslin dress;
a sort of morning gownopen before, and high in the
neck; but so very thin, as to show her fine bosom; and,
particularly, her right breast, which was surprisingly
beautiful, and naturalunsustained by any corset or
stays, almost as if it had been naked. I hardly
know what followed in my dream, until I awoke;
except
that she accounted for the lonely, and exposed
situation
,
and appearance of the house, by mentioning that
a woman, her mother, I believe, was madand
confined
in a remote apartment; but, when I did awake, I
found myself lying on the floor of my room
excessively
sore, all overeven to the roots of my hair---as if I
had taken a violent cold. I went to bed again; but, I
got no more sleep that night. The old dream was
revived
;
and, I began to be troubled about it---and
determined
to do something---what, I knew not. The next
day I told it---carelessly, to Hezekiah---but, he only
laughed at me; and, I soon forgot it. Still, however,
I would have you bear it in mind.
From that hour, I was like one of the family. A
whole year passed away, like a dream to me; the most
tranquil dreaming too, of all my life. I stood high,
beyond all rivalry, in the estimation of the whole
household
.
I had even began to think somewhat seriously
about returning to the faith. Why? Let Caroline
answer
that question. She was a
child
a sweet, simple,
caressing, innocent child; yet, such was the influence of
her affectionate young heart, over my stubborn and
proud spirit, that II wish that I had not begun this
tale;but, it must be told, now. It is too late to
repent
.
At last, one evening, as we sat together, about the
fire; the mother working a rug; and Caroline reading
aloudher short, loose hair, hanging all about her eyes
(she read charmingly)---the good old Hezekiah, in
his quiet way, reminded me of my promise, to tell him
my history; adding, that, if it were painful to me, I was
discharged from it; if there were aught, that I would
U
have forgotten---why, forget it, said he; and tell
me, William, he continued, significantly, only what
would be proper, for my wife and child to hear.
I began the story. I told all that had happened to
me, substantially, as I have related it here; all, except
the particulars of my squabbling, and my love; the first,
on my own account---the latter, on Caroline's; for twice,
when I touched upon the name of Lydia, and another,
inadvertently, and faltered; I saw her red lips tremble,
and her eyes turn, with a quick, uneasy expression,
upon
the book. Then, she would throw it down; and take
up her work. Then, she sewed wrong---ripped it out---
and sewed it worse; clipped her finger, with the scissors,
and ran a needle into it, up to the very joint. Her
mother
saw it, as I continued; and, finally, bade her put
by her work, and read a chapter in the Bible. Her
voice was a gentle, clear harmony; and, when she read
aloud, from that book, it was like the sweet wisdom of
a cherub; dropping, seriously, from the lips of children.
It made my heart better to hear her read. The sweet,
plaintive, affectionate, expostulating tone; the simple,
clear undulation of sound; the perfect pronunciation;
and the ever changing cadence---from command, to
entreaty---from
supplication, to complaint---kept all my
senses alive, while Caroline was reading the Bible.
Farewell! said the father, after a short, but plain
and fervent prayer---farewell, my children!---and
then we all broke up; and, after shaking hands, went
to our apartments. I remember, that Caroline's hand,
when I took it, was passive and timid, that night, for
the first time. Have I offended her? said I, to
myself
.
The mere thought of such a thing, humbled and
pained me. I determined to know the cause; but she
would give me no opportunity. I never saw her so
assiduous
,
in my life. I tried to catch her eyes; but I
could not. Young as she was, I dared not speak to her;
nor lay my hand upon her, as if by accident, from that
time forth. We met again; and I renewed the tale, as
it is related in the following chapter, without having
had an opportunity to look once, for a whole week,
into
her young eyes.
CHAPTER XV.
Quakers...Friends....Discipline....Forbearance...Reasoning...
Marriage ceremonies...Caroline...False English of the Friends
...Reprobation of musick and dancing...Presumption and
impiety
...Reproof
of a speaker...Pronunciation...Examples.
I was
born, as I have told you, of a quaker family;
and, so far as I was permitted to think for myself---or,
to become acquainted with two or three other quaker
families, who used to visit my father, after he was
turned
out
---I was rather pleased, than otherwise, with their
ceremonies and discipline; saving and excepting their
language, dress, and prohibition of amusement, until I
was old enough to think for myself. I then---heterodox
wretch that I was---some how or other, got it into my
head---notwithstanding all their persuasion, to remain
steadfast to their faith---that it was very ridiculous
to wear a plain dress, generation after generation,
as a matter of religion; a dress, too, that, when
adopted
,
was the
court
dress of the time. I went further. I
even began to imagine, that spiritual pride might,
possibly
,
(for I was in some doubt, a long while,) be as
offensive
to the Deity, as any other sort of pride,
whatever
.
I learnt to look about me. I found that the
friends
, whom I knew, wore the very best of woollen, and
linen, and silk; and that, in
their
way, they were quite
as
dressy
, and fashionable, as other people; nay, as
proud
.
[6]
[6]
Their argument isthat
their
dress gives them no trouble; that
it is a matter of economy; and necessary to distinguish them, as a
peculiar
people. I deny all this. It does give them great trouble.
How are they to get a quaker dress made, among a strange people;
in France, or Germanyor even in some parts of America? Only by
supervising and directing the whole detail. What could a coxcomb
do more? I say that they are exceedingly particular and careful; and
rather more so, than any other people in the world, of that very
dress, which they affect to regard as a matter of indifference. A man
of plain, good sense, without any such pridesectarian pridewould
give himself no trouble about his dress, let him go where he might.
He would conform to the age of the people; taking care not to be
ridiculous, (for singularity in dress will always be ridiculous, and
childish, in a greater or less degree,) either by being excessively
in
the fashion, or excessively
out
of it. But,
is
it more economical?
Certainly
not more so, than the same colours, worn in any other fashion;
for the quakers cannot, and do not, wear their coats longer than
other men, in the same circumstances of lifeexcept that the quakers
are more sober and careful of their clothes; and might wear any kind
longer than most people.
And why should they be
distinguished
as a peculiar people? Do
they want their Divine Master to know them? Or, do they want
man
to know them? Is it to be laughed at?and mocked at? Nothat
time has gone by. Is it that they may know each other? Nofor a
genuine quaker would be known to his brethren, immediately,
however
he might be dressed; and ought to be known by his
action
, not
by his dress; by his devout, innocent simplicity, and plainness of
heart
,
not of
dress
. Well, then, what is it but thisa quaker garb?what
is it but going about, with a label upon their foreheadscrying out,
continuallyLo! we are a humbler, and quieter people, than ye; a
more godly people; more zealous of good works(or good
workmanship
which
is true;)that have prevailed against all
persecution
,
until our very dress, which was once a reproach, and a
byword
,
among you, has become an
uniform
a bannerand a trophy
of distinction? Pshaw!such is the plain truth. Beside, how
contradictory
are they, in precept and example? They
say
we do not
regard dressit is a matter of
indifference
. Then, why so
particular
,
themselves; and why so obstinate and perverse, in withstanding
all the changes among man?why so strict to mark iniquity, in the
dress of their
young?
Why do they continually cry outBy their
fruit ye shall know them, when a
gay quaker;
or a
hickory quaker
,
goes before them. One word of advice to the quakers. They will
soon become
extinct;
even in Pennsylvania. They will soon become
incorporate with the world. There is only one thing that
can
prevent
this. It is a rational yieldinga temperate indulgence. They
are half a century behind the spirit of the age. Young people,
now
,
require indulgencies and inventions, that their fathers never dreamt
of. Not that I would have them let loose upon society, without any
restraint; but I would have them taught to speak Englishand to
accomplish
their bodies and minds, in every healthful, manly, and
elegant
acquirement; till, to be a
quaker
, was no longer to be a desperate
young coltignorant and wild; or an obstinate old man, of pretty good
sensegreat selfishnessavariceand worldly wisdomwith a
severe
quiet
outside
.
Ed
.
As a matter of religion, therefore, I soon learnt to
laugh at dress.
I went a step higher. They did not swear---that was
well; but they would not take an oath in a court of
justice
.
The reason of that, was not so evident to me.---
Still, as there was nothing absolutely wrong, or very
foolish, in such tenderness of conscience, I let that pass.
I found no drunkards; no scoundrels---(scoundrels, I
mean, that have been convicted in a court of justice;)---
no downright, bare faced liars, nor thieves, among them.
How was that? I'll tell you. When a man got drunk;
or stole; or lied; and was
caught
---for much depended
on
that
---they
turned him out
, neck and heels, from
among them. Hence, they had no paupers. Certain
vices lead to poverty. This people take care to prevent
that, by watching the earliest indication of the vice;
and turning the transgressor out from among them.
That was politick;wiser, it may be, than
reformation
,
or remonstrance; said I, in the same tone of
voice.
William!
said Caroline, timidly.
I dared not look her in the face. I was wrong. I felt
that I was. My indignation was carrying me, astray.
I was obliged to confess that the
friends
, as a religious
society, are remarkable, beyond all others, for their
patience, and mildness, and compassionate forbearance,
toward the backsliding. I, myself, had experienced it.
Caroline put her little hand to her eyesand I
continued
;
while Hezekiah sat, with his broad, greasy
beaver, pulled over his forehead, smiling, with the old
fashioned benignity of one, who cannot bring himself to
chide a petulant boy, at every moment of his folly; and
Eunice, his good wifea
speaker
among the friends
only took off her spectacles; wiped them with her dark
brown bandanna handkerchief; smoothed her grey
poplin
gown; and shook her head, placidly. I proceeded.
I did not like their mode of marrying. Why, I can
hardly tell. It was surely wiser, and might be more
solemn, either as a civil or religious contract; it led to
greater circumspection; and put to trial the sincerity
the fortitude of all:but then, I had seen that,
frightened
as the women generally were, when
they
stood up, to
undergo the ceremonythat the men were always
yes,
always
more frightened than the women. This,
I thought, unlucky; it was letting out the nature of the
woman, too publickly.
Hezekiah smiled; and Caroline's mouth. I would
swear, (if I were not a quaker,) puckered a little.
U 2
And once, I remember, said I, when two foolsI
beg your pardonwere standing up to be married
[7]
[7]
Tautologypleonasm.
Ed.
.
I was there, and kept my eyes upon them; they had let
go of each others hands, in rising; or, had forgotten to
take hold of them; and when they were up, and
repeating
the word, I A. B. take thee C. D. to be my
lawful
wife; and promise through divine assistance, &c.
they were poking all the while, like two blind people,
after each others handsstanding almost back to back;
and had really completed the ceremony, before they
succeeded at all. Nay, aunt Eunicedon't be angry
with meit is very true, and Caroline
thee
need'nt
laughit may be
thee
Tate one of these days.
Poor Caroline coloured up to the eyes--her work fell;
and, in picking it up, she set her beautiful hair on fire;
and, in putting that out, scorched her fingers.
Why,
Liny
, dear, what ails thee?--said her father,
jumping up, and smoothing down her hair, over her
glittering dear forehead. Go on William, go on
never mind the childwhy, I declare, thee looks more
frightened than shewell done!
Down went the candleand we were left for a
moment
,
in absolute darkness. I attempted to find it;
and, in doing so, I encountered a soft handah,
heaven!ere I could withdraw itI felt the pressure
of a warm trembling mouth upon itI was strangely
affected---strangely. The sweet innocentcould it
be? I had no time to reflect on the matter, for a light
appeared; and I resumed my story, trembling, however,
and so pale, that it was observed. I glanced at
Caroline
.
She had pulled her little chair behind her mother; and
sat, so, that I could see nothing of her face, but a bright
line along her profileI never saw her so intently busy.
I went on.
Their language---it is detestable. They affect to
speak pure English. It is shamefully wrong. They
will not say
you
are, to an individual, because some
Roman Csar chose to be so addressed. This would
be well. I could venerate such great simplicity. But
what do they substitute? Not thou
art
; for that were
beautiful, so beautiful, that I would never use any
other language, if I did not think it
too
beautiful; too
holy, and too tender; for any other use, than, in our
prayer to the Deity; and in our communion with them
that we lovein passion; in poetry; and, most of all, in
the deep, deep devotion of the heart.
There was a silence like death in our little parlour
I could hear Caroline breathe, like one asleep and
happy.
No!but what do you substitue?a base
counterfeit
jargon, that is neither one thing nor another
saying
thee is
, and
thee art
, very often; and, generally,
pronouncing the possessive pronoun
thy
as if it were
written
thee
as thus
How's thee
wife, for how is
thy
wife. Such shocking barbarism ought to be done
with. Speak as you will; but, in the name of all that
is decent and respectable, speak
some
language or
other. Don't talk
quaker
, as if you were ashamed of it.
You value yourselves on rejecting the idle, frivolous
accomplishments
of the age, in which you act most
wisely
;
and in teaching your children only what is plain
and substantial. Yet what is the consequence?this
adulterate language is common among your best
educated men and women. Shame on you. Either
have more courage, or less presumption;more regard
to the rules of grammar, and common sense, or less
ridiculous
tenderness about the Roman Csars. Either
say
you are;
or
thou art
, and you will cease to be
ridiculous
,
however peculiar may be your dialect. It will
be then like your dress, if you choose the latter; but far
more respectable and dignified;
now
, it is as if you
should invent something of your own, unlike the garb
of any other people, savage or civilized.
Your funerals. They are well. I like to see men and
women, put into the ground like cats and dogs;in
white deal coffins, to be sure, but without ceremony.
Nay, Hezekiah, I will not be reproved. Your
society
have carried their spirit of contradiction to a
childish
,
ridiculous extent. They omit all titlesbecause
others use themthey say
yes
and
no;
and give as a
reason, that, in the scripture they are bidden to say
yea
and
nay!
But why do they not say
yea
and
nay
,
then? and why, if they are so conscientious, do they not
confine themselves to the original Greek. He, whom
they follow, did not forbid either: nor did he talk
English
.
How do they know, then, that they are obeying
him? They bury in
while
coffins, because other people
bury in black ones. They wear no mourning.
That
is well. Yet, some sign might be worn, to apprise
people
,
when they meet you, that you have lost a friend,
lest they may distress themselves; if they do not distress
you, by an abrupt inquiry after the health of your
dead wife or child? I do confess, that, to my ears, it is
very disagreeable to hear a little broadbrim, just in
jacket
and trowsersaddressing a man of
thy
age, by the
name of Hezekiah. It touches mournfully, and
unpleasantly
along my heart, where I have happened
unapprised
by any badge, even the simplestof a
death
, to
speak of some one, that was very dear toI beg your
pardon again. It is only the other evening, you
remember
,
that you, yourself, were led to inquire after
the health of a woman, who had been buried but a week
beforeof her own husband, too!a man of sensibility,
that had loved his wife, as we all knowlike a
heretick
, with all his heart and all his soul. Had he
worn any badge, I care not what-something that would
tell, not of his sorrow; but something that would warn
me not to tread, too suddenly, upon the fresh grave of a
beloved onehe had been spared that pang. They
prohibit dancing; musick--painting, perhaps; and
sculpture
.
That is bigotry, not religion. It is the
abuse
of
these things, that should be reprobated; not the
things
themselves. They worship in a manner, that would be
awful, were only the old or the truly good assembled
together. But, as that can never happen, they have
adopted, just exactly the worst mode of worship in the
world for a mixed congregation of men and women,
young and old, devout and careless. I know this.
That mind must be capable of an abstraction,
approaching
sublimity, which can maintain her
intercourse
,
in
silence
, with Jehovah, for two whole hours at a
sitting; and that too, interrupted by an eternal shuffling
of feet; blowing of noses; hemming, and hawing, and
spitting
,
for the last half hour, as the junior populationof
hearers
begin to manifest their impatience, and to hint
their desire of an adjournment.
Noit is impossible. He who would wait upon
his Maker, with a broken and contrite spirit, must be
content, either to worship him alone, in the mountain,
where the man of sorrows went, in the solitude of
his
spirit; or, with his own family, and for a shorter time;
or, if with others, at the risk of being driven, at the
mercy of all his corporeal senses, over all heaven and
earth. The senses must be
well
employed, or they will
be badly employed. They will not be idle; and, where
they have no employmentthey have no repose; where
there is no musick; no form; nothing but a cold, august,
unaccountable silence, they will work themselves out
of the place, and go abroad, vehemently.
But, worst of all, ten thousand times worse, is
their tremendous impiety. They would teach that the
age of miracles hath passed. Yet, they would affect to
work a continual miracle. The times of the Galileans
and the fishermen are not our times; yet, these men
would persuade us that ignorance and stupidity are no
hindrance, in our day, to the propagation of doctrines,
that concern our everlasting happiness. Nay, they
pretend daily,---the least presumptuous of them---to a
more intimate communion with God, than any of the
apostles did;they come into his temple;they feel
the outpouring of his grace....and power....and they
arise....full of the divinity....and talk over, again and
again, such intolerable nonsense, as we should blush to
hear, from any ordinary man, in the ordinary concerns
of life. Yet
this
this everlasting repetition; sing song;
and cant; without scope or object, argument or
inference
;
every word of which, after a little time, may be
anticipated, from the running, favourite language and
manner of the speaker, with as much certainty, as if
they were written down, and never altered, except in
their arrangement----
this
is called inspiration----the
prompting of Divinity. Father of mercies!---do these
men know what they are saying!---
they
the organs of
thy will!---
they!
O, if they really believed it, would
they not quake and fall down?---would they not
tremble
in their joints?---would they not fall upon their
faces, and pray that the cup might pass from them?
Inspiration! it is babbling stupidity; for which their
dishonoured Maker, if he had aught of human infirmity
in his nature, would silence them, for ever---blind and
darken them, for ever, for daring, in their terrifick
presumption
,
to ascribe such wretched blasphemy to his
prompting.
William! William!what art thou?cried the
alarmed and trembling motheras she stood before me,
moving her articulate hands, and outstretched arms,
up and down, as if to conjure some evil spirit, down
into the earth again.
No, mother, no I cried, standing boldly upon
my feet, before
her
No! I venerate
thee
I love
thee
as if thou wert really my own mother. I know that
thou
art sincereI have seen thee, pale as death; and
heard thy prayer, like strange musick, in my heart,
long and long before thou didst dare to arise, and give it
utterance; there are others, toomen of great minds,
and women of pure heartsbut, ye are all
presumptuous
,
infatuated creatures. Teach us, if you will. But
first qualify yourselves. What!will ye break to us,
the bread of eternal life, without first having learnt
whether ye have the power?when, you do not even
call your children about you, to teach them their
alphabet
,
till you, yourselves have
learnt
it, as other people
have learnt theirs. Are you inspired? Why are not
your children? Is the miraculous communion of God
with his creatures yet known? Then why have you
not the gift of tongues? Why do you learn languages?
Why not trust to
inspiration
for them?and, literally,
taking no heed what ye shall say, go abroad among
the nations of the earth, warning and denouncing, each
in their own language?
The good woman could endure this no longer. She
fell upon my neck, and wept aloud; and Caroline too,
I could see her little heart sobbing, in the corner. Oh
William! William!cried the former, as soon as she
could speakwould that thou mightest
feel
, with one
half the enthusiasm, with which thou speakest! Thou
wouldst then be, even in thy errourwhat I cannot,
dare
not believe thee to be nowthough I do hope ita good
man. But, let me not judge thee. We are all frail,
fallible creatures. There is only one Being, to try the
reins of men. It may be, that we are all wrong....it
may even be, that thou art right....but, dear William, I
do entreat theetake heed to thy steps. Thou art
young, and of a brave heart; going about among the
children of men, with an undaunted countenance; but,
oh William! William! my dear child! there is
One
that
can bring thee low;
One
that may, if thou art not
turned
aside, by some lighter calamity, lay
his
hand upon
thee.
Ah, William, I do love thee, even as my own child.
I am old, and have not long to live. It would make me
happy, to find thee less showy---less eloquent---more
simple and direct, in these matters. I hope that I do
not judge of thee, uncharitably; but, it doth appear to
me, that thy
nature
is---I have long thought so, but till
this night, I have been unwilling to tell thee so---is
rather
to
talk
about religion, than to
feel
it; rather to
agitate
others, than to be agitated thyself, with the name
of the living God.
I was unaccountably affected at her reproof. I hung
my head. I could find no answer to her words. I
returned
her embrace. Mother! said I---thou shalt be
my mother---henceforth, I will talk less loudly.
Oh, bless
him!
I heard some one whisper, near
me. I knew the voice. It went, into the holiest,
sweetest place of my whole heart.
There followed a silence of some minutes---and
Caroline
sat, with her head leaning away from us; and, I
thought, from a convulsive heaving of her shoulders,
now and then, that she was weeping.
Go on--- said Hezekiah, mildly, and confine
thyself
to the story---if
possible
.
Well, said I, at last, I left my native town, for
awhile, with no more notion of religion, than of the
black art. I rambled, hither and thither, without
having
an opportunity to meet with any of the society, or
to understand their discipline. At last, I happened, in
my journeying, to
tarry
awhile, where I was willing to
take advantage of my quakership; at least, so far as to
escape militia service.
Was that thy only in
doose
ment? said Hezekiah.
Ind-
yuse
-ment;allow me, said I; willing, if I
could not correct the father, whose organs were inapt
and rigid, to give Caroline a lesson, over his back.
Well, thenno matter how it is pronounced;
thee
understands me, and that is enough.
Pardon me, I replied, that is
not
enough. There
is a right way, and a wrong way. And it is always
worth our while, whatever we do, to do it right.
But it is a matter so trivial, said Eunice, mildly;
and Caroline, too, was about to speakbut the sound
died away on her lips; and she turned up her bashful
eyes to me, with such an air of entreaty, that I would
have forborn, if I could; but I could not. There were
certain sounds, in pronunciation, that jarred upon my
ear, like false notes, in musick.
Trivial!
said I. Can that be
trivial
, which is of
perpetual application, every moment of our lives?
that
,
which is almost the only distinguishing trait now,
between
the language of the well born, and well educated,
and the vulgar?
that
, which gives delicacy and charm
to the chiefest pleasure of lifesocial conversation?
Oh, no! Let me ask you. Are you not among the first
to remark the strong vulgarities, and provincialisms,
of the Irish, and Scotch? Do I not often hear you all,
kind hearted as you are, repeat, with a tone of pity,
(and shame, sometimes,) the words that you have heard
others pronounce badly, or misapply? Nay, is there
anything, that more disturbs
your
attention; or more
diminishes
your
respect for any person, than downright
vulgarism?
All acknowledge that there is not. But, we all have
our
own
vulgarisms; and that we have, it never enters
our head to conceive, until we have been thrown among
strangers; who, though not less charitable; nor more
fastidious than our friends, cannot forbear testifying
their surprise, when we fall into them. We are
startled then, and led to examine for ourselves. How
are we mortified, to find, that we have been using words
all our life, that are not to be found in our language?
Coinage of our own limited neighbourhood; cant words
of our own village, town, city, or province? We are
humbled; not much, to be sure, if we regard a delicate
nicety on such subjects, as
trivial;
yet somewhatfor
our cheeks will redden, if, while we are talking to a
stranger, we see that he does not rightly understand
us.
Trivial!
Nothing is trivial, which has a right, and
a wrong, in it; nothing is trivial, which is of constant,
hourly use, in the sweetest communion of lifethe
musick
of conversationthe harmonies of the fire-side.
Indeed,
indeed
, the time is coming, when many things,
that are now common among us, will be denounced, as
unqualified vulgarity and barbarism. I have often hurt
your feelings, my dear sirHezekiah, I meanand
yours, Caroline; but, depend upon it, that it was never
intentional; that my own have been lacerated more
cruelly
at the time, and bled longer afterward; but I know,
and feel, that the time will come, when they, whom I
have most frequently pained, for a moment, will
thank
me for it. Why are they mortified? Is it that they
really think the matter
trivial? No!
their eyes and
cheeks give a flat contradiction to their words. They
are ashamed and angry, with themselves, and with me.
They act as if they were infallible. They cannot bear to
find another wiser than themselves; as if it were any
reproach
,
to be ignorant of what we never were taught.
Their looks prove, that they do
not
regard the matter as
trivial. If they did, they would'nt be disturbed. Would
their eyes sparkle, and their lips quiver, if I should tell
them, that one bead more was necessary, to a string of
coral, upon their necks? No.
That
would be trivial.
But, if I told them that they did not keep time in
dancing
,
or that they read through their noses, then it is ten
to one, that their eyes would flash fire, and their
beautiful
forms dilate with petulancewhile some of them
W
would tell me, snappishly enough, too, that they could
not see the use of such
pedantry
or, that it was time
wasted.
Pedantry
, to speak correctly!
Trivial
, to pronounce
so, that the ear drinks in your modulation; and the
understanding
the sense thereof, like melody, and poetry;
without jarring, crash, or discord.
Suppose that you should hear a woman say, vir
too
,
or
vartue
, or
sarvant?
Would it not be unpleasant to
your
ear? Would not
your
attention to what she was
saying, be disturbed?and would
you
not be among
the first to speak of her vulgarity, afterwardwith
compassion
,
I admitbut calling it vulgarity, nevertheless?
Yet, to a well trained ear, there are many faults in
your
pronunciation, far more shocking.
What are they, William? said the mother. Tell
us now, while we are prepared for it. I have often
desired
some such opportunity for a dispassionate
discussion
of the subject; and I hope some advantage from it;
much as I lament thy evil habit of correcting every
body
Pardon me, mothernot every body; said I.
She continued, with a pleasant toneOld and young;
friends, acquaintances, and strangers. It is really a
bad habit, William; one that, apart from an appearance
of pedantry, and indelicacy, if not of a want of
feeling
,
(which
appears
to be in it,) is liable to a more serious
chargeto that of pride and self-conceit.
O, noyou do me injustice, indeed. I have no such
feeling. Do I attempt to obtrude
my
authority upon
you? Never. Do I give laws and rules of
my own
, to
regulate you? No. Do I even lay down
acknowledged
principles, if they are arbitrary, without lamenting
and acknowledging that they are so? Believe me,
mother
if
nobody, but myself, were ever to hear
Caroline
pronounce a word wrong, I should care little for it;
right or wrong, whatever she said, would be pleasant
to me.
William!
said the father, seriouslywith the
accent
of reproof; and glancing at poor Caroline.
But, she will be among others, men and women,
who are becoming more and more scrupulous, every
day; and then it would pain meI cannot deny itto
the heart, to hear her transgressing. A well bred
woman
,
or a well bred man, will so speak the English
language; or the French; or any language, if he can,
that you will be unable to say, when you hear the
former, while he speaks, whether he is Scotch, or
Irish; or Welsh, or English;or whether the latter,
when he talks French, be a Gascon, Norman, or
Parisian
.
It is hardly a less degree of vulgarity, to be
marked by nationalisms, than by provincialisms, or
cockneyisms. For my own part, I would as soon
submit
to talk the dialect of a Yorkshireman, or
Lancasterman
,
or Bow-bell-man, in London; a Canadian, or
Yankee
,
or Virginian, in America; or Arragonese, in Spain;
or anything, but the pure Castilian, there; and the
Tuscan
,
in Italy; or the
Hoch Deutsch
, in Germany; as to
speak either Scotch, Irish, Welch, or American, so as
to be known, at once, for one of either people. No
let us so talk the English language, that people will
love to hear us, even when they do not understand us;
let us adopt a standard, and follow it.
I have hurt your feeling, I know, by my
interruptions
,
now and then. I know that it is unseasonable to
arrest one, in the flow of his heart, to tell him of some
errour in his pronunciation; and, I confess, too, if he be
very
correct, that it would be well to wait till he is
done.
[8]
[8]
And yet, then is the time. Would'nt you tell a fellow, that his
pumps were split openor a lady, that her hair was coming off,in
the middle of a dance? I would; for, on more than one occasion, I
have seen strange accidents happeneven with frocks and petticoats,
in a ball roomto say nothing of garters, and false curls, and gaping
slips, and smutty facesfor want of a little timely intimation.
Ed.
But, how am I to remember all his blunders?
It is impossible. I must either correct him on the spot,
then, or not at all. Perhaps, he will get angry. In
ninety-nine times, out of one hundred, he does. I
confess
,
that it is provoking. But why? Let him search
his own heart. It is
vanity
. His self love is wounded.
He would claim to be infallible. Bless his heart; or,
rather, bless
her
heart; for I have a woman in my mind
nowwho blunders incessantly; and calls it pedantry,
to speak without blundering;a little reflection would
put that at rest, for ever. Year after year, have I
already
spent in correcting myself; yet, there is not a
day of my life, hardly, wherein I do not find that I have
been wrong, ever since I could speak; using some word
that was not English; orwhat is to the full as bad
mis
-pronouncing a word, that
is
English. And shall
she, who is set right only now and then, start and thrill,
as if her honour were impeached, because I hint to her
that such a word is not English; or that the accent
should have been placed on another syllable? I do it,
to protect her from future mortification. How will she
ever know that she is wrong, unless somebody tell her
of it? She never thinks of looking into a dictionary at
all; and I never do, unless to satisfy myself, for a
moment
.
It is only, when I hear a word pronounced in a
new way, that I run to it; rather in the expectation of
finding that I am right, than wrong. Thus, it is only
last Sunday, that I heard a well educated man, after
pronouncing, at least, one hundred words wrong,
pronounce
two, in a manner so very uncommon, that it
startled me. He said te-nure, instead of ten-ure,
giving
the
e
the sound that it has in th
e
and
sombre
,
giving
the
o
that sound, which it has in old. I had always
given the two letters the sound of
e
, in metand
o
, in
lot; and, not an hour ago, I learnt that ad-ult, is
a
-dult.
There is no practice like reading aloud, to correct our
pronunciation. We are startled, when we come to a
new word, then; but, if we are reading to ourselves, as
few of us pronounce the words, then, we pass over
them. You may commit Johnson's folio to memory;
and yet, be less accurate when you are through; and
far less prompt, than by reading a few pages aloud,
even to yourself, every day or two, for a few months,
with a dictionary at your elbow.
Depend upon it, that we are getting into a fashion,
of greater nicety and neatness, in our language. Men
are as much ashamed now; or will be, soon, of a
slovenly
pronunciationand women, of a sluttish oneas of
nastiness and vulgarity, in their dress, or writing.
Nay, I will go further. I do say, that it shocks a well
educated ear, as grievously, to hear a word
mis
-pronounced
,
as it does your eyes, to see it mis-spelt. And,
I have no doubt, that, before our country is five years
older, orthography and pronunciation will be classed
together; and that a woman will as soon discard her
lover for false pronunciation, as for false spelling; nay,
that men will learn to blush at the former, in the
tenderest
tte  tte
, as at the latter, in the sweetest
billet
doux
(pardon my French.) They will blush to
look
at one; and to
think
of the other. Nay, a few years ago,
it would have been thought as
pedantick
, for one to correct
another; a lady, in false orthography, however truly he
respected her; as it would be,
now
, to correct her
pronunciation
.
Then, it would have been held
trivial
, I
dare say; and beneath the attention of a sensible man, to
tell a girl, that he loved, how to spell. His dear one
might have written character with two
k's
, (for I have
known such a case,) with impunity; and, even now, she
may pronounce strength, strenth; frequently,
frekwently
;
per
fume,
pur
fume; going, goin; doing, doin. &c.
and nobody shall dare to hint an amendment. Believe
me, the time is not far off, when people will wonder at
our present forbearance toward such vulgarity, as we
now wonder at that of our ancestors, toward false
orthography
.
Well, William, it is getting late; and we have heard
noth
in
yet of thy history. Suppose
Noth
ing
, if you please, said I.
Well then, noth
ing
. Suppose that we postpone that
matter for to-night; and, to-morrow evening, take it up
agane?
Agen
, said I, to rhyme with men.
To-morrow is
first
day, said his wife.
Yes, said I, laughing; and the day called
Monday
,
is the second day. That is another of your whims;
it is beneath the name of principle. Why break in
upon
the customs of society, with new names, for every
day, and every month? You might as well (for the
reasons
are the same) invent a new language at once; or,
W 2
like the Jews, have a peculiar Sabbath. You refuse to
say Sunday, Monday; and January and February;
because
Pagans and Idolaters did so:but the same
objection
would hold to our language; and, certainly, to
the
Latin;that
was spoken by Pagans and Idolaters;
and all the modern languagesours, with the restare
greatly indebted to it.
Really, William, it is diverting to hear thee. What
possesses thee? cried the old man.
Thee has
gone all
round the compass. Is there anythin' wrong
there?
Why not ask him, added his wife, smoothing the
venerable hair upon his ruddy temples, with her hand,
if there be anything
right
in it. William is a terrible
critick.
Nothing but
thee has
, said I; nothing else, that I
can see. But that is
quaker
-grammar; and, beside, you
are both too incorrigible for me.
I once heard thee say, that thou couldst never
forbear
setting one right, whom thou didst respect,
although
a stranger.
True, said I; but I ought to have added this
qualification;except he be too old, or too
ill-tempered
to learn; or where he so errs, that the younger
people are not likely to be led away, with his
example
.
In general, I have too much veneration for age and
good sense, ever to presume to hint, that it may not be
infallible;
but, where it is wrong, and attended with
great authority of manner; and where that authority
would be hurtful; I have always had; and I hope that I
always shall have, the firmness and courage to
interrogate
,
even aged men.
I would have it distinctly understood, then, that I
never correct them that I despise, or abhor; neither
fools, nor scoundrels; for their own reputations are an
antidote enough to their example:nor the wise and
respectable, when it is too late to benefit them; and
nobody
is nigh, to be carried away, by their authority.
Well, well! said the old man, risingand Caroline
immediately opened the Bible. He took out his great,
heavy silver watch, with a glittering old fashioned steel
chain, cunningly wrought; If I remember right, said
hethere are ten minutes left to us
thee
was about
to give us an account of some words
Caroline shut the Bible, and leaned forward,
earnestly
;
her beautiful hair falling down over her white
hands, and shading her large mild eyes, like
dishevelled
shadow, rather than substantial hair.
And first, he continued, as to that word
induce;
how should that be pronounced?
Assuredly, not as if it were written in
dooce;
that
was the fashion of the last age; nor in
deuse
which is
the sickly affectation of the French school; nor in
juce
which is the barbarism of the present generation. But
simply and purely, so as to sound the vowel
u
in the
most forcible, and uncorrupt manner; as thus, ind
yuse
.
Injuce
, whispered Caroline, involuntarily.
Injuce, injuce
, said the mother, more audibly.
No, no, wifethat is wrong, said the husband.
Hear
me
this is itind
guce
in-juice.
No, indeed, far enough from it, said I. Do you
pronounce the vowel
u, dgu?
Nothat whole class of
wordsinduce, produce, endure, &c. &c. &c.is to be
sounded as if the
u
were written
you;
or the word
divided
thusind-
u
ce, &c.
But, a more serious fault is universal here, I find.
You always sound the vowel
e
, as if it were an
u
, in
such words as the following: mercyearthpersevere
person---perfect---impertinent; making of them, m
u
rcy---
u
rth---p
u
rsevere---p
u
rson---p
u
rfect---imp
u
rtinent.
And you call it affectation in others, who have the
courage
to depart from your practice! Yet, some among
yo; and those too, who have the quickest sense of the
ridiculous; and are among the first to laugh at a
Virginian
,
for calling a bear, a
bar;
stairs,
stars;
and at a
yankee, for pronouncing the word does, as if it were
written
dooze;
some too, whose delicacy of ear would be
grievously offended, if one should say imp
u
rative---p
u
r
u
mptory---or
u
rrour, for p
e
remptory---imp
e
rative---
e
rrour, are constantly in the habit of outraging my ears,
with the sounds
u
rth---p
u
rson---p
u
rfect, &c. &c. All
words, I find, which have a
vowel
following the conso
nant after the first
e
, as in peremptory, you pronounce
rightly; but, if there be two consonants, as in perfect,
you do not. The first you call peremptory; the
latter
,
purfect.
The law is the same, in every case. The
e
should
be always sounded, as in me, or in met. It has no such
sound as the
u
. It is a shocking barbarism.
But I observe that
thee
always says
a-er
, and
fa-er;
instead of air and fair. Is not that a little
affected!
To that, I am half inclined to plead guilty; for, I
confess that I am almost alone, in that mode of
pronunciation
.
Yet, the best authority that we have,
establishes
it. In speaking, however, I do not recollect any
person, except myself, that uses it. Yet, the sound of
ai
in
air
, and
fair
, and in a multitude of other words,
where they unite, is exactly the same, as in
maid, aim,
pail, rain
. I pronounce it so; and,
therefore
, am I called
affected
. Depend upon it, that these delicacies will soon
distinguish the well educated man, and the man
accustomed
to good society. It is no longer a proof of
gentility
,
to pronounce errour and peremptory, right; the very
vulgar would be startled to hear one of themselves say
urrour and purumptory, now; yet, I can remember
where the first
[9]
[9]
I knew a justly celebrated lawyera Judgea lecturer too, who always pronounced
e
rrour as if it were
u
rrour.
was common, among the well bred;
and, even now, it is moer common to hear fashionable
peoplein their inarticulate gibberish, leavin out the
final
g
, when they speak; and sayin' strenth, for strength
and I
done
this, for I
did
it; and I
shew
him, for I
showed
him; and she had
went
away, before I
come;
and
I had
drank
enough, &c. &c. or, where is he
at?
complete
these execrable violations, with pronouncing the
word erroneous as if it were urroneous. Nay, it was
not long since, that I was listening to a beautiful
creature
;
and holding my breath while I listenedwhen
she came down upon me, with a long story about
Capun
so, and so, who
give
her
them are
books,
what
she
had
shew'd
me, the night
afore
it
an't him
(it
are not
him!) it is
himher
and
me
walked together&c. &c.
Judge of my feeling; I declare to you, dear mother,
as I am a living man, that I could have gone down on my
knees, before that woman, if it would have led her to
attend
a little more to her speech. But, the worst of it
was, that while I was blushing for her, and pitying her,
and afraid to look up,there was probably not
another
person in the room, who observed her blundering!
She touched the harp, with exceeding spirit and
brilliancy
;
her voice was rich and harmonious; and there
was a deep breathing of passion, as if her heart made
melody within her; yet, when she came to sing some of
the sweetest and most beautiful airs in our language,
I was perpetually (not purpetually) mangled and
teazed
with the same vile pronunciationthat is, when she
pronounced at all; for, in fashionable singing, it is
impossible
to conjecture what the subject is; you are
permitted
to hear nothing but expression, and the gamut,
with variations; poetry and meaning are discarded.
In general, the final consonants are omitted; and the
most villanous blunders of the printers, consecrated.
Thus, in Moore's song. The Meeting of the Waters,
all the copies that I know are, Tis not the soft
murmur
of streamlet or
hill!
for
rill!
and you will
always
hear it sung so. I could name twenty others, to
prove that women never think; and never care, either
for the thought; the word; the English; or even the
pronunciation
,
of what they sing. In the course of the
entertainment, I heard a literary gentleman say, that,
such a man was of a very
desis-sive
turn (meaning
decisive
;)
that his char-
uc
-ter, was dif-
fic
-ult to hunderstand;
that he had hof-ten (sounding the
t
)
saw
him; that he
had lately had-
ver
-tiss'd (instead of advertised) for a
place, where he could live, if he
come in
town; and that
directly he saw it
he waited
hon im
, &c. and told him
that the man,
which
had it lasthe
who
was
beat
at,
&c. &c.
Another was called to sing; and did me the
compliment
,
as I was near him, during his preliminary
embarrassment
,
to ask me how I liked
ho, noh, me luff no
.
It was rather a puzzling question; but, as I passed for
a linguist, I thought that it might be as well to bow,
as gracefully as I could; and try to make out, in what
language it was, while he was singing it; or, if he
would be so indulgent, get a copy of it, and decypher it,
at my leisure.
He beganthrew his head backstuck his hands
in his brecches(I knew that he had been abroad, by
that, and probably seen some of the no sex at all
gentry
,
of an Italian opera, perform)straddled his legs
apart; shut his eyes, and sang, like a good fellow, amid
one universal murmur of applause. But not a word
could I understand. Was it German? Italian, Russian,
Cherokee, or what? The air too, seemed familliar
enough; but I could not recollect it. I waited on him, the
next day for a copy; he was superlatively polite; hoped
that I was delighted with it, &c. wondered that I had
never met with it; and the next day, brought it to me,
with his own hands, copied, O! exquisitely!
I opened it, with one of my best bows. Judge of my
astonishment! It was some minutes, before I could
believe
my own eyes, but a little consideration convinced
me that they could be depended on; and that the song
which I had heard, was English, tolerable English, at
least, and called
Oh, no, my love, no
.
I saw Hezekiah, look at his watch. It was just the
hour, and we parted for the night; nor did we meet
again, until the next
third
day evening; that is, the
evening of the day, called Tuesday.
CHAPTER XIV.
Pronunciation...Continued...Variety of women...Anecdotes...
False curls...Deafness...Garters.
I have
been thinking, said the good lady to me, as
soon as we had seated ourselves, that this propensity
of thine, William, is unamiable and imprudent: this, I
mean, of reproving them, who speak a little wrong.
A
little
wrong, mother!there can he no such thing.
They are altogether wrong, in the pronunciation of a
word, if they be not altogether
right
.
But it will make thee enemies, William; nay, it has
already.
What! and shall I not hazard something for the
benefit of them, that I love? Shall I
not
, if I see a
sweet creature's frock open at her shoulders; or a
beauty spot upon her face, tell her of it, because she
may, as women always do, at the most delicate of such
intimations, blush and tremble a little; and be a little
angry with me, as well as ashamed of herself? NoI
have gone up to a woman in the street, whom I never
saw, before; and told that her garter was trailing after
her. Did she thank me for it? nonot then. But
when she was at home, if she had any heart, she did, I
am sure; and, if she had not, why should I care for her
opinion? A hundred men were looking at her; many
women; some boys; and a little kitten, as she went by
a door; where it was playing, had leaped at the garter,
and set all that saw it, in a roar. Nay, when
everybody
else was laughing at, or pitying a sweet girl,
who, all alive with vivacity and frolick, was giving out
her beauty and fire, to a score of young men, and
just on the point of joining a cotillion. I, who was
behind her; and alone,had no respect for her, and
no feeling, other than that of compassion, and was
not even acquainted with herI saw that her head
ornaments were awryher false curls loose; and
just ready to fall. Others saw it too; but they were
either men, who were
afraid
to approach her, like men;
or women, who were maliciously holding back from the
dance, and watching her, in expectation of the
catastrophe
.
What could I do?there was no time to be lost,
the flirtation that she was carrying on, whether she
danced or not, would speedily bring all her head
ornaments
into her lap. I approached her; and, from a
sudden thought, I know not what suggested ittook
out my handkerchief as if I had just picked it up;
offering
it to her;your handkerchief; miss, said I
looking at her head dress, very significantly, at the
same time.
That moment, she uttered an exclamation in French,
Perhaps, thought IO,
perhaps
she may
understand
French. I repeated my offer in Frenchbut her
knowledge of it was exhausted.
She stared at me; bowed, and put aside the
hander-chief
;I
added a hint relative to her situation; but she
did not understand me.
Do not dance
, said I
until
you have been into your dressing roomand, as I
said this, I glanced again at her hair. She coloured
arosefalteredand the tears came into her beautiful
eyes. ButI saved her a mortification, that she never
would have got over.
The next day, a gentleman waited on me, with a
challenge from a
friend
of his. In such matters, I have
a way of my own. I have nothing to write to your
friend, sir, said I-nothing to say, till I have
seen
him.
Let him call upon me; and I will then give some kind
of satisfaction, I promise you.
The man was difficult to appease; bullied and
threatened
,
a good deal, by proxy, until, I was obliged to
no matterneither of us was hurt, and I found that
all my benevolence had been mistaken for
cruelty
, and
wantonness. The girl had not magnanimity enough to
tell her lover (he was a
new
one)
what
I had done; and
why
I had done it: and all that he was permitted to
know, was what he had seenthat I had spoken to the
fool that he loved,without any introduction;that she
was mortally offended;that she left the room, in tears,
without dancing in the cotillion, for which she was
engaged
;and
that she had refused to give any
explanation
of what I had saidprobably, as
he
thought, poor
simpleton! out of tenderness to him.
And once too, where an amiable girl, who was a
little
hard of hearing, had been over-persuaded to sit at a
piano
, with which she was unacquainted; the keys of
which were very hard and stiff, while the keys of that,
which she was accustomed to playing upon, were
delicate
and soft. She began to sing; and touched the
keys very softly
very
as she would, her own, for an
accompaniment. Poor soul! it emitted no soundnot
any: not a note!And the people about her were cruel
enough, to let her continue to expose her infirmity, till I
lost all patience; and quietly intimated to her that the
notes were not
very
distinct. She coloured; and has
not forgiven me, to this day, I verily believe.
So is it with you women, in everything. If your
vanity be wounded, with the friendliest hand; with the
most salutary intention, it is a mortal affront, never to
be atoned for, or forgiven. Many an one, have I
offended
,
by preventing her from making herself
ridiculous
for ever; though I did it, not harshly, nor
publickly
;
but quietly, and kindly, as I would my own sister,
or child, or beloved one.
But why give thyself such trouble? said Eunice.
It were better, I think, to let every one do as he
pleases
.
It is an unthankful office, at best; and may not
the utility of thy advice be questioned. For
example
;
if we
pronounce
as other people about us dothat is
enough; is it not?we are intelligible; and to what
other purpose would we have language applied?
If that argument be good, mother, said Iit will
go to justify all barbarismsstop all improvement.
The Yorkshireman pronounce as the people do, that
are about him; and
he
is understood. But
is
that
enough? However, we have said enough on this
subject
now. Tell me, in one word; shall I abandon the
practice or not?
Thee
maynay, I wish thee, to correct
Lynee
,
said the father; to which the mother assented; and
Lynee
too, or her pretty eyes told a fib, was not very averse
to it.
X
Well!on one condition, I will obey you. It is this,
that you agree to act in this matter, as you
do
, in all
others, according to that which you believe to be right,
without regarding what your neighbours may do, or
think, or say. If you will agree to this, I do not
despair
of making your daughter abandon all her evil
habits of pronunciation, and grammar; numerous as
they are, in the course of a few months; together with
her, it is
me
, it is
him
, it is
her
, and
who
have
you seen. If you do nothenceforth, I will give
myself
no trouble about her language, or utterance;I
am resolved, I cannot endure this perpetual irritation
and soreness. It wears upon me; and, when I hear a
principle avowed, by a judicious parent, which, if
followed
,
would justify every species of vulgarity in
pronunciation, I am ready to take an oath-yes an
oath
never again to open my lips upon the subject. If it
be enough, to speak as others do, where shall we stop?
with our countrymen? our provinicials? our citzens?
townsmen? companions? or family? Every family has
its own peculiar vulgarities; many, that are distressing
to others. Yet, you would not correct
them
, because,
the family understand each other. And, what is the
purpose of language, but to make ourselves
understood
?
This might be well enough, if you were never
to go out of your own family; your own town; your
own circle of acquaintances; your own province, or
your own countrybuthere Hezekiah laughed
out-right
;
at the sound whereof, his wife stared at him,
some minutes in astonishment; and well she might, for
she had not heard him laugh aloud for years before.
Thee
can't leave the subject;
thee
can't! I see
plainly
,
said the benevolent old man; as soon as he could
speakthat is so like thee!taking leave, but never
goingsaying farewell to a subject, but never leaving
it.
I
was
rather mortifiedit is in vain to deny it:one
does not like to be told of his infirmities, be they what
they may, so bluntly;but, like other people, I joined
in the laugh, in an odd hysterical way, and began my
story anew. It was a rainy night; and, not a soul
came in, to disturb us, till I was through. I was often
inetrrupted, for my levity, or for something worse; but
the result was nearly what follows.
Soon after I had arrived where there was a society
of friends, as I have said before, I thought proper to
claim such of their privileges as were accessible to me.
I went, now and then, to their church; and wrote to the
Monthly Meeting, nearest to my native place, for a
certificate
of membership; for, having been born a
member
,
I continued one, till dismissed. One was
prepared
for me; but miscarried. Anotherit shared the
same fate. I never received a third, till it was nearly
all over with me. In the mean time, certain bailiffs,
who were marvellously incredulous as to my right
of exemption, inasmuch as I used the profane
language
;
and had been seen by more than one of their
number, in more than one ugly scrape, where my
pacifick
temper was not so abundantly conspicuous, were
rather clamorous for certain militia fines. Now it
happened
that, conscientiously scrupulous as I was
about bearing arms, I was still more, about paying
militia
fines; and, most of all, about going to prison--so, at
last, I compounded with my conscience; the scripture,
and the bailiff; all at the same time, by paying them a
year in advance.
This came to the knowledge of the society, and they
appointed a committee of shoemakers and tailors; plain
substantial men, not having the gift of the gab, to any
degree like myself, to wait upon me. I found the
matter
exceedingly pleasant, for a time; for these thick
headed gentlemen permitted me to have all the talk to
myself. I pleaded scripture; for theI beg your
pardon
the
best friend, that I have, can do that, you know,
to servehis turn; I quoted the command to submit to
the powers that be;that of rendering to Csar the
things that are Csars; and that, where the Son of man
says, that he came,
not
to bring peace, but a sword
among the nations. NayI contended till my own
head ached(I say nothing of
theirs
, for they never
gave me an opportunity of asking them about that
after we parted; and I was too busy, at their first visit,)
that it was not a part of Christ's mission among men,
to preach unequivocal submission, else why have you;
ye, that are followers of his submissivenesslaws, bolts,
bars? and why hath our indignation been left to us? or
why, indeed, was it ever given to us.
But, said Eunice
He
said to him that smote off
the ear of another, put up thy sword. He, that
slayeth
by the sword, shall fall by the sword.
Hear me, for a moment, mother, said IBe
patient
for one moment. If it were truly the main
object
of
his
mission among men, to preach entire and
unresisting submission, to evil and insult;-would it not
have been taught continually and plainly? Would it not
have been the burden of his whole doctrine? Would it
not, at least, have been most familiarly known to his
immediate
followers? Would it not have been known by his
disciples?
YetI pray youreflect for one moment
Peter, a
rash
man---goes into the
presence
of his master,
with a sword
upon his thighstands by him,
unrebuked
,
while they are surrounded
with a sword
upon his
thigh; an instrument only of bloodshed; and, finally
draws it, in the presence of his master, and slices off
another
man's ear! Would
thy
servant do this, thinkest thou?
Draw your own conclusions. Mine are these: either
the mission of Christ was
not
what you believe itto
inculcate non-resistance;-or, it was
not
distinctly taught,
even to his disciples;--orit is the only conclusion left,
one of the three must be truehe, who wore a sword
in his master's presencemisunderstood his doctrine;
or contemned his authority. Now, take your choice
of these three dilemmas. But let me return to the
committee. They went away, just about as wise as
they came; and, reported, I suppose, that it were about
as rational to hold dealing with a wild beast, as
with me. Another lot were chosen; good men and
true, with thicker skulls if possible, and less to say,
than their predecessors; all that I can recollect of
their
argument was, that they sat still with me, for half an
hour or so; groaning inwardly, now and then, as if they
had the cholick; looking all the time at my fashionable
dress, from head to foot, as if they were my unpaid
tailors; taking an inventory of it, in pounds, shillings
and pence.
In the mean time, for
they
were very patient, and I;
how could I be otherwise!--it was a dull season with me,
and I found it quite a genteel affair to have the
meeting
come to meinstead of being obliged to go to the
meeting. Mohammed and the mountain.
But, in the mean time, I had a rather unlucky affair
of another kind, to trouble the society with. A great
lubberly bull headed fellow; the biggest of about half a
score, that I had quarrelled with, on the same morning,
had been nominated to give me a flogging. Now, if
there be any one thing on this earth, that I have a
mortal
aversion to, it is that of being publickly kicked and
cuffed about, in the middle of a streetthe broadest
and most frequented street of a large townat the very
hour too, of all others, when the women are out, like
frogs after a showerjust about twilight, of a long,
beautiful summer day.
About this time too, I happened to be in loahem
rather intimate with a little dark-eyed coquette,
who was playing the devil with meI beg your
pardon
.
I had an engagement to see her, one evening; one
of the pleasantest, as I live, that ever I saw, heard or
read ofthe sky was all of a floating rose colour; and
the air came by one, balmy and scented, like the breath
of young girls, that have been romping on new mown
hay. It was just about sunset; the street was
thronged
with fine women; and, there was an unusual
stillness
about. As I turned the corner, with a heavy
orange
tree stick in my hand, the gift of my dearest friend
(at that time;) I saw, the moment that I came in
sight, half a dozen persons that were standing on the
side walk, at a little distance before me, separate; and
run off, different ways, as if a rocket had been thrown
among them(just as I have seen your
tatterdemalian
militia, after a defeat, when trying to rally in
platoons) and pop into the houses and stores, along
the street; and look out, as if they expected something
wonderful to happen. I stopped and looked, too; but,
saw nothing, and suspected nothing, until I was
arrested
X 2
by a brutal voice, calling to me by name, and asking
me, if I did'nt think, sure, that I was a pretty fellow?
and be damned to me?
It was rather an odd question. I thought; but still, I
had been so in the habit of hearing it, on all hands, from
my youth upward, that I turned deliberately round;
measured the fellow, from head to foot; and said, in
my prettiest mannerwhyyes (I like to be
modest
)yeyes
rather
so. Some other conversation
followed; during which, I was so intolerably
frightened
,
that, upon my life, I would have given a hundred
pounds, to be out of the scrape. I saw what it was
coming to. I was, probably, about to be beaten by a
great bull-Irishman, to his own heart's content; and
my own everlasting disgrace.
My
heart collapsed
and gave out the blood, like hot wine, at the thought.
A blow then, would have been fatal to me; but, at the
next breathby heaven! I could have torn him, or any
man that ever breathed, limb from limb, had I been
shut up alone with him, where no mortal aid could come
to him. I stood upright; I felt a commotion within me.
He had waked the lion in my heart.
He approached me, brandishing his arms.
Stop! said Istop!if you have any desire to
quarrel, there is a way of doing it, like men.
Noh, noh!none o' your sword and pistols; and
them are sart o' things, for menothin but your
bull-dogs
.
I expected a blow, every moment.that is, I
expected
him to attempt one; and, I was prepared to lay him at
my feet, at the first movement of his arm.
Let us go to some other place; said Iit is too
publick, here.
But nonothing would do for the brute, but a scuffle,
there. Perhaps it was the better for me. It made me
desperate. The thought of being beaten
there
, was
death to me; it shook me to the dust.
Nothing keeps my hands off of you, hinney, said
he, after a few more flourishes, and seating himself on a
box at the doorbutbutif I thought you would'nt
take the law o' me
, I'd drub yeI woulddirectly.
That was too bad. The law! said I, No. I will
not
take the law of you.
Still, he did not strike me; and I turned, leisurely, to
go away; glad enough, I assure you, to get off so well.
But my moderation fired him anew.
Ye're a dd puppy, said he.
My first design was, to level my orange tree at his
head. If I
had
, it would infallibly have shattered his
skull, thick as it was; but, I did notI changed the
direction
;
struck
at
him, with it, and just turned it aside;
he caught at it, and I let it go. The scuffle was soon over.
He fell, two or three times; and finally, grappled with
me. This, I had sought, all along, to avoid; for, I knew
that it would be the death of meand I was very weak
if I did not heave him. But, I know not how it was
I made one effortone, onlyand, for a moment, I
felt as if every blood-vessel in my body had been
ruptured
I
lifted him from the earth, and dashed him
upon
the pavement.Never shall I forget the horrible
voice that broke from him, as he fell over the curb-stone,
with a tremendous squelch. We were separated. His
wife appeared at the window, shricking and bawling;
and the street was crowded with people. There was
not a moment to lose. I was not hurtbut, I had
lost my hat; and, such was the prodigious strength of
the fellow, that, when he grappled me, once, with his
right hand, he took a handful of cloth out of my coat;
waistcoat and shirt; buttons and all, from my breast.
My hat was given to me; and, the next moment, I felt
something like a blow, whistling by my head. I
dodged
it; and found that I was assailed again, unarmed as
I was, with a bludgeon. I turned round; begged a cane,
and desired that he might be kept from running away.
Now was my time!with a cane, I felt sure, Irishman
though he were, that I could beat him to a jelly,
in ten minutes! but, he saw fit to sneak off, while
his wife kept up the show of defiance and threat, by
trumpetting away at the window above. Thus ended
that affair.So little was I hurt; so little discomposed
by it; that, when I had buttoned my frock coat over my
opposite breast, so as to conceal the ruin that had been
made; and elbowed my way through the crowdI
remember
that I was asked by several persons, who saw
me coming away from the centre, what was the matter?
NayI went to my appointment, and spent the evening
quite sentimentally; and nobody there, suspected aught
of the matter.
But, the best of it is to come. The scoundrel took
the
law o' me
, after all!told his own story, swore
that he was cruelly beaten; confined for several days;
and I know not what else.
But how happened it? said the judge. What did
you
say
to Mr. Adams.
Hi said nothin to him, sir, your honour.
Nothing!it is very extraordinarya small man
to attack one of your size, without any provocation
what did you
do
to him?
nothing
too, I suppose.
Nothin, sir, your honour.
Are you sure?
Very sure, your honour, sir. Hi only called him a
dd puppy, sir, that was all, sir!
Welland what did he do, then? said the judge.
He knocked me down, your honour, hi.
And what else
could
you expect? said the judge;
and sent us both away;
him
with an admonition
to be civiller of speech; and I, to govern my temper
with a fine, and some cost; just enough to make the
affair ten times more disgraceful to the sufferer, than if
he had put up quietly with the beating. But that is the
common course of justice, every where, I find.
But, as I was telling you, the
friends
took up the
matter; and, to propitiate them, I wrote a beautiful
article
,
for a publick magazine; in which I proved,
incontestably
,
that no man had a right to put up his
hand, or wink with his eyes, when a blow was aimed
at him. This done; and an
acknowledgment
, in which
I acknowledged that
they
were all wrong; and I,
altogether
right, in sundry matters of great moment; and
confessed to some
change
which I really felt; (and no
human being was ever more grateful for any
change
,
than I was, about that time)being made. I was
received into the society again; and protected, annually,
from military duty. A matter which kept my
conscience
,
which was apt to be exceedingly turbulent,
when hotly dunned, in a state of uncommon quietude,
for a long time.
But the devil is ever going about seeking whom he
may devour; not that I would impute anything so
preposterous
to him, as the thought of going about for such
cattle as I, nowe generally spare him
that
trouble.
And in the progress of a season or two, I began to have
some strange notions of my own, about man's
accountability
.
I could not conceive of more than
one
, First
Cause. It troubled me too, to comprehend some things
that, to the dullest creatures that I had ever met with;
creatures that had hardly the wit to keep themselves
out of fire and water, were most exceedingly plain.
And, after much painful, very painful, and I would
say
devout
meditation, if that were not a word
prohibited
to the hetero lox;and exclusively appropriated,
like the word
evangelical
, to them that preach the Deity
as not forgivingdear father; but an implacable and
wrathful God; as One, who, while he teaches man to
forgive
his fellow man seven times in a day, if he repent, can
not himself be appeased, till man hath paid the uttermost
farthing of his debt to him, either in agony or
substitution
;
and
not
, what he had proclaimed himself to be,
the Lord! the Lord God! long suffering and merciful!
when he went by, in the wind and darknessI came to
the following conclusion, as the sum and substance of all
religion
To do as I would be done by
.
I was denounced. I was called upon to
acknowledge
things, that I did not, and could not believe; and
to believe, what I could not understand. I smiled. I
was charged with having denied the
Divinity
of Christ;
and that, too, tremendous presumption! in the presence
of E. W. herselfa womanwith all the childish
pedantry of a womanwho hath gone throughout all
America, dealing out the fag-end of all the sermons that
were ever written; and the lees; and refuse fragments of
all thought and science; dealing it out too, the ineffable
nonsenseas the inspiration of Almighty Godas
if the Almighty God, dealt in bad English; or did not
understand the commonest rules of logick and inference.
Nayforgive meI mean not to be profane or
irreverent
.
This woman won her way into notoriety, by her
masculine voice; rather than by her masculine
understanding
;
and by crowding it home adroitly, that, to be
brought to exhibit herself before the world, among
men
the wise and the powerful; exposed to taunt,
ridicule
and upbraiding; a
lone woman
, she must have
been wrought upon, by no common sense of
duty:
must
have been impelled and sustained by no earthly hand
as if women have not an ambition of their own--a
vanity
and pride of power, altogether their own.Why, one
might as well argue that the infatuated creatures, who
used to wander naked through the populous places of
London, could never have been brought to it, a thing
so contrary to their natures! but by an omnipotent
sense of obligation; or unless, upheld in their shame
and humiliation, by ministering angels; O, woman!
woman
!it
is
thy
nature to expose thyself!it is thy pride
and office; the object of all thy solicitude,nay of thy
creation
to do it. I have never known oneno, not
one
, that
would not have gone naked, as she was born, if the
custom
of society would have permitted her.Eve, and
the women of the South-sea island; and the women of
high rank, at balls, are the same creatures; they go, as
nearly naked as they can, for a cold climate and the
fashion
. I do not know one, at this moment, however
trembling, sensitive, delicate and modest she may be,
butwhere it is made to appear her
duty;
or where she
can find a decent excuse for itis willing enough to
disarray
herself, body and mind; else why does a woman
ever
marry? Mother! such are my feelings, when, I hear
the loud voice of a woman, no matter where; in her own
house; or in an assembly of men, that I could go
backward
,
reverently, and throw my cloak over the
nakedness
of her spirit. But let me return.
I replied calmly,---reasoned and remonstrated with
a committee of intelligent, worthy, and high minded
men, that were now sent to me. They soon learnt to
treat me with respect: and I love to remember them.
But they did me wrong. It is your duty, said I, to
dismiss me. If it be essential to adopt a
creed
, I
cannot
remain among you. My only creed is one that
Jehovah
hath written here,
here
, upon the tablet of my heart.
But would it not be well to leave points of belief, to be
settled between man and his Maker? You charge me
with denying the
divinity
of Christ. I do not. I only say
thisthat to my belief; and
he
knows that it
is
my
belief, and understanding, Christ is not Godthe
only
God; the Everlasting. What he is, I do not take
upon myself to say; whether divine or humanor a
compound of both natures. I do not pretend to fix his
rank in creation. It is enough for me, that he came
among us; and taught us the purest and loftiest
religion
.
He may be more than all the powers, angel and
archangels
,
princedoms, dominations, thrones; but, to my
heart, and my head, he is not
God
.
Then he must be
man
, said one of the committee.
Really, said I,
that
, I do not see, so clearly.
O yes, WilliamDivine, or human, he
must
be-God
or
man, said he; and the committee nodded their
approbation
.
Pray said Iwhat are the angels?they are
not
men, are they gods?
They were staggered for a moment.
But, perhaps they are
divine
, I added. I admit
that they are; so is Christ; so is man. We all have a
portion, more or less of Divinity. That is my
doctrine
.
But the play, William, the playwhat do
thee
say
to that? continued the committee.
I had written a play.
Have you ever
read
it? said I. It is called a
play. But how know you that it is not a sermon? It
is
in reality.
Read it, before you condemn me; will you agree to
denounce morality, if it take the shape of a dialogue?
There are sacred dramas, you know, by Hannah
Moore. Young has written a playAddison,
Johnson
,
Miltongood and great men, have written plays.
BesideI wrote it for bread. Will you prohibit a brick
maker from selling brick for a theatre?A carpenter,
a painter, from working upon it? Where will you stop?
Men-I tell you, for I
know
it; that, base and profligate,
as are our theatres in general; ministering to our worst
appetites in the worst way; teaching women to hear
and see, what they would blush to read about; or to
describe to their own fathersyet, there is no comfort
or convenience of life but may be abused, to as great a
degree.
However, I do not defend myself. I am
not
ashamed
of that tragedy. I am not sorry that I wrote it; and
I will not say so. I am proud of it. I will not say,
therefore, that I am sorry for it. Butthat I am
sorry
for certain opinions which I have avowed heretofore;
and repented of since,I will confess. If that will
satisfy youwell. If notdismiss me. To deal
plainly with you, I think it is your duty to dismiss
me. The world know, that, in nothing whatever, do I
conform to your discipline; and yet, that I am protected,
as
conscientiously scrupulous
. That is wrong. Dismiss
me, thenbut let your reason be, not, that I deny the
divinity
of Christ, for that will admit of dispute;and
I say positively that I do
not:
but that I have violated
your law.
The men assented to this; shook hands with me,
cordially, and departed; made their report; were
laughed
at for their opinion of me; and another committee
were appointed in their stead. Would you believe it!
The first had gone away, and reported, that I denied the
Divinity of Christ!yes! after all that I had said to
them.
The second were, at first, inclined to treat with me,
like dictatorsmuch as men treat with fractious and
rebellious children. But I soon brought them to
their
senses.
They found that they had to deal with one, that was
not to be trifled with; and could not be easily baffled, or
terrified, or awed. Old as they werewise as they
wereI felt my equality with them; and I made
them
feel it, too.
Meeting after meeting was had. I cannot complain
of them. They were full of caution, wisdom, benignity,
and forbearance. But, one eveningit was the last
one of them, when put to the questionand it could be
no longer evadedacknowledged that they also should
report me to the meeting, as one that
denied the
divinity
of Christ!
I could bear this no longer. I took my stand on
the spot. Look ye, said I, if you want to turn me
outdo it; but do it peaceably. Don't provoke me.
You have reason enough to justify you; and I am ready
to go out, quietly. But, mark meif you assign
that
reason, I will put you to the
proof
. If you expel me, I
know my course. It is one, that I
will
follow. I will
get out a mandamus(I knew enough of law, to
understand
the power of
that
writ; for it had set the whole
neighbourhood by the ears, oncewhen issued to
restore
a libidinous, profligate scoundrel, to the desk, that
he had dishonoured and polluted, again and again, by
his wickedness)and compel you to
prove
this. You
are a corporate body. I am a member, entitled to
certain
privileges. Assign
that
reason, if you dare; and I
will never give you a moment's rest, in this world, nor
the next, till you have
proved
the wholeevery word,
and every letter!
They looked at each other, in astonishment. It had
never entered their heads, that I would stand at bay,
so formidably, at the
last
hour.
We are not to be frightened, said one of them,
resolutely
.
I do not desire to frighten you, was my reply.
I would only have you prepared, for what I shall
assuredly
do. Think of itdo as you please; but,
my
resolution
is taken.
We separated; and, a short time afterward, two of
the same committee, waited on me, again, with my
certificate
of dismissal, fashioned according to my own
dictation; adding, that there lay an appealand that
the thing had been taken a good deal to heart, among
them. I knew it. I knew, that one man had shed
tears, when the disavowal was consummated.
I thought for a moment. My heart took fire. What!
an
appeal?
It was the very thing! It would give me
the best opportunity, in the world, of shaking their
temple to its foundation, with all the Philistines about
me. I inquired into the form. But, they had been so
kind, so respectful, of late, to me; and were so truly
interested
in my welfare, before they left me, that I could
not do it. No, noI
could
not; and I told them so.
No, said I, if I should make an appeal, it would
not be from any movement of conscience; any desire of
being reinstated; but only from a desire to show
myself
.
Out of respect to you, thereforeyou, who have, at
last, learnt to know meI will not.
We parted; and the last words that were spoken to
me, were the following. Shall I ever forget them?
They were spoken by one of the ministry. Farewell,
William!farewell! I wish thee well; and I do not
entirely
give up the hope of seeing thee among us again,
yet; and, perhaps, a
fellow labourer
. That is, a
preacher
among the quakers! I!I!a quaker preacher!
Well, wellit may be. The very oddity of the thing,
may, one day or other, bring it about. It works in
my mind yet.
Eunice wiped her eyes, when I ended; and gave me an
affectionate embrace; Hezekiah shook his head, with
an air of uncommon perplexity; and Caroline, affecting
not to see me, stooped down, so that her smooth brown
hair fell all over her neck and face; but I could see her
sweet eyes dancing through it, like lamping starlight
dimmed, and dashed, by the tears of heaven, and the
blown shadowy tresses of the wind.
We parted.
CHAPTER XVII.
Caroline...Her appearance...Friendship, a delicate plant...
Counsel
...Effect
of negligence....Cruelty...Little Belt...Olivia...
Eliza...Susan...Anne...Harriot....Rachel...Self reproach...
Charlotte...Advice to families...Manufacture, and consumption
thereof...Eliza? Eliza? Eliza?...Jealousy...Game laws...
Camp-Meeting
...Unknown....Religion...Adventure...Expostulation
...Jealousy...Dream...
Discovery!
I had
been above three years in this family; was yet
young, fiery, and adventurous; having an uncommonly
deep acquaintance with men; with the human heart,
and with human passion; nay, an unexampled one, I
might say; for I have never, yet, met with a man of
twenty-five, so deeply read, as I was, at twenty, in
that terrible lore.
I have spoken of Caroline, frequentlyand, as if by
accident; and the fact is, that I have been afraid to
speak of her. It is a melancholy subjecta painful
one; and, as I do not feel myself altogether guiltless of
her deathher destructionI cannot think of her,
without a deep agitation here; and a strange, tremulous
motion of the eyes, as ifas ifthey
would
weep, but
could not. I loved Carolinefervently loved her.
But how? Not as I ever loved any other earthly thing.
My tenderness for her was affectionate and pure; but
rather compassionate, than lofty; rather sweet and
tender
,
than thrilling. I cannot well describe it; but, my
belief is, now, that I loved herbecause she loved me.
She was about thirteen, when I first saw her, and
rather
small of her age; add to which, that she was
dressed
so like a child, in a neat little grey frock, and white
apron, with her changeable deep brown hair crossed so
meekly over her forehead; and parted with such
delicate
accuracy, that I only thought of her, as of a
singularly
interesting child, of about ten or twelve,
shamefully
maltreated in her dress. Some months wore
away, and I was the happiest of human creatures;
nothing
troubled me, except the silence of my dear sister
Elizabethwho, certainly, did not rightly fulfil the
duty of a correspondent. But why should I complain?
It is the nature of women, even of the bestfor she was,
and
is
one of the bestto be warm and passionate
awhile, and thenreader, I leave it to you to finish
the sentence. I do not like to be severe, or bitter.
Women partthe dearest of friends; nay, so do men
swearing a perpetual friendship; are devoutly attentive,
for awhile, in their correspondence; grow cooler and
cooler; laying by their letters, when received, till their
glow and beauty are-gone; and all the emotion that
they first awakened, is forgotten; at last, they are ready
to reply; and then they sit down, reluctantly, as to a task,
not to be put off any longer; angry with themselves,
and willing to find any excuse for their own coldness;
write a formal, unnatural page or two, as if they were
making a speech
at
one, rather than conversing
with
him; and bless themselves for their own courage.
Shame on them. Friendship is a plant of a delicate
growth. It cannot be neglected with impunity.
People
may love each other truly and heartily; they may
grow to each other in their devout pulsation, till they
have, literally, but one heart and one soul; yet, a little
neglect, a very little, constantly operating, as it always
will, in a geometrical proportion, acting and reacting
forever, will be sure to sunder them, at last, and
deaden
all their sensibilities. A certain degree of
communion
daily
communion, if possibleis necessary,
between
people that are growing old together. Our
appetites
;
opinions; and modes of thinking; are all liable
to change. We know that. But we learn to
accommodate
ourselves to this change, while it is
gradual;
and while it is only gradual, like the growth of
children
,
or the approach of old age, upon those, with whom
we daily associate, we do not observe it, and are never
startled by it. But, that intercourse interrupted for
awhile, we meet our dearest friends, almost like
strangers
.
Have you not met some one that had been dear
to you many years before, after a long and trying
separation
;
during which, no letters came from him, to
tell the growth of his understanding, or the change of
his heart; and no intelligence whatever from them that
had seen him, and could tell how he looked and spoke?
Have you not? And did you not meet that friend,
rather
as a stranger, withif there were
any
rising, at
all, of the hearta rising, like a cold spring of water,
too suddenly disturbed; than as your friend? O, it is
too true. I have bitterly experienced it. Many a cold,
unnatural hour, have I spent with them that I
had
loved
;
them that
had
loved me; after a long absence,
during
which, we had grown up with other inclinations;
suffered differently; been happy differently; and felt the
sunshine and wind of a different hemisphere, upon us.
The work of friendship, and often of love, when we
meet anew, is all to be done over again. We tread
cautiously, as we approach the darkened hearth; and
tremble, while we stir the ashes, lest we may find no
embers
there; nay, lest we may find adders there. Some
up, or to allude to them; nor even the heart to do it, lest
will
be, often, when we have not the power to touch them
sweet, thrilling reminiscences there may be; and there
we may find no answering intonation. O, it is very
trying, to find that
she
hath forgotten, what you but too
well remember; to find
her
heart silent, when yours
hath been touched and tuned to the memory of other
days. You are preparedyour hand is liftedthe
apparitions
prepare to do your bidding; but you fear to
emit a sound, lestthe cold, desolate thought!O, it
is
bitter!lest there may be no answering cadence in
the air. Their unison is done withtheir echo and
sympathy are over! Such is the influence of separation
from women.
How many a lover; how many a friend, hath been
lost, by the ungentle ministering of a froward hand;
yet, it were kinder to uproot the plant at once; to snap
off every bough, though it bled perfume to reproach you;
to scatter all its blossoms, and trample them in the dirt;
than to let it perish of neglect. Give me the spoiler!
I can abide and resist her; but spare me, O heaven,
that wintry consumption;
that!
where we droop away
in our desolation, alone, for ever and everand perish,
without a tear, or a thought! No, nothe furnace
rather
!
Y 2
No, it is not the rough wind, nor the rough hand, that
desolates the beautiful landscape of the heartthe
aromatick
herbage, and blossoming of the affection; no!
but it is the unheeding, unrelenting negligence of them
that we love.
Would you preserve the friendship of another?your
intimacy with him?keep him acquainted with every
alteration of your thought;every pulsation of your
heart;and keep yourself acquainted with his, in the
same manner. Your friendship, then, will be, if
judiciously
formed at first, in age, pursuit, and character,
perpetual. If otherwiseno matter how well you may
be fitted, for that high and noble intercourse, the
communion
of brave and great naturesyou will be
strangers
,
at last, happen what will. You cannot meet,
cordially
,
after a long separation; it is impossible; for you
are not sure, that what
was
acceptable in your manner,
when you parted, may not be offensive; or, at least,
unacceptable
,
now that you have met again. You are
afraid to forget the years that are passed, entirely,
when you meet; though there is a natural propensity
in all our hearts, to retake and re-occupy their places,
wherever they meet them again, and in the same
humour
,
too; so that an old man, who goes among them,
who knew him when he was a young man, will be pretty
sure to forget that he is old; or to make them forget it;
and your manner will be cold and unnatural. This,
though he may no longer know what is
natural
to you,
he can detect at once. The veriest child can point out
what is
unnatural
, even in a stranger. And nature is
so captivating, that, when ungraceful, and repulsive
it will do, what the most gracious and winning address,
which is unnatural, will fail to do. Your friend, of course
thinks you
vulgar
, or
affected;
and you think the same
of him. For we have but one standard. He who acts
differently from that. be it in word, manner, or dress,
is always, in our estimation,
vulgar
or
affected
vulgar
,
if he resemble the many;
affected
, if he resemble
the few. Neither of these things can we tolerate.
Reader, you must pardon me. I have suffered cruelly,
frequently, by this neglect of others. It is a crime; for
it is unkindness of the most unamiable nature; it is
bruising,
negligently
, the heart that feels only, because
it hath been torn away from another. I cannot accuse
myself of it. NoI never lost a friend, by negligence.
If I were weary of him, I told him so. If I had
wronged
him, I atoned for it; if he had wronged me, I forgave
him. No!whatever I have lost, has been by a stern,
unbending honesty; by doing, rashly, as I would be
done by; by reasoning after this fashionIf he cease
to be my friend, because of
thisthis
, which I do, or
say, because I love himhis friendship was never worth
having; he was never the man that I took him for.
I have never yet lost one by negligence; and, if I keep
my senses, I never will. Yet, had I not been willing
to forgive almost anything, in them that I love, I had
been friendless, at this hour
this
, of my loneliness
and widowhood. Thus much as an offering to the torn
and lacerated heart of oneone that knows meit
were better than a benumbed one. It was a duty, and
I have done it; harshly, it may be, but
honestly
. And
now I have donesaying only this; that, when your
conscience reproaches you, for having delayed too long,
a visit, or a letter, to a friend, call to mind the difficulty,
that you have found, in renewing a correspondence,
after
a long interruption, by letter; or, in answering one,
that had lain by you, till all the spirit had evaporated;
the colour faded; and the beauty was an old story; or,
in renewing a cordial, frank interchange of thought,
after
a long interval, with one, whom you once knew so
well, that you popped in upon her, at all hours,
without
ringing; without knocking; and without ceremony.
Your first letter is cold, laboured, artificial, and
dissatisfactory
,
to yourself, and to your friend; your
answer
affectedly cordial, impertinent, or stupid; and your
visit, one of parade and ceremony. Bless me! where
have I wandered? Let me return. I look back for
several pages, and I find, that I was telling you of
Caroline
;
and that I was happy, and prodigal of my
happiness
,
at this time; and that it was dashed only by the
negligence of my sister, in not keeping me informed of
her health and happinessfor both were precarious, as
I shall hereafter relate to you.
At last, I discovered a strange malady of spirit upon
me; I could not sleep; my appetite failed; and I had fits
of melancholy, silent abstraction, that were new to me.
Was it love? It could not be. It was utterly unlike
aught that I had ever experienced. There were but
five or six girls, in all the world too, whom it was
possible
to attribute my disorder to; namely: Olivia, Susan,
Anne, Rachel, and two or three Elizas. Thinking
in this way, of my maladyI began a review of all that
I could possibly be in love with. The first, we called
the Little Belt. She was a little, active, tight built
creature
;
with a warm heart; a voluble tongue, and a
pleasant
voice. I had met her once, under circumstances,
sufficiently romantick, it was true. I was visiting a
pretty little country village, with a friend of mine, in
the depth of winter. His object was, to see an old
flame of his;and mineto get my ears frozen first,
and my shins roasted, afterward, under pretence of a
sleigh ridefree of expense. I saw his flame; and
my cold fingers were all the better for it. In her, I
recognised
an old acquaintance of mine, whom I had
thought of, many and many a time, for a year or two,
before, without any hope or expectation of meeting her
on earth. I was delightedand so was he; we sat and
talked the most delicious sentiment; he, about old times,
and his school-boy tenderness; and I, of our singular
acquaintance, until it was time to separate. In the
mean while, however, Oliviaa neighbour, who saw
that her companion had company, popped in,
accidentally
upon us; though it snowed and blew, like vengeance;
and the houses were half a mile apartwithout her
bonnet. This, of course, excited some consideration;
and in me, for such is my nature, when I see women
behave like foolssome reproof. She liked me the
better for it; and, while George (my friend,) a very
sensible
man,
then;
but married nowpacked off, through
the snow drift, one way, with his Eliza; I waded off,
in a contrary direction, my teeth chattering in the wind,
which would have sharpened a razorwith Olivia.
We came to the door. It was near midnight. Wo'nt
you walk in? said she, laughingly. Hang my picture!
not
me
I do not say, hang
me
I have left off
that
practiceit is very ungenteelif I had'nt half a mind to
walk in, and stay all nightbut, I hadn't brought my
knitting work, and spend a week with her; and I knew
well what a woman meant, in that county, when she
saidpray sir, if you should ever come within a dozen
miles of our house, I shall depend on your staying
there
,
all night. So, I did'nt go inthough there was
something
in her manner, to speak seriously, that went to
my heart. I paused. My lips trembled; (not with
the cold) and I bid her farewell, as I shook her hand,
with a melancholy feeling, as if I were about to part
with her, for ever. It
is
sadis'nt it? to part, for ever,
as your heart tells you, with lips and eyes, that you
have just learnt how to quicken?that you have just
met, and been happy with. It
is
a dreary and
uncomfortable
feeling to one, with a long walk before him, at
midnightin a snow storm. When I travel, therefore,
with a probability of never travelling the same road
again, I never permit myself to make any acquaintance.
It is too like death, to part
for ever
, and
ever
, it may
be with aught that you have talked pleasantly with, even
in a strange land. Well!Well!. I parted from
Oliviaand thought of her many a time, that night;
even when I was holding one of the only two hands that
the woman hadfactwhile my friend held the other.
I had not been acquainted with
her
two hours;but
she was an old maidan amiable one, though; and
when
they
begin to melt, like snow in the summer
solstice
,
there is no stopping them--the flow of their hearts,
I mean;andbless me!lost againand, in short, I
thought of Olivia, even while the hand of another
woman
was heating in mine, over a slow firewhen I was
dying to go to bed(
alone
I mean) or yawn in her
face. And yet, she
was
amiable, and I
do
respect her.
Just one year after this,it was very extraordinary--I
was in a part of this world, where Captain Cook,
himself
,
would not have gone, in the winter, for his nose
I'll engage. I was desolate and alonewhen heaven
had compassion on me, all at once, and brought me
along side of the Little Belt, again. I was agitated and
delighted; my thrills returned; and all the sweet
disorder
of love, sentimentality and romance; until, at last,
I am half ashamed to own itI set to work upon
poetry
,
again; and happening, by a well managed intrigue,
to occupy the very bed room; nay, why should I not
tell the whole truth? the very
bed
where Olivia
had
slept;
what a different matter a little difference in the
tense
will make in these verbs! time is important, alike, in
grammar and love; verbs and womenis it not? --I
scribbled the walls all over, with the vilest stuff, in
favour
of Olivia. But, it was too late; she had already
slipped through my fingers; and, whatever your
downright
spiritualities may say, such as Sir Charles
Grandison
;
and Thaddeus of Warsaw; and such cattle, I
found it but cold comfort, to press even the pillow of
Olivia
alone
. YesI hate affectation, and I may as
well own it. I tried hard to be sentimental; hard
enoughheaven knows! I hugged and squeezed the
pillowkicked and sprawled about, in my sleepand
made verses, all the day longbut, it would'nt come
the fountain had run dryand there was really so
little
consolation, in freezing, of a long night, under the
same bed clothes; and
in
the same, that she had frozen
in; that, reallyheretick that I was! apostate to love and
romance! I had a prodigious inclination to migrate into
a warmer climatefor, there was one nearer to mein
the very next room--but, hang it,
that
was kept by the
dragon of prudery too.
Well, thenit was not Olivia, with whom I was in
love; beside,
she
was already married; and I was
really
a fellow of too much
principle
to be in love with, or
catch a fever ofa married woman. No---no---it was
not
Olivia
.
Was it
Susan
then? Possibly!Her round black
eyes, her neatly turned waist, and fine manner; together
with her untrained cordiality---the manner in which
she danced---the occasional emotion which she
betrayed
,
when I came near her.---Ah no---it was
not
Susan.
There was no delicious bobbing of my poor heart, in
my blood, like a newly caught fish, in cold water; none
of that inward titillation and trickling, as if,---I hardly
know what---it is difficult to tell, to another, who has
not felt it; and he that
has
, will understand me, without
my telling it. It is a sensation, as if your blood were
filtering away, drop by drop, through the little end of
your heart. And, therefore, it was not Susan!
Was it
Anne
?---I was puzzled, for a moment; I
remembered
how I used to lie upon the sofa with her;
with my arms round her waist, for whole hours, of a
warm twilight summer evening, without uttering a
word, drawing a breath, or even daring, fool that I
was! and barbarian too---to torture any creature so---
and a woman, of all creatures---to press my lips to her
face. O, I knew little of women, then---but, I have
grown wiser of late; tenderer of disposition. I could
not be so cruel, now---I
could
not, to any thing, in the
shape of a woman---living or dead---sick or well. Was
it Anne? No; for, though I had felt one pang, one,
that shot through me, like a poisoned arrow, when I
had seen another, no more like me, than like
him
(that's better than Shakspeare's Hercules, I think, or
Hamlet)---dwelt upon, with eyes full of tenderness; yet,
there was no sweltering of the heart in it---that
infallible
indication of love, with me, where I have once
been goaded and scorched by jealousy.
Was it
Harriot
?noshe had never cared a fig
for me; and all my love for her had only gone to the
extent
of touching her hand, now and then, at
back-gammon--articulating
my dear girl!
as if by accident; and
once, poor creature, how her eyes glittered! putting my
arm, by the merest casualty in all the world, round her
beautiful waist, in a room full of people, who were
crowding about the fire place, where we stoodso as
to justifying her, in not appearing to feel it; but I saw
the colour flash through her transparent forehead--and
her sweet eyes twinkle, as if my naked arm had
embraced
her. Yetalas, alas, it was
not
Harriot!
She had become a little too much of a woman, or rather,
for I think I can amend that sentence, too much of a
little
woman.
Was it
Rachel
?I pause at that name. My heart
stops. I cannot treat
her
irreverently. If ever woman
loved man truly, that woman loved me so. Yetfool
that I wasidiot, madman that I wasI trifled with
her affectionwrung it from her, by the most
dastardly
,
shameful and unmanly trial; and then, reader, I do
blush, and burn; and my eyes throb unpleasantly, now.
I left her
. Yes!no woman, I am sure, ever loved man,
more devotedlymore silently; or with a truer and
holier regardlessness of self, than she loved me. I can
see her, nowher deep, dear, passionate eyes, and
unsteady
complexion, (she was a brunette)her hushed
breathing; and mournful, yet tender voice, while she sat
by me,supported by my arm, of a long evening; in
my own chamber too, drawing her problems in
geometry
,
as I dictated them to her. I was her tutor; and, so
sacred was the confidence that she placed in methat,
with every opportunity to destroy her,I shuddered
and quaked, even at the thought of embracing her.
She was in danger, but she knew it notin mortal
peril, often, when our cheeks touched and thrilled; and
I felt her smooth hair, blowing over my hot temples
yet, as I hope to see heaven; and you have no idea what
a consolation there is in the thoughtit is one bright
spotalmost the only one of my whole life---I never
profaned her, in thought, or word, or deed. Poor
innocent
;
she knew not enough of my nature, or her own,
to be thankful for it; but, day after day; night after
night; went, in the holy purity of her heart; and
sat and slept near a furnace, that might have
consumed
hernay, that would have consumed her, as it hath
many a wiser and more subtle one, but for that
wonderful
artlessness and purity, in her own heart, which
kept her from even the thought of evil. Gracious
heaen
!
Could I have put my hand profanely upon that
girl! I know notI cannot imagine it possible; and, to
this hour, it would seem as natural for me to spoil an
infant, with violence, as to put my lips,
passionately
,
to that creature's mouth, or eye lids. YetI
might;
and, even then, in the delirium that would have
followed, she would have felt nothing but the delicious
certainty of being beloved. This was all that she sought
for; and, when her soft cheek lay upon my bosom, and
her beautiful eyes were upturned to mine, like molten
jewelry, just so that I could see the light issuing from
them, through the transparent lashes and lids; it was
only that she was
very
happy in the belief ofshe
hardly knew whatbut I know that it was pleasant to
her, to be near one that she loved.
YetI trifled with that girl. I sought to make her
love me. I succeeded; and, though I neither sent her,
bruised in spirit, broken in heart, nor dishonoured, to
an untimely grave, yet do I fear mightily,O, may it
not be cast up to me, at the great day of account, for
the sake of my forbearanceI do fear that her heart was
widowed by me, for ever and ever, in mere wantonness?
that I robbed her, of her peace, her power of loving, any
other man: and left her incapable of blessing; another or,
being beloved, for all the remainder of her weary and
uncomfortable
life. Bitterly do I repent of itvery
bitterly
:
and wonder, now, that the witchery and delight of
being loved, should so have made me, what no language
can palliatea villain; an unprincipled villain. Many
years have passed away, since I left her. It may be,
that she is not of this earthit may be! If I were
sure
of it, I would drop upon my knees this moment, and
pray to
her
to pardon me; and to intercede for me;
wherever she is. Poor, dear Rachel!
I had no justificationno excuse; yet I was never
weary of humbling her. The manifestations of love,
deep and delicate as they werewere never
sufficiently
convincing; and I would deliberately wring her
with doubt; palsy her whole frame, with terrour (as I
did once, under pretence of going out to fight a duel,
when she fainted, and was very sick, sick unto death,
till I returned)and, in short, do every thing that an
abandoned murderer of innocence, and love, could have
done, except that of damning her, and trampling her
under my feet.
Noit was not Rachel. Too many years had gone
by, for that. Nor
Charlotte
?no, for though I felt
prodigiously uneasy for awhile, to see
her
coquetting
with all the world but me;yet I had been too amply
revenged at last by hearing from her own lips, that
she would marry anybody
anybody
looking at my
Z
ugly face, and speaking in a voice that thrilled through
and through meat the time, that a certain man (the
warmest friend that I had on earth, and she knew it!)
would recommend to herto think of dying for
her
in this wayno, no; I could'nt think of it.
Well then, it must be
Eliza
: but which Eliza?----
there were at least
three
or
four
, who had, at some time or
other, tugged at my wretched heart strings. First, there
was Eliza H a noble, elegant creature----(hair a
little
too
auburn, though)--with a cultivated mind---but,
unluckily, she had never cared a fig for me, till, in the
course of much vicissitude, I had nearly lost all the
natural
sensibility that I first had;---beside, she had too
pretty a sister, for a fellow to be downright in love with
any of the family. By the way, it is, depend upon it,
a confoundedly preplexing question sometimes, to carve
for yourself, in a family of loveliness and grace. While
you live, therefore, if there be more than one decent
daughter in the family, where you are in love, take care
to leave the door open, to back out at----till the last
moment. There is no knowing what may happen.---
And there is no such misfortune for a family of girls,
as to be all beautiful, and
unmarried
, about the same
time. They are sure to wane, perish, die, of
loneliness
,
and ill humour. If half of them were ugly as the
devil; another quarter just passable; and the remainder
unlike each other;---with only
one
beauty, the whole
might get married at last. So, depend upon it, ladies,
if there are many of you----marriageable----or, if you
are
not
, and you all know when you
are
, better than I
can tell you,----my advice to you is plainly this----to
draw lots, fairly and honourably, and blow up all your
faces with gunpowder----except one. But if that be too
terrible---take the small pox. It is your only chance,
believe me; and, a moment's reflection, will convince
you, that there would be great policy in it. A little
temporary neglect, it is true, would follow; but, you
would be pretty sure to learn to read and spell--though
you did'nt turn out your toes, as if you had the cramp,
nor talk as if----Lord help me now, for a comparison!
I am at a dead, pullno matter. The contrast
would be sure to set off your sister to greater advantage;
the publick (especially the women) would soon see more
beauty in the
family
, than ever; your unblemished one;
and here, by the way, you will remember, if you are wise,
to let
her
be the biggest natural fool among you, if there
be any way of determining which that is----it will save
her the trouble of lisping and laughing like an
artificial
simpleton; and nothing, I assure you, is half
so
captivating
to the creatures that are called men, as this
helplessness
,
when there is nothing but the difference in height---
none in the countenance at all ---to distinguish the
woman
from the babe, muling and puling in a ball room
----your unblemished one, particularly with these
accomplishments
,
would be sure to get married off hand;
because, her lovers would not be distracted in their
devotion
to
her
, by
your
faces; and then,
you
, if she have
any family pride at all, will be got rid of, one after the
other, among her husband's relations. In a few years,
tooto comfort you for this temporary self denial, you
will be, assuredly, the more agreeable of the two:--you
will have
mind
, in that wintry season, when the
personal
beauty of all women is like the shadow that hath gone
something, that nobody will take the trouble to run
after, even in thought.
Butis this too severe? Then hide and disfigure
yourselves, to the best of your power, if you are wise;
and leave, as you hope to be married; nay, as you hope
to be widowsonly one of your number, at a time, out
for baitat your doors and windows. If you
prefer
the gunpowder, there is this advantage in it, that
you can take what quantity you please, so as to
prevent
the catastrophe of being, any two of you, of the
same ugliness:---but then, the small pox will do the
same thing, in its own wayno two of you will come
out, alike, from the seaming and scarring----and now,
one word in good faithas you are living women, if
there are more than two pretty ones in the same
family
,
I do assure you, that you will all die old maids, if
you do not follow my plan; and that a sensible, high
minded man, will be the first to choose the gunpowder
face,---when the heyday of his blood is over; and he
wants a companion; a friend; a wife, for the fireside;
and a mother for his children. But why do I mention
this? Who of you would not rather be beautiful, than
wise?----beloved by many fools, than by one great
heart;--the mistress;
[10]
[10]
Just now, I am thinking of one of our most celebrated women,
who, it is said, once declared, that she would prefer being the
mistress
of a prince, than the
wife
of an honest man. She probably spoke
the truth; and deserves to beI will not say what.
Ed.
the companion for dalliance--the
no matter what--anything that is base and sensual
the mere plaything of men, when they are upon a level
with the brute beast. Pretty well!
No, it was not
that
Eliza
. Could it be
Eliza
S
a tall, romantick girl, so touched with theatrical
romance
,
that, to carry her heart and soul by storm, it
was only necessary to make love, like a man on
horse-back
;
in armour and blank verse; to the sound of a
trumpet
:
she
whom, though I declare that she was a high
minded
and intelligent woman; of a warm and generous,
temperant
;
anybody, with the name of Tekeli, or Octavian,
could have run away with, off hand;---she who, the
second time that she ever saw me, leaped, upon my
honour
,
it is a fact,--from the top of the stairs, down to the
bottomsprang into my arms, and gave me
such
a kiss!
by Jupiter! my lips are tingling yet,noit was not
sheshe ispoor girl, poor girl!she was really an
excellent creaturebut, alas, she is
married
.
I should like to see that woman again! upon my word,
I shouldin the presence of her husband and babes---
anywhere indeed, except at the foot of a long
staircase----in
a dark entry
with the street door open
. No,
it was not
that
Eliza. It would be impious, to imagine
that all this fever and fuss, in my arteries, were owing to
a married woman. Nor could it have been Eliza
P, that most affectionate of human hearts (for, at
that
time, I had not learned to love) and did not know
hershe, whose raven tresses; and black glossy
smiling
eyes, for ever letting out the delicious secret of
her passion. No, it was not she. But let me
describe
her. She was one of the only three really
modest
females, that I ever knew: and yet, were the women of
the world, whom Byron distinguishes from the women
of the town, by calling them, ladies of
un-easy virtue
,
acquainted with all our dealing with each other, they
would turn up their eyes at her modesty. Ahhow
little they know of themselves! She, too, was virtuous;
nay, she might have fallen, and been more virtuous,
nevertheless, than many a woman, whose reputation is
unimpeachable. Some preacher, I remember, once
said that the difference between a virtuous and a fallen
woman was, that the one
had
struggled, and the other had
not
.
[11]
[11]
From Sterne.
Ed.
It was a beautiful thought; and never was a
thought more applicable to anybodythan this, to
Eliza. Never was woman so tempted and triedso
secretly, incessantly, and so unwittingly. I
deliberately
practised upon her; inflamed her imagination;
corrupted
,
or rather sought to corrupt her senses
memory
and delicacy, by continual encroachment; and yet,
I could not prevail. I do not say that I would have
profited of her self abandonment, if she had yielded
for, I believe that I should not; but she did not know
that, and she resisted me. Therefore, do I say, that she
was,
emphatically
, a modest and virtuous woman--tried
and weighed. Yet she was one of them that are full
of contradictionall that was noble and heroick, she
could have enduredbut nothing that was
not
so, for
her love of me. But why should I complain? It is easier
for any woman to lay down her life for her husband, than
to drink brown sugar in her tea; or broil her own
steaks. Still, there was one other; a little, round faced,
cheerful-eyed girl, with a dash of smartness and
piquancy
that gave uncommon zest to her manner. Could
it be she? All that I remembered, to justify me in
thinking
of her, at this time, was a little twisting and broiling
of my inwards.
Shameful literary poachingborrowed, evidently, from Byron's,
They wrung her vitals with their fiery hands.
Ed.
It happened once, on seeing her
somewhat
kind to a young dog, that came out from London
with an apology in his mouth, for not bringing me a
superb black dress, that I had ordered; and with the
very same dress upon his own back, at the timein
which, like all your true blooded Englishmen, who are
Z 2
disqualified at home, to shoot any thing but their friends
and dunghill fowlsand, when they get to America,
are as mad and foolish, as if they were made altogether
squires and noblemen, under the qualification of
our
game laws; he was out, scouring all the swamps, and
hedges, and ditches of the country, at the same time that
I was coaxing off and on, the only suit of clothes that I
had in the world, twice a day: and they were so thin that
I dared not cough or sneeze, or make much of any kind
of a noise in them; or go out in a high windlest I
might have to run into some house on the road, and
borrow something to come home in. Wellto return
it happened on one bloody cold night, when I was
coming through a long street with her; at one end of
which, lived a gentleman, with whom we had been
starving and freezing for several hoursat the other
the North Pole, Iceland, Greenland, Lapland, Siberia
and Spitzbergen; and just in the centre, a mischievous
girl, who, when it was too cold to hang her own
stockings
out of the window for a signal, would put a black
girl up to it; and be serenaded, by proxywith the
sweetest guitar in the world, and the tenderest, and
truest of heartsbut thereby hangs a taleI only
know that she made a fellow serenade her window one
night, till all his fingers, and toes were numbwith a
guitarand that I found out afterward; for I had a
sneaking kindness just then, for the same creature, that
she, who had appeared at the window, listening to his
plaintive, sweet roundelay-ditty-izing, heedless of wind
or weather, was a great greasy she-negro, blacker than
ten thousand devils. Well, as I was coming through
that streetwith the aforesaid, (the last, aforesaidI
should say)ElizaI attempted to wrap her up in my
cloakthe most comfortable thing in the worldfor
mebut, somehow or other, she was'nt agreeable;
and, ever after that, we were on the most perfectly
polite, gentlemanly, cold blooded footing, in the whole
world. Are you tired, reader?Can anything be more
natural? Does'nt it remind youfor you know my
aim----it is to write easily---(I wish that you could see
my
manuscript!
) does'nt it remind you of
You write with ease, to show your breeding
But easy writing's damned hard reading.
No; it was neither of these Eliza's. There was but
one morea nameless girl; or, at least, one that was
very near losing her name, one night. There was a
camp meeting. I had heard a great deal of such things;
and was all a tilt to get into one. I love religious
people
;
particularly them that wear petticoats, and tumble,
and roll about, in their extacies; and them, tooif they
have sweet voicesthat whoop, and halloo, and bawl,
in their devotions; there is somewhat so reverential and
composingso august and dignified in it. So, attended
by a friend, the guitar man, (since marriedso no
more of himI never speak ill of themarried)Irode
to the place; hitched my poor mare (m-a-r-e, reader,
or you may fancy, that I tied my own mother to a tree;
for, in the fashionable world,
mre
, mayor, and mare,
are all the same thingin pronunciation, I mean;) to
a tree; and left her to the mercy of the gad-flies, that
had come to the same meeting; and, faith,
they
must
have been troubled with extacies, toofor the poor
creature was stung into a hard lump, when I found her
in the morningharness and all. We could hardly
squeeze her into the shafts. This done, I went among
the evangelical. By heavenwith all my levityall
my quick sense of the ridiculousI found something
too frightful, in these things, for my laughter. In one
large booth, were a matter of forty or fifty people, if
legs and arms were any
indicia;
men and women;
sweltering
and sprawling about, of a hot night; a fat man
in the middlea justice of the peace, whom I knew
jumping, and bawling, and shouting, until he had
worked his shirt half out, over the waistband of his
breeches; and two of his own daughters, amiable and
modest women, whoit was a mercy that they were
not, what they pretended to beutterly transported out
of their sensesa mercy, indeed, that the delicate
instinct
of modesty was not quite put outwho,
whenever
they had become, to a certain degree, exposed, by
the flourishing and agitation of their own, or their
neighbours limbs, fell to drawing up their feet
drawing in their hornsand adjusting their dresses;
but without opening their eyes; losing their place; or
stopping in their trance. In another, I found three
or four stout, vulgar looking blackguards, playing with
one of the most truly innocent and beautiful children,
that I ever saw; shouting in her ear, all at the same
time, till, in her terrour and agitation, her eyes waned,
in their faint, spiritual blue, like the hushed azure of
heaven, in dew and shadowthe colour fledand the
sweat stood, like rose-dew, upon her mild, sweet
forehead
;
and this
this!
when they had plucked that child
down to the earth!
this
was proclaimed, to the four winds
of heaven, as another special manifestation of divine
grace! O, my blood boiled in my veins. I thought of
Susannah and the elders; and I was on the point of
crying
out, avaunt, ye accursed! But, just thenfaith,
it was musick to mea pretty, little, rosy, dimpled
country girl, passed mewith two or three companions.
I followed herand she nodded her pretty head at me,
in scorn; but, after awhile, I persuaded her to separate
from them, and walk with me. The enclosure was large;
and, in the centre, was a circular place, boarded in
with rough boards; benched with the same; and arched
with the magnificent ceiling of Godthe blue
midnight
.
Who could spoil the innocent, in such a season,
with such a witness? Not I. The poor girl was
imprudent
;
but she was in the keeping of one, that never
did
, and never will, harm a woman, putting her trust
in him. I led her to the centre of this boarded solitude.
It was soon to become populous. It was the place of
prayer; and the hour was close at hand. I avoided the
darkness, though I sought the solitude; and we sat
there, under the candle and starlight; and talked,
lovingly
,
I own, but not wickedly, or licentiously, till
the night dew had drenched her black hair. I observed
it, and gave her my pocket handkerchief; but, hardly
had she covered her head with it, than she started up,
as if a serpent had been before her, and fled. At the
same moment, two tall, stern looking men,
Elders
,
stood before me. They began to rebuke me, as they
would a school boy. I let them go on, patiently
very
patientlytill I found that they were overheard; and
thenO, may I never seeheaven, I was going to say
but that were impious, just nowso, I will even say,
may I never seethe antipodes of heavenif these men
did not shake in their shoes, before I had done! Did'nt
I give it to them? Did'nt I? What had they seen?
What heard? How knew theyuncharitable that they
werethat I was not converting a
sister
, in my own
way? I
was
. I would defy the whole of them, to
bring tears into the eyes of a woman; or to make her
humbler; sicker at the heart; more bruised and broken;
or more sincerely penitent and ashamedthough I
knew
their
power, wellwith the same opportunity
and time, than I, myself could. Nay, I would give them
twenty-five, at
that
game. How dared they judge me?
Who gave them authority? What had they seen, wrong?
Where was the woman? Confront me with her. I
was disturbing their solemnities, they said. Their
solemnities!
tents full of legs and armsfor
nothing
else was to be seen; their hysterical sobbing and
blasphemyfor nothing else was to be heard. And
this was their
religion!
Why, the wild beasts have the
same. They herd and howl together; the wolves
troop; and carrion is hunted, with similar sounds; and,
in much the same manner, that these creatures
stoop
at
heavenor upon their prey. It is only a natural
sympathy
.
Armies are panick-struck, in the same way:
one cries quarter; and all are cowards; another rushes
to the breach; and the whole follow him. A man yawns;
and all that are about him, follow the example; a
woman
weeps, or laughs; and a multitude, as at the
theatre
,
do the same. Why? No living creature can tell.
It is sympathy; that nervous, constitutional sympathy,
which distorts your countenance, and sets you a
stuttering
,
when you see another convulsed; or hear him
stutter. And this
this
, which the very animals hold
in common with you
this
,which the weak and foolish
are most conspicuous for, is the divinity stirring
within
you! Impious, indeed! The good that you have
doneye followers of Wesley and Whitfieldis
incalculable
;
and it ought to be incalculable, to
counterbalance
the atrocious profanationthe unutterable
intemperance
and dishonourof your worship, at camp
meetings. Have done with itunless you would have
your daughters annually
regenerated;
your sons
hypocrites
and religious scoundrelsthe most damnable of
all scoundrels, by the way. The good that are among
you, and the wise, may be good and wise,
any where;
but the licentious and wicked, can only he so, in a camp
meeting;
there
, lasciviousness is sanctified
indecency
consecratedand prodigal exposure becomes a
commendable
indifference to the world, the flesh, and the
devilvitally evangelical.
Thus did I stand before these menand, thus, did I
question, and amaze them, until they were fain to let
me depart in peace. But, what was I to do, for my
pocket handkerchief? It was hard enough to part with
that sweet girl; but it was the devil to lose the
handkerchief
.
I put myself in Othello's place; and, had half
a mind to stand up, and imprecate aloud, as I have
seen an actor sincejust as if I were choking at the
waistbandsThe
handkerchief!
the
handkerchief!
My acquaintance had been short with that girl; but,
I judged of her, by other women that I had known;
and I felt
sure
, that she would be, to the full, as willing
to see me, ugly as I was, as I should be, to see her.
So, I walked leisurely out,
before
my escortwhipped
my hat roundelevated my shoulderswalked a little
lame; and re-entered
with
them! After prowling awhile,
I saw the flutter of a handkerchief. It was
she!
it
was
she!
it was
it!
it was
it!
I leaped toward it, as
Sancho toward his ass(mind your pronunciation.)
I had just time to squeeze her handlook once,
lovingly
enough too, I confess, into her large eyesand part
for ever.
Noit was not she. I turned over, in my bed. It
would not do. Was there anybody else? No. I went
over the whole list again. I had omitted somesome
dear, sweet creaturefools; but, this whirling
here
this uneasy, keen, yearning thirst, and cankering, as
if I had been bled unsparingly, while I was asleep; this
dark, dreary vacancy, and dissatisfaction. What was
it? I could not answer; at least, when I slept, I could
not. But when I awokewomen of heaven!I was
amazed and confounded, at my own blindness. In the
night time, I had dreamt of Carolinethe child,
Caroline
;
and of a young mana very handsome young
man, toothat I had seen with her, frequently, of late.
I awoke!---all at once, I awoke, like one smitten to the
heart, with a sharp knife. The secret was revealed.
I was
jealous;
---sore---shivering with alternate cold
and heat; and scorched, with the very air that I
inhaled
.
Yes, yes!
I loved again!
That dream! By
heaven
,
it were death to suffer it!
CHAPTER XVIII.
Consequences...Cheating...Blankets....Shopkeepers...Hints to
the LaityDistrust...Dismay..Caroline...Passion...Revenge
...Ingenuity of Love...Hope...Superfine reflections.
All
the next day, I was strangely serious;
melancholy
,
at times, and rather petulent. Every thing
went wrong---I felt malicious---spiteful---struck one of
the clerks---went into the retail store, and deliberately
cheated a rascal, in the width of a cloth---and---stay, I
must
tell that. It was a neat thing, for a fellow in love
to do; and may be a good lesson to the retail gentry,
who darken their windows and doors, under pretence
of showing their goods; dampen their cloths, that they
may feel softer to the touch; show one end of a piece of
goods, and sell the other; exhibit the coarsest stuff in
the whole warehouse,
first
; though one should ask for
mulled muslin, or Indian cambrick: dazzle your eyes
with garish colours; and overwhelm your ears with
counter gibberishhurrying and confounding,
teasing
and talking you into purchases, that you never
thought of making, and did know that you had made,
till you found yourself at home, angry and ashamed of
your own good nature, and of the rascal that made
such a fool of you---your purse exhausted, yourself,
or your husband in debt,---and your bundle made
up of trash, that you have not the slightest
recollection
of having ever seen before!so different do
the qualities, and colours, and materials appear at
homewhen your mind is tranquil; the light, pure and
strong; from what they did in a shop like a prison, and
a noise that maddened you; to such men, this may
be an additional lesson:and to them that sell
damaged
goods, cheap goods, and auction goods;---or,
are all the time selling off, their stock, at reduced
pricesfor, if you will believe them, altogether less
than nothing; less than it cost to black the shoes of the
importer; or grease the wheels of the manufactory;
infinitely
less, than the raw material cost in th eseed---
twenty generations back; to them too, that are wise
enough, never to open a piece of linen---or, if they do,
never to show any but the outside fold; who, when
their white goods are smoked and yellow, always
exhibit
them, alongside of brilliant silks; and, when they
show a piece of cambrick muslin, wet it, the
agreeable
creatures! with their own spittle, and draw it
tightly over the tip end of the fore finger of the left hand;
thereby making it appear at least one hundred per cent.
better, than it really is;---or live by damaging goods,
when the demand for
damaged goods
---and goods that
have been shipwrecked---is at the highest; (for, such
economy
will rage, like madness, at times, among the
women
;
whose maxim is, always to buy what is cheap,
whether
they want it or not; forgetful of the truth, that
nothing
is
cheap
which is not
wanted;
and who, when they
have brought their husbands or fathers to the brink of
bankruptcy, by their folly and extravagance, think to
make it all up, and re-establish themselves for ever, as
frugal housewives, by wearing a ruff once, that cost
only a shilling---or, a calico frock, of a morning, that
cost only a dollar--as if
that
were economy;
that
, which
makes it necessary to renew the wardrobe of a woman,
every morning; or, at least, every washing day)---to
them, and all that profit by this folly, in the sweet
creatures
that rule over us---and take sound goods,
untumbled
,
unstained, and unwet, and convert them, by
a little simple legerdemain, into damaged and wet
goods!---and so,
vice versa
---this will be of advantage.
All these things are done. More than one fellow have
I seen employed, in converting a piece of British book
muslin, into an India
book
, by pulling and haling it
about, in the water, till the starch was discharged; and,
case after case of cambrick muslins, have I seen sold,
when wringing wet; and tumbled all up in a heap; and
trampled on; for higher prices, than they could have been
sold for, in a merchantable shape---while every woman
that bought of them, bought, as if she never expected to
see another piece of cambrick muslin, upon the earth.
And, after she was loaded with it, could be traced half
Aa
over town, by the trickling of bilge water, from it, on
her way to exhibit her prize. By heaven! I have known
women that have ruined their best friends, by the most
shameful and profligate expenditure, absolutely beside
themselves, at having bought a paper of pins, for half
price---from some chap, who knew enough, not to
give
them away; for, there is no pleasure in
bargaining
adroitly
there---women are not satisfied with that---they
do not feel as if they have outwitted a man
[12]
[12]
As if retail shopkeepers were men!creatures, that live by
trespassing
upon the natural business of women.No!no!the
retail
gentry of operas, are as much menwith less pretension.Ed.
then
while he cheated them in something, the price of which,
they did not know. I am leaving the story; but, never
mindthe rascals deserve it, and they shall have it---
now that I have left off trade! It is one of their
maxims
to sell to womenfor, that saves advertising
cotton balls, pins, needles and tape, and such things, as
all know the price of, at half price; but,
tuck it on
, say
they, upon the cloths, linens, and such matters, of
which they cannot so well judge. Women love to
reason
in a lump. If the needles are cheap, the cloths
and linens are cheap, of course. There are some
hundred
more, beautiful and gentlemanly tricks, of the
same kind; such as, always having a moveable price; and
never refusing the last offerselling by false invoices
giving old goods, new names&c. and always falling
in your prices, before you are askedor any
complaint
is made; having no change at hand, so as to oblige
your customers to take toysusing short yardsticks
(which is rather perilous) and slipping back your
thumb, while measuring;cutting a piece of bandanna
handkerchiefs, into eight, instead of seven;selling
India
goods, by what they
came for
, and not by what they
measure;
making an assortment, out of one and the same
piece, by cutting it up, and marking it at different
prices
marking up
your calicoes, pins, cloths, &c. and
selling that which comes for 4-4, 5-4, 6-4, &c. whether
cottons or blankets, for one or two quarters more
that is, what is invoiced 4-4, for 5-4; and a blanket,
that came for 12-4, for 14-4.But, enough; you that
do not know the things, do not understand the very
alphabet
of retailing; particularly in Cornhill, or
Broadway
,
or Market street. And now, for the trick. It
was rather a new one, as I take it. I found one of the
lads confoundedly bothered, with a male customer, who
kept running in and out, examining and re-examining;
measuring and taking
patterns
of a cloth. (By the way,
taking
patterns
, and
samples
, and shopping, is the
common
daily occupation, in decent weather, of nine
women
out of ten, in Boston and New York---who have
no money to spend, or no heart to spend it.)
I was fretted and indignant, at the puppyish
complaisancy
of the young men; and reproved them for it,
sharply. At last, while the customer was yet
balancing
in his mind, between the cloth in
our
store, and
that, which he had seen at the next door, I found that,
the only question was about the width of the two.
That
he thought, should decide it; whichever was the widest,
by a single thread, he determined to buy. I wanted
to punish him, for the trouble that he had given to the
boys; and knew no better, or safer way, than to do it,
by cheating himconscientiously, I mean. I gave him
the yardstick, therefore; and begged him to go in, and
satisfy himself. He soon returned; holding it so, that,
our neighbour's cloth, it appeared, was a quarter of a
yard wider than ours. It was, I found. 1 & 5-8 wide; his
thumb nail was upon the mark of the 3-8. A thought
struck me; a pleasant one, I assure you. It was only
taking the yardstick out of his hand, without
appearing
to turn it, and lo!the width was converted, from
1, & 5-8, to 1, & 3-8!It took---and he bought our
cloth.
I returned to the warehouse, in the same humour.
Nothing seemed to work rightly. Goods had been sold,
that were not packed; others were packed badly; and
no invoices made. In this disordered state of my mind,
and
temper
, (though I have the sweetest temper in the
world,) a thick headed gentleman, regularly educated
in an importing warehouse; one too, that was not to be
imposed upon, in the sterling cost of an article, by
any
body
, came to buy a bale of blankets. Our warehouse
was full; and bought, at an extravagant price, on
speculation
.
I showed them: but, the man was difficult to please
nothing would do, but the original cost---he must see
that. I must measure them too. In the course of the
conversation, I found that he had been looking at some
of the very same blankets, in the warehouse, from
which we had been supplied. I was vexed at his
stupidity
and affectation; and, merely to convince him that
he
could
be cheated, with his eyes open,
notwithstanding
all his precaution, and wisdom, and experience, I
cheated
him. In the first place, I marked up the
sterling
cost of the whole bale, about twenty five per cent.
I then advanced the blankets in the invoice 1-4, each
pair, by marking them 7-4, for instance, that came for
6-4. I then took the man, to a sort of invoice book; and
showed him the sterling cost---he was perfectly
satisfied
.
I then led him into the cellar, and insisted on his
measuring every blanket. He obeyed; and, as if there
could be but one way of estimating them, I took
their
length
alone; and thus demonstrated, that those
which were called 9-4, actually measured more than
two yards and a quarter,
in length!
Would it be
believed
,
that this man; a regular bred merchant too,
actually
went away, and measured some of the
same
blankets
;
and compared them, with pen and ink; and then,
came back, and bought
ours
---giving
me
nearly fifty
per cent. more for them. Yet, it is true.
This was all very well---very well indeed; but, I was
not satisfied with it, nevertheless. It was too like the
practice of advertising one hundred packages of goods,
when you have but forty or fifty. Yet, it was the way
of trade; and, people so well understand the trick; that,
if a man should be scrupulously honest, and say that
he had but forty or fifty packages to sell, they would
believe that he had only ten or a dozen; so, if he should
sell a piece of India goods, for just what it measured,
in length; or call a piece of British goods 5-4, when it
measured just
that
, it would be supposed, that the one
was twenty five per cent. less than it was, in reality;
and that the other was only 4-4, in truth. Thus, said
I, to myself, a shopkeeper is obliged lie, in his own
defence
.
Yet, this reasoning did not do, then. I had
cheated, in the sight of heaven; and my heart smote
me. I went home to my dinner, troubled. The
afternoon
passed away; and my seriousness was taken
notice
of; nay, something happened; I know not what, and
I spoke to Caroline, the dear suffering Caroline, in a tone
of bitter pleasantry; her eyes filled; and, had we been
alone, I could have gone down on my knees to her,
and kissed off the drops, if she would let me; but,
there were others near; and, to conceal my
perturbation
,
my tears even, for
I
wept a little; I was fain to
appear
very
cheerful. But the exertion was painful;
and, I was relapsing again, into thoughtfulness, and
sternness, I believe, when, on looking at Caroline, I
saw that she did not appear to observe it. I was about
rising to departangry, to the very soul, with myself;
and even having a slight, doubtful emotion of
resentment
,
toward
her
a wrathful swelling of the heart.
Could it be?was I really so indifferent to her, that
she knew not, and cared not, child that she was,
whether
I was in an evil or happy humour? I stood erect,
with my hand upon the mantle-piece; and, just on the
point of saying farewell, entirely, when
Eunice
, or
mother
,
as I always called her, when I was happy, and
at ease with myself, came near to me; and, laying her
hand upon my shoulder, said, kindly, William, what
ails thee?
What could I say? My heart was in my mouth.---
The accents of reproof I could bear, for ever and ever;
but not of kindness. No, no; I could not stand erect in
the tender rebuke of eyes that loved me, even in their
expostulation. I pressed her hand in silence. I
could'nt
speak. I was utterly unmanned. If I opened my mouth,
I knew that the tears would follow; and that I might
even sob aloud, before I knew it.
Hezekiah had been very grave, all the evening. I
saw it, and I knew the reason. He was displeased with
me. This troubled my heart---but it offended my pride,
also; and I scorned to be sensible of the change in his
manner; but, at the sound of his wife's voice---he
stopped---like
one listening. There was no answer---he
Aa 2
looked up in my face---and all his coldness gave way,
instantly.
William, said he, very kindly, I am afraid thee
is unwell. What has happened to thee?
He shook my hand as he spoke this, so cordially, that
---curse it---the tears did---
did
---not
fall
---nor filled my
lids, perhaps, for I have always been ashamed to cry---
but they oozed out. I felt as if my eye-balls were
bleeding, for a moment---and they smarted;---tears
would
have come; but---where was Caroline? I threw
aside my eyes. She had moved---a very little; and,
when I looked upon her, though
her
eyes were cast
down, she attempted, just as if she
felt
that I was
looking
upon her, to regain the very same position and
attitude
.
By heaven, it is wonderful, what little things
will make our blood thrill sometimes. This trifle now,
made mine leap, so that you could have seen it through
my temples. Yet, she did not look up; and I was
ashamed to be overcome, while she, so much younger
and gentler, sat unmoved. Yet, I could not be
gentle
and collected; my resource was more violent. It was
the repose of iron. I went to my room; but not to my
sleep.
Never
did I pass such a night. I took out my
own heart, and examined it; and, while I did, young
serpents lanced out of it, in every direction. Strange
thoughtswicked thoughtsawoke. There was the
pressure of revenge, like a strong hand, upon my
forehead
.
And the thought of dominion, beat through all
my arteries, like a broken current. I felt oddly about
the head, too; and went and stood before the glass. I
was appalled at the sight of my own visage. My flesh
was livid; my lips ghastly; my teeth naked; my looks,
those of one troubled in mind; and the clear blood, I
could see, rippling over my forehead, as plainly as if
the skin had been transparent. It looked dark, too
and melancholy; thick and turbid. I turned away,
immediately
.
I was afraid to look any longer.
I thought of that child, all night long. She had
humbled mecruelly,
cruelly;
and my thought was one
that I dare not avow, even at this hour.
Will she love me? said I, to myself. Can I not
make
her love me? Aye, ayeI
can
. But how?
There were many ways, I knew well; but there was
only one way, for
her
. It was to win her, by a lofty
and imperious carriage; with, here and there, a dash of
unpremeditated tenderness, that she might hope to be
nourished with, if she should ever give herself up to
me.
The next day passed overthe
next
a whole week;
and I was still in doubt. We were formal, and very
particular in our manner. And here, I ought to
mention
,
that Caroline had lately undergone a sort of
transfiguration. Within a yearone single yearshe
had become a woman. Her tread; her tone; her
manner
:they
were no longer those of a child. To what
should I attribute it? Her dress?her age? No.
What then? To
love?
It was, undeniably,
love
. But
for whom? I looked about me. I had never felt a
thought of uneasiness before; yet now, when I ran over
the young men that knew her; their beauty, and
quality
and
their exquisite humility, and good temper; and
remembered my own haughty, cold, arrogant manner;
how likely it was to intimidate such a girl; and how
naturally a woman clings to what is lovely, rather
than terrible, I confess, that I trembled. My heart
grew fainter, and fainterstopped; a sickening,
death-like
sensation followed. What was it? Mortified
vanity
?aye.
Jealousy?
yes; but jealousy in a new shape.
Still, there were some involuntary movements about
Caroline, that convinced me, at times, for a moment or
two, that I was dear to her; a strange infatuation
mournful, but pleasantfollowed. Why should I wound
her? Why jar the sweet instrument, till it was
tuneless
,
merely because it emitted no sound to my
breathing
?
Perhaps it might belike the harp of the air
only to be played upon by the sighing of heaven. A
tear fell upon my hand. My heart was better. Then
came a faint, delicate fluttering of hope. I
remembered
how, when we had set together, and our feet
touched
,
accidentally, she had not withdrawn hers; and when
my arm, as it lay upon her chair, had been,
accidentally
too, pressed upon her beautiful shoulder, as she leaned
back; but thenO, no; it were idle to dream of such
things. They
were
accidental. And then, too, when
we stood upon the bridge, of a sweet moonlight
evening
,
almost alone, with the blue water below it,
rippling
thinly over the round, innumerable, shining
pebbles
,
like a flood of shattered starlightand heaven,
with all its beauty, came down upon usthat, as her
arm lay upon mineher
hand
, too; I had pressed my
cheek to it, in leaning over the railyet, she had not
withdrawn it. Nay, had we not embracedall over,
onceand there, too, upon that very bridge.
Ah, Love! Love!verily thou art a deceitful little
devil. My whole life hath been a ramble, after thee.
And then I would lie, and set traps for her, in my
heart. I will go to such a place to-morrow evening,
said I; and she will be sure to go there. I know she
will; because she cannot be happy, but with me. I
would go; but Caroline would not be there! What
kept her away? I would ask myself. Her sense of
propriety?
Her love?
She could not be happy to meet
me, as she must, before strangers, formally. She could
not abide it. I must have a reconciliation. Well;
when shall it be? To-morrow; yes, to-morrow. She
feels very tenderly, I am sure; and is deeply solicitous
for an explanation. She will assuredly seek it.
To-morrow
,
therefore, we shall be happy; and to-morrow
nightO, heavenI shall sit by her again, in the dim
foliage over the water; and tell her all my meditation,
just as it has been, during this long season of doubt and
separation. She will smile thendear Carolinedear,
dear
Caroline!and we shall agree then, never to fall
out, while we have breath in us, without a full
understanding
upon the subject. And then, I would go to
sleepsleep quietlyand dream of Caroline.
The next day came; and, contrary to all my
expectations
,
instead of seeking an opportunity for an
explanation
,
I found her avoiding it, with a delicate, but
incessant
solitude. A new pang! It must be, that she did
not
love me; that I had been cheating myself, all the
while; that he foresaw my purpose, and would defeat
it; spare me the mortification ofofthe devil!
I am choking! What hath she done? What
said?
Nothing!---nothing! She does not love me. Nay, more;
suppose that she should tell me so? What could I say?
Can I complain? Shall I call her a coquette?---and for
what? Because she looked, and spoke to me, as to
other
men? A coquette?---thus it is. He, whose own
vanity hath led him to the precipice, is the first to
charge the woman with it; merely because she had the
humanity to treat him with a refuse smile, now and
then.
This was not to be born. But,
might
it not be? Was
it not
possible
to explain this conduct of hers by a more
soothing hypothesis? Suppose that she really loved me,
passionately, devoutly? What else could she have done
to me, than she had done, of late? Would she not avoid
me? She would. The conclusion was irresistible.
It was like musick to the deaf man, when his ears are
first unstopped; the touch of soft lips, to a bruised heart.
Thus are we the sport of our imagination. I
remember
once, when Caroline wore her hair in a particular
way, which I had praised a long time before, that I felt
flattered by it, and told her so. She did'nt appear to
understand me; and I had the mortification to find that
she had forgotten it entirely. Yet, hardly was I in my
own bed, and alone, (I always sleep alone, in my own
bed,
[13]
[13]
Wordsworth.
Ed.
) than I contrived to imagine a theory, infinitely
more delightful, out of this very reply. I persuaded
myself that, forgetful of the source, she had learnt to
love that fashion of wearing her hair, solely because I
had once recommended it, and had followed it, long and
long after, from the choice of her own heart, without
recollecting the original source of that choice! Yes,
that was it. She was too delicate; too bashful, by far,
to pay me so direct a compliment.
This brings to
my
recollection, a dear girl that I once knew, who
had a voice like a bird, though abundantly more powerful. I loved
her She loved me. Something happened, however, to make me
doubtful of her love. During that time of doubt, I saw proof in
every
thing, to convince me that she no longer loved me. By and by,
a new turn of thought came to me. I would delight myself
continually
in following her, and in anticipating her conduct; and, yet,
although
she did not act, once in twenty times, according to my
expectation
,
yet I never changed my opinion. Thus, I would go to
church, to hear her sing. I would say to myself she will not sing
to-night. I shall know the reason. She cannot. She will behold
me, and she will feel too much emotion. I would go. I would
see her sitting as usual, with the choirshe would singI would see
her, and hear her. `Ah! I would say to myself, how wisely she
has behaved! Every body knows here, that she has loved me; every
body sees me here; and everybody, as she well knows, will attribute
her refusal to singto her emotion and inability, on account of her
love for me. What self command! What prudence! I would
continually exclaim. But, after awhile, she would falterher
self-command
would vanishshe would tremble and lean against a
pillar
,
for support. Heaven and earth! my heart would cry out,
what affection! she cannot command herself. How tender and
true, after all. So it is with all the world.
And once. I particularly remember, that I went to a certain other
church, where we had long been in the habit of seeing each other
in the belief that I would not be there; for, I had long left it; and I
had been told that she had left it, soon after. I went, that I might
be
satisfied;
for, how could I doubt her love, if that were true?I
went; and, the first person that I saw, was herself! Did this alarm
me? Noit was but a higher proof of her love, yet!What! did
she not continue to go, notwithstanding I had left it, in the faint hope,
(for, it was her only chance,I went to another church;) of meeting
me, one day or other, again; what patience!what love!
You may laugh at these things, readerbut, if you have a heart,
be you man or woman, you have cheated yourself as beautifully,
when in
hope;
and more cruelly, by far, when in
fear
.En.
And once, too, I remember, when I had given
Caroline
,
herself, a pretty quaker-coloured shawl, she had
worn it for some timeand I had been not a little
pleased by her wearing it; but she left it off, finally,
and then I was more pleased; for it was a proof to me,
that she began to be sensible of appearances, and alive
to many things, that, in the heedlessness of childhood,
with an untouched heart, she had laughed ator never
thought of, at all. Yet, soon after, the shawl
re-appeared
,
and I saw in it, a new proof of her affection, which
made her diregard appearances. Thus it is, when we
hope; every thing gives confirmation to our hope. And
when we fear, all that may happen, is wrested and
distorted
to our purpose. Happen what will, there is sure
to be an appositeness in it---as to the events that follow
a dream, or an omen. When the heart is light, the
whole world about, is an atmosphere of sunshine---
the heaven, a vault of molten sapphire---dropped with
fire; but, when it is heavy---O, there is an unutterable
dullness, even in the melody of birds; the sweet
star-light
;
the green turf; and even the eyes of woman,
are misty and afar---like what we worship in
distraction---dim
and uncertain, but beautiful,
very
beautiful
apparitions; but, let me leave this chapter.
CHAPTER XIX.
Male coquetry...Counsel...Delusions of love...Cases
pro.
and
con.
...Confidence shaken...A stranger...Separation...Caroline's
note...Miss A,...Modesty...Matters and things in general.
Lady
! Have you thought of what I said?I left off,
too abruptly in the last chapter. And you, sir, have
you never gone to church, or into some company, where
she, that you loved, was sure to be found?---prepared
yourself for the trial---met her----and trembled?
---approached
her, and froze her and yourself too, with your
own self collectedness; stood near her, and talked with
all your heart and soul, about what you did not care
one fig for, merely to astonish
her;
or to prove that you
had not lost your self possession?---while you knew that
your voice went to her heart?---I
have
. Have you
never
lavished your attention upon them, that she, whom
you loved yet, more than all that lived and breathed
upon the earth, might not sleep so very sweetly, in the
coming night?----If you have, you are a scoundrel and
a fool. I
have
Have you never put your head upon
the pillow----after you had thought, till your temples
were sore; and felt as if, even the pillow, were a truss
of iron---as your conscience awoke, and whispered to
you, in the darkness, to come to judgment!--and Love, the
naked new born babewith blue eyes running away,
in water---sat by you, clinging to your agitated heart
with his little hot lips?--I
have
. Have you never
attempted
to find some heroick, great reason for your cruelty
and feebleness? and, at last, persuaded yourself, that the
kindest thing in all this world, which you could do to
the torn plant, that you had reft of all its blossoms;
the gentle creature, whom you had visited like a
mortal
poison---was to leave them both, for ever and ever:
and that the one, might be bound up; at another season
might flower again, with its fragrant waxen blossoms;
and the other, if it were utterly neglected, and left to
the merciless wind, might soon be healed?I
have
I
have persuaded myself that the truest evidence of love,
which I could give to a woman, when we were apart for
everwas not to exasperate her, nor to pursue her;
but when my heart was sweltering with a sense of her
proximity, and all its tenderness wrought within it, like
subterranean waters, all striving to gush out, in their
feeling of blessednessas if I knew not, that such a
woman
lived upon this earth: and why? Her wounded
pride, I said to myself, will restore her; and she will be
driven to look about her for another; some other, that
may be permanently dear to her. We cannot meet
again! Why should I seek to preserve my place in her
love? It will only make
her
wretched; and disqualify
her, for ever, for being happy with another. Thus did
I reason, many a time and oft, when I was weary of
living, and ready to bury myself alive, for the woman
of my heart. It was
her
happinesshers alone, that I
cared for. It mattered little, to mevery little, how
it was promoted. Would my life make her happierI
would
live:
my death?O, I would lie down, willingly,
and wait there, till my ashes were all that was left of
me.
And yet-what a fearful spirit of contradiction and
vicissitude
is this! I have set by hervery near her, too;
when Hope started up, all at once, before me, like a new
fledged cherub, with the wings of a butterfly. She
was mute. It is in awe, thought Ithe words
would die away upon her lips; love is making musick
in her heart tho'. But she spoke! where then was
her
awe?
O,
that
was an effort to conceal itit was
a proof of her wisdom. But she wandered, and was
disordered in her thought; and her words were not
very
beautifully arranged. A sure symptom to me, that she
was disordered where I most wished her to be; that
she was
not
, with all her effort, entirely mistress of
herself. Alas!even this delusion perished with the
other. Her manner became more steady; she was
fluent and firm in her utterancenay, even eloquent,
and very feeling. The inspiration of love! I was
surenothing else could have done it. Had I ever
seen her so ready to manifest her power; and yet, so
apparently
unconscious of it? never. It was done then;
either
intentionally
, to captivate me, and to demonstrate
that she could be at ease, even with
me;
or
unintentionally
,
which was yet more flattering! But her voice
trembledher argument faltered. Love, almighty
love? thought I. She cannot get on, nature will
triumph
hath
triumphed. But, she remembered
herself
almost immediately. Gracious heaven! what a
mind!
what self possession! I exclaimed, inwardly.
She smiledit was a smile of encouragment. She
was pensiveit is the sweet melancholy of love.'
She laughed; it was only a natural effort to conceal her
emotion.She was serioushow could she be
otherwise
,
with one so
dear
to her, in the same room! Her
seriousness went away; and I was delighted with her
playfulness. It was the hilarity of innocence; the
festivity of the blessed! Her hand touched mine
it thrilled. I was sure that it had happened
designedly
.
She had sought itfor the pleasure of touching
me! But mine touched hers; and she withdrew it,
perhaps
,
just as if a serpent had fallen on it. The
electricity
of love!I thought. She could not abide it;
her very blood could not, unpreparedly! But, it may
be, that she did not so suddenly snatch it awaybut
only withdrew it, coldly. It was an artificial
manner
,
the properest in the world, to disguise her real
feelings. She trifled with meit was an evidence
that my nearness did not distress her; that she was
happy
in my company. She was reservedit was
impossible
for one much in love, I knew, to trifle. She
listened to me, without opening her lips, or lifting her
eyes. How truly was she devoted to me!but, anon,
she
did
lift her eyes, and join freely in the
conversation
.
Still, there were comfort and sustenance to my
B b
lovehappen what would! How ingenious we are, in
deluding ourselves!how wonderfully so, in torturing
others. I have experienced both. In loveat one time,
nothing could happen, nothing; that did not yield
aliment
to my hope. At another, nothing, that did not
give nutriment to my fear. In the first place, I was
sure that I deserved to be happy; and, in the latter, that
I did not. Women are yet more ingenious; especially
in their sorrow. Do their husbands watch every
movement
and toneit is (if the devil Jealousy, or
Distrust
be once awake) to conceal the alteration of their
heartsto Iull their
once
beloved onein compassion.
Are they not so
very
attentive?they are neglectful.
Does the husband fail in an engagement?it is what
he would never have done, before they were married; no
never, never! Does he keep it scrupulously?It is
affectation
;
done to blind her; or treating her, like a spoilt
child, rather than a rational companion; or done, less
out of tenderness, for
her;
than out of a holy regard for
his own word. Do I speak bitterly? I feel itI
feel
it! I have lovedbeen belovedhad an angel for my
wifeyet such was her temper. My days were sunless,
my nightsO, I would not that my worst enemy should
be worn away, by such inward watching, as I have been,
while my own Emma lay upon my armthe lamp
shining
upon her parted lips, all night longwhen, if I
moved
---she awoke, and clung to me; and trembled,
and wept, as if she were truly about to lose me, for ever!
No----no---not yet, not yet. There is time enough
for all that. My boyhood is not yet told. That over,
I shall be at liberty to tell what a father and a husband
both suffered, who loved truly, tenderly, faithfully;
yet doubted, all but the innocence of his own wife; and
was doubted in turn even, it may be, of his own
innocence
.
But Carolinelet me return to her. Our reserve,
with occasional lapses of tenderness, had continued for
nearly a year more; and I was already preparing, to
return to my home, with the intention of going to the
East Indies, as an adventurer. But a cloud was
gathering
,
upon the face, that I most loved; there was a
growing
melancholy, and sorrow; and one evening that we
were alone, Hezekiah told me, evidently with some
unwillingness
,
that he had lately met with a very
extraordinary
man, from my country, who knew me.
As he said this, he fixed his old eyes upon me---and,
I could see that there was something wrong in them.
I coloured---not with guilt, but with surprise---and,
perhaps, with a little anger.
Of what name? said I, in a trembling voice.
I cannot remember it. It was accidentally that I met
him. And, when I learnt where he was from, I
happened
to mention thy name. And he told me much of
thee.
Unfavourable, I am
sure
, said I, haughtily.
Yes--- answered the old man.
I was thunderstruck. I arose from my seat. Where
is he to be found? said I. I must see him.
Be calm, William. He has promised to meet thee;
and he will keep his promise. When we are together,
face to face, I shall confront him with thee. Till then,
let us say no more about it.
I bowed; and, taking a candle from the mantle piece,
was about to light it.
To bed William, so early? said Hezekiah.
No
said I. Not to
bed
to my room, only.
I have matters there, that shall be no longer neglected.
I shall see thee, tomorrow? said Hezekiah, in a
doubtful, and far less cordial tone, than usual.
What could it mean! I turned pale. I felt that I
was sinking. It was a small room; and, in going out,
I should have to pass Caroline, who sat fronting me.
I attempted it; but, I thought that I should never get
to her
never!
It was like running in my sleep, with
a murderer after me.
She lifted her face. She was pale as death; and, I
am sure,aye, perfectly sure, that she had been
weeping
.
Hezekiah arose. William, said he, with a
manner
,
unlike aught that I had ever seen before in him
I could not have believed him capable of such great
dignityand Caroline, as if dreading, I know not
what, appeared about to leave us. No, my child,
said the old man,
thee
may abide here yet. I have no
secret from thee. Thy old father cannot
begin
now, to
cover his heart, before his only daughter. No,
Caroline
stay
thee here. Tomorrow evening will he the
evening of trial. Till then, we ought to suspend our
judgment. In the mean time, I have only one word to
say to thee, William. I have trusted theeI have
heard thy story; watched over thee; taken thee, as my
own child, into my own family. I cannot believe that
thou wilt abuse my confidence. I.
Abuse your confidence!said I, as soon as I could
draw my breath. What is the meaning of this?Speak!
Who has dared to slander me? What have I done?
Bring me, face to face, with the wretch, that has visited
youlet me but face him, and I will trample him in
the dust.I.
Would
that
prove thy innocence? said Hezekiah.
O, I thought that my heart would burst. I turned
again, to go.
Thee will surely meet him? said the old man,
rather
doubtfully.
Meet him
, said Caroline,
meet
him!
O,
that he will
.
The words, I heard notI know not how they
reached
methere was no sound, no lookbut, the next
thing that I knew, I was holding her to my
bosom
my
lips to her eye-lids; and my heart gushing
out, all over. I recollected myself. I blushed and
stammered, for a moment;then, I went to the father;
and I placed my hands, one upon each shoulder.
I know not what you
suspect;
I care not, said I.
You may believe that I will destroy myself. I shall
not. You may believe that I will run away. Your
change of colour shows that you do. I shall not.
You may believe that I
dare
not meet him. You are
mistaken. You are an old mana man of much
experience
.
Yet, you do not know my heart so well as
that child.
She
will tell youshe
did
tell you, that I
shall meet this strangerwhoever, or whatever he may
be. You have doubted me.Enough.It does not
cancel all my obligationbut(my voice trembled)
but, it has done no little, toward discouraging me, in the
way of virtue, self denial; and(
love
, I would have
said, but I
could
not.) You are moved. It is too late.
Tomorrow night, I shall meet that man. He can tell
you nothing, if he tell the truth, so bad as I have
already
told you, of myself. Some
particulars
, he may
tell you. I would have told you the samenay, some
that he cannot tellsome, that no other beings, than
God and his angels, are acquainted with. I have used
no concealment. I have acknowledged that there was
blood upon my hands, and blackness in my heart: but,
I have never sought, and never avoided, with any
especial
care, to distress you with the
particulars
. Would
that you had done more wisely. It is terrible toto
to part, nowII.
To
part!
said Hezekiahcatching my hands
To
part!
whispered Caroline, raising her head from
the tabletoto
part!
Her voice died away, in a low murmur.
To
part!
said I, firmly. There is no help for
it, now. I have foretold this. I have cautioned you
against it, again and again. For three whole years,
have I said, beware how you
doubt
me; come to
me
, if
you would know anything; and you shall know it all,
all
, even to the most secret transgression of my
thought. But do not doubt me.I did not say
why
.
I could
not
, then. But, now I do. It is no longer
safe
for us to meet together. One, or the other, would soon
perish. You have discouraged me. You have taught
me, that there is no hope for me. Happen what will!
years of self denial may have worn away! years of
contrition
,
sorrow and perseverance!yet, my character
is gonemy hold upon your heart is gonein the very
first breath of a strangeran unknown mana.
No matter. Tomorrow night, I shall meet him.
Farewell
.
Till then, I shall not leave my room That
overthatit is hard to think ofbut, it must be
farewell, to you all,
for ever!
I shall never forget your love, or your respect; nor,
will you, yours, for me. I will
compel
you to respect me;
all of you;
all
that know me;
all
that have known me;
Bb 2
with all my infirmity, and wickedness, to the last hour
of my life!
Eunice had entered, unperceived. She held her
handkerchief up to her faceand tried, many times, to
speakbut, could not. I turned to Carolinewhile
her father and mother sat down. in two rocking chairs,
near each other, and turned their faces away; each,
holding by the other's hand. They knew me. They
already knew enough of me, to feel that there was no
hope left. They were inconsolableutterlyand
speechless.
I went to Caroline. I took her hands. She leaned
her forehead upon my arm; while I stood up, and held
her as she sat. It was some minutes, before I could
utter
a wordand then, all my heart ran out, at my
lips and eyes.
Caroline!said Ispeak to your motherto
your father. Tell them that I am innocent. I know
not what may have troubled themwhat they may
have heard; some thought of you, or me, perhapsbut,
speak to them. Tell them that I am innocent. Tell
them that. till this hour, and in their presencemy lips
never touched theemy arm never embraced thee.
Thou art the child of their old age, Caroline; and, when
I am awayO, do not weep so bitterly
do
notwhen
there is none left, to do me justice, there is
one, one
, I
am sure, whom I have mightily wronged, that will do
it. Wilt thou not, Caroline? (Her hand contracted,
convulsivelyand mine was drenched with her tears;
and her lips,oh, I can feel them yet, upon it!)
Wilt thou forget and forgive me?Farewell!Thou
shalt have no cause to repent of thythy. No,
dear, I will not, cannot say it. Farewell.
I took her up in my arms, as I said thisshe was
lifeless
and
laid her upon the bosom of her mother. I
never saw her there, afterward, till she was upon her
death bed.
What a night, I passed! More than half of it was
upon
my knees. What!and was there no peace for me?
none
, till the cold grave had hut over me? Were the
follies of my boyhoodthe nameless things, that I had
done, and toldand repented ofwere
they
to haunt
me, eternally? and interpose, like apparitions, just
when I was nearest to being happy! Was this the
retribution
of heaven? Had my conscience slumbered?
O, I knew not. But, I knew this
this:
and it was a
comfort to me, that God hath entrusted the happiness
of man to his own keeping. That night, I reviewed
my conduct. I thought, of all that I had said, or done,
in that family of love. There were many foolish things;
some indiscretions; some childish and hasty things,
for which I was sorry, and had atoned; but none, no
not
one
, of wickedness! This then, I was sure, would
preserve me, in their veneration, when I was gone.
They would try to forget me; but, they could not. All
that was good in my nature, would be embalmed in
their hearts. All that was evil, would be forgotten, or
thought less unkindly of. I had parted with her too
parted
God of heaven! can it be true!
parted!
and with whom?with
Caroline
and for ever! And
how?
My heart smote me. But, my pride arose, like
Lucifer, the jewels melting upon his forehead; and, with
that regal aspect, which hath ever characterised it, took
the attitude of dominion anew. I would sacrifice my
life for Carolinebut, not my self respect. Nowe were
apart. And how? Just as it should be. We had
parted at
night;
in
tears
the first kiss of love, upon
our young lips;the first fever of passion in our young
veinsand, all the night long, she would lie, and
meditate
and dream about it with all the night through,
and darkness, solitude and silence, for the impression to
deepen itself! Would she ever forgive me?No
nevernever!
I would leave a farewell letter for her. She would
preserve it; and hereafter go to it, all alone; and sit by
it; and weep over it, as over some precious thing
inurned
;
and, every year, there would be a holier tenderness
in her thought of me. I would leave, as I always do,
the truth of my heart before her;and my last words
should be what all her future experience would
confirm
.
I did so. I sat down, and wrote her a letter,
that had she lived to this hour, she would have loved
me for having written.
But who was the stranger?Did he really
know
me;
and dare to say these things? Noit was impossible.
It must be some one, who did not
know
me: some one, who
had
heard
a report only of my evil nature, and believed
it, from its generality. Could I blame him?No. But he
was upon ticklish ground. A false step might dash him to
atoms. I made up my mind immediately. If he be
malicious
and meddlesome; or a liar, I will make an
example
of him, upon the spot, said I. But, if he be truly a
friend of this family, repeating only what he has heard,
and I can tell that by his forehead and eyes, while
he is repeating it, I will forgive him.
Early in the morning, some one tapped at my door.
A note was given to me. I opened itit fell from my
hand. It was the writing of Caroline herself. My
glance ran hurriedly over the first sentencethe
first
,
onlyand I was like one struck blind. It was some
minutes before I could command myself. Never,
never
,
in all my life, did I feel so sudden and deadly a chill
at my heartas at that moment. It seemed to stop
all at once, with a sudden jar. A sort of giddy,
rushing
,
sensation in my headand then, a strange
faintness
followed. That Caroline should write to me
Caroline, whose timidity was so spiritual and
delicately
interwoven with her very thought, thatO, it was
past belief! Once only, had I seen the trace of her
pencil
before. It was accidental. I had
given
her a
little
book, of exceeding value to me, as the gift of a
friend, but I had given it to her delicately; and she had
misunderstood it as a
loan
. Some time after, she
returned
it to mein such a way, thatO, it were idle to
tell how my heart heaved. It had been so happy, so
very happy, till that momentand thatthe cup was
dashed with poison, at the very instant when my lips
were burning with the first taste of it. I was mute,
disordered, haughty and absentunable to maintain a
conversation with anybody, yet, too proud to yield
forgetting myself every moment, yet constantly, and
earnestly mingling in all that was saidI left the
room. I opened the book, at a folded leaf, a single
line was underscoredit was in
her
hand. I knew it
I felt itas if it had been scored upon my heart. A
single word too, was thereO, how much it told of
what she thought.
But this! I took up the note again. It ran thus.
I have made several attempts to tell you candidly, the
exact state of my feeling, but find it impossible.
This was the sentence that shook medown to the
dust. I had parted, and wept and prayedupheld, by
the certainty that I was beloved. Yet, at the very
first glance. I foresaw, in this note, that I had been
deceiving
myself. It was unmanly to yield. I took up
the paper again. I read it. It was very cautiousbut
why is it, that love will be heard! buried, darkened and
mute. It is but a buried exhalationburied, and heaped
up embersand that inward musick. which, but touch
the earth, where they are hidden, and they all come
out anew, in their agitation, fragrance, warmth and
melody!
The note continuedafter this fashion.
Therefore, contrary to my resolution, which you,
so often, have heard me express, I am compelled to put
my thought on paper. I hope that you will pardon
me. I think that you entirely deceive yourself
respecting
Miss A.
(Stay. readerHere is something untold, I finda
tale of sorrow and ofshame. Be patient a while, and
I will tell it.)
I think (that) you love her; indeed, I am sure (that)
you do.
I thinkthat, perhaps, some of my friends have
persuaded
you into a belief, that I am more worthy of
your affection, than I really am. I do not think that
you have known me long enough, to judge of my
character
.
I never, never
would consent to marry any
one, unless I were sure that I possessed his undivided
HEART. If God spare me my dear father, his society
with the love that I have for study, will, in some
measure
,
compensate me for the attention of a kind and
affectionate
husband.
[14]
[14]
Do not smile reader. I cannot bear it. It would pain me to
know, that a blunder, so innocent and natural, in a sweet unpractised
girl, and no professional author, should be ever seen. But, I
cannot
alter itit is too sacred in my eyes. And who does not
understand
her meaningthat the want of an affectionate husband's
attention
,
and not the
attention
itself, will be
compensated
here?
You have loved several, as ardently as you now think
(that) you love me. On analyzing my character, I
am sure (that) you will discover some things, (that)
you cannot like. I have not that strength of mind,
which I have so often heard you admire. I have
consulted
no one upon this subject, not even my parents.
They attribute my seriousness to indispositionlet
them think so. I am really sick. I beg of you, as a
proof of your friendship for me---do not, by your
conduct
,
lead them to suppose (that) anything unpleasant
has passed between us. I feel that I am doing wrong
in writing, without the consent of my parents. If I
were to ask them, I should have to give my reason for
acting so. I cannot do that. I find it impossible for
me to speak to you; and it is necessary that you should
know my true sentiments.
(Here my pulse stopped againthe letter was a
riddle
to me. What did it mean?I could not
understand
it; and yet, the allusions were plain enough.
But
here
I was palsied anewas if death had put his
hand upon my heart, once more, in sportI could feel
it rotting away under his touchbut it was only for a
moment.)
Continue to treat me, as usual, until after my father
goes to L: then I can write to him. what it would
be difficult for me to tell himmy determination of
never
marrying. He shall, by my representation, believe
it is from the love of my study---
adieu!
If
tomorrow
be pleasant, will you walk with us?may heaven
bless you!
C
.
Tomorrow!walk with her!what is the meaning
of all this? am I mad? or am I deceived? Can it be her
writing, or, it may be, that she is trifling with me
does she think me such an idiot, as to walk with her
tomorrow
,
after what has happened to night. O, noI
would not exchange the sweet recollection of that
parting
,
for all the rapture of possession!
I threw my eyes upon the date. Gracious Heaven!
could it be possible!they danced in their sockets. The
paper was a week old. I rung the bell violently and,
when the pasteboard humpkin who gave it to me,
appeared
,
asked him, as composedly as I could, when he
received it. He could not rightly tell, he said,
holding his quaker arms down, stiffly by his side, with the
palms nearly turned wrongside out; and not a pucker
in his face, the rascal! may be a weekmay be ten
daysmay be
Hell and the devil! said I.
Oh
my!
said the stupid doltwiping his lips with
his great paws, and staring at me, as if he had not
rightly understood me.
Why did not you give it to me, directly?
Why, I lost it, he answered, with the same
imperturble
gravity, I gived it to thee, as soon as I found
it agin.
What could I say to the Jackass? Begonedolt.
I sat down and thought. Here then, said I, is
the riddle explained. Here then, is the cause of her
last seriousness and sickness. What must she have
thought of my silence?
Tomorrow!
when was it?I
began to recall the time, and found that she had been
particularly troubled and silent a day or two,
probably
,
after the letter had been written; and then, rather
haughty. It was all explained now. I sat down and
wrote a few lines, ending, if I remember right,
somewhat
in this way, and now, farewell, farewell,
forever
,
Caroline. May you meet with some one, whom
you may love with all your heart and soul; some one
having all of my good qualities, and none of my bad
ones; and one too, that has always been what man
ought to be.
The day wore away very gloomily. I had secured
my passage in the evening stage; my trunks were all
packed, and the hour of trial was fast at hand.
Still there was a continual, deep yearning, and
sorrow
here
, for Caroline. I felt that it would nearly
break my own heart to leave her, and yet, I never
would consent to marry any woman whose father had
doubted me. And she too, had
she
not doubted me?
where then would be my safety, were I to marry her?
nothing would be left to me, nothing but to seeO
God, have I not seen it!the mother of my babe dying,
day by day, of a broken heart, with the same malady
of doubt and death! And here, one word of Miss A.
I had been once, in New Haven, and, while waiting for
the steam boat to arrive, I sallied out, to take a bath.
The Museum and bathing house were under the same
roof. No. I am mistakenin partmy memory is
bad of late; but this I do remember, that I left the
tavern
to go into a bath, and that I came home without
having been in it, and
with
having been in the Museum.
At the Museum, I met with two women, accompanied
by a country bean, strangers; one of whom had
something
particularly striking in her manners, and
pleasant
in her voice. I tried to get an opportunity of
speaking to her; and, as people in these small towns are
not very scrupulous, (in
private
) with strangersI
succeeded
.
After paying her some little attention, we
separated. and I passed rather an uneasy night; for
really, there never was a more inflammable nature than
mine; and thought a good deal of her, wishing, all the
while, that I could manage to delay my journey a day
or two, and find her out. But nothat was
impossible
.
I was travelling by express, as I always have
been, all my life, and always shall be, to the devil, I
dare say, through all eternityat least.
Hardly had I set my foot into the cabin of the steam
boat, the next morning, than I encountered these two
identical ladies! I was delighted, as you may readily
believe. The father, of this one, was with her; and the
other, a black-eyed, saucy little wretch. with more
mischief in her heart than you would think her whole
body could well hold, stuck to her side, like a plaster of
burgundy pitch, for the same purpose too, I imagine;
to
strengthen
her.
All went on very pleasantly,
very
for I had the
pleasure of hearing Miss A. (I had found out her name)
abuse one of my most particular friends. for a whole
hour; and then we talked about novels, plays, poems,
&c. &c. of all which, I was just about as well qualified
to talk, as the Cham of Tartary; and she, perhaps, not
quite so well as I. But no matter for that: we talked
and talked, till we were perfectly satisfied with
ourselves
,
and tolerably, with each other.
But the father was a shrewd, hard-looking, sour,
thin man; and he had kept his eyes upon me, with a
marvellous steadiness for a long time, not permitting
me to approach his daughter's jewelry when he was
near. without a good deal of management: and when
we arrived at New York, he honoured me with one of
the civillest hints in the world that, his daughter could
do very well; very well, indeed, without any more
attention
from
me
. I remonstratedHe was her father,
to be sure, but, I informed him that he was old and tired
of the city! and this was
her
first visitthat there were
ten thousand things to be seenthe lions and fish
and lawyers and mayor, and Dr. Mitchell, and so
forth, and that it would worry
him
to death, to gad
about with a young frolicksome girlthat, to me, it
was all.
But the old fellow interrupted meHe knew a
few, and not a
very
few neither; and if my modesty
would have permitted me to interpret his looks
into
language, when I had finished my speech, my
notion
is, that they would have stood about thus, on
paper
,
Why, rot me, if thou art not the very otto of
impudence.
It was in vain to parley with such a man. He was
one of the cast-iron creatures of our revolution, who
having been in many battles, like some of our mud forts,
had caught their trick, of growing stronger and more
impenetrable
by
bullet and ball. A smart cannonade
of half an hour, was worth a new line of entrenchments
to either.
So(we were at the house then,) he was holding
the door open, for me
to go out
I bid him a most
reverential
good morning, and vanished. He soon
followed
me; and I re-entered; after having led him out of
the way; took his daughter under my arm, anddid'nt
we have a pleasant time. By Jupiter; you would
have thought us surveyors or tax gatherers;we were
to be found in every lane and alley in the city; and
Cc
were returning, the happiest of God's creatures, I
verily
believe, when.
Oh, the devil!there was the old
man
himselfthe
old
One
, I ought to say. It was just at a corner. I
crossed myself, and prepared for a somerset: and he,
as if doubting the evidence of all his own, dear old
senses
,
stood staring at her awhileand then, as if he
were afraid, if he did'nt secure her then, that I should
get her, in spite of his gums(for he had no teeth,) he
hustled her under his armgrowled at me, like an old
mastiff, upon whose tail somebody had trodden, at his
own fire place; and set off, at a square trot.
I never saw the woman after that. My
acquaintance
with her was a pleasant one, but entirely
innocent
;
yet, somehow or other, the story of it had reached
me again, blackened and distorted most shamefully: so
indeed, that I felt no little sorrow and remorse for
what I had done. I had told Caroline of it; but, rather
as a frolick, than as a more serious matter; yet she, still
apprehensive that there was something in it yet untold
had thought of it so much, that, at the very name of
Miss A, she would actually turn pale. That was
allall, upon my honour.
CHAPTER XX.
If you ever see a man sewing on a button, with a gimblet and codline;
or cutting a hole in his waistband; and thrusting a tenpenny nail
through the eye of the button, set him down for a Tailor.
Depend
upon it, men are never so superlatively absurd, except from
affectationthey would
sink the Tailor
.
MY OWN WORKS.
The
moment was now at hand. It was dark in my
room, but I knew it not; and I was faint and weary. For
twenty-four hours, I had not tasted food, nor shut my
eyes. At last, there was a faint rap at the door.He is
come, said a soft voice; could I be mistaken? O no
I caught up the letter that I had finished; opened the
door widely, and the apparition of Caroline stood before
me. I was quite stupified for a moment; and when I
put the letter into her hand, she tottered;and I
caught her, almost insensible, in my arms.My trunks
were already gone. I would leave nothing to
accident
.
I had made up my mind; and there was no
going
back; yet, when I felt Caroline again in my arms;
her cold cheek pressing my mouththe death-like
stillness
and darkness about meO, I would have
strangled
her and myself, upon the spot, could I have done it,
without hurting or disfiguring her. I wanted to die
I was willing to diebut what should I do. Every
moment
,
I might expect a summons. In my perturbation
and terrour, I carried her into my own room, and laid
her upon my own bed. I spoke to her. She made no
reply. I pressed her to my bosom, and kissed her
dear forehead; still no reply. I lifted the curtain of
the nearest window. She was utterly lifeless; and, as
I looked upon her, I grew desperate. If she be truly
dead
dead
I said to myself, we shall never part.
I had loosened her dress; her beautiful bosom lay half
open before me; and the dim twilight, as it fell upon
her, gave to her a sad, touching, unearthly paleness. My
pistol was in my handanother moment, and she
had been the death of me. Just then! the shadow of
her mouth stirred. I kissed herand, after a few
gentle undulations of her bosoma deep sigh; and two
or three faint attempts to lift her delicate hand, letting
it fall each time, as if it were lifeless, upon the bed.
She put her arms round my neck, as I leaned over her,
and murmuredwith her wet mouth against my neck
O mother
O dear,
dear
mother!
I released her hands; I trembled for her. I
endeavoured
to reassure her; and was mortally afraid that
some of the family might enter; and, what would be
thought? My agitation was frightful; but my
presence
of mind never forsook me. I locked the door,
and came to her, (it was a desperate thought, but the
only one.) It was yet some moments, before she knew
memy tears had fallen all over her face.
Mother!Father!
said she, wildly, rising from
the bedher dishevelled hair all about herwhere
am I?who art thou!thou! O, William,
William
!
is
it
is
it?
I could only whisper her name. She arose, feeble and
faint, fully aware, I believe, of her situation; yet, pressing
as the peril was, still afraid, or unwilling to go. Wilt
thou leave me, William? she whispered, while her
trembling
wet eye-lids were moving against mineO do
not leave me.
She shut her eyes;I could feel that she did, for the
lashes swept over my cheek; and awaited my answer.
I could not utter a word; for my everlasting happiness,
I could notfor several minutes. But, after a while.
Caroline, we must partsaid I, we
must
.
I felt her hands, that were locked over my shoulders,
relax, and her head falling:yet, I could not endure,
that she should be found in my chamber, at such an
hourO, no, not for all the world; her purity was
dearer to
me
, than to her own father; and I,I, would
not have survived the blasting of her name.
Yes, dear, we
must
part, I repeated, your
father
is at handthe stranger is comeleave me, dear,
I beseech thee, leave me!
But nono! I will not! I never will leave thee,
she replied, faintly, and clinging to me all the while.
Who would have believed it? so timid, so innocent, yet
so resolute and daring.
Her bosom, I have already told you, while it was yet
light enough to see the hushed heaving of it, had been
revealed to me, for a moment; yetyet, such was the
awful tenderness of my heart for her, that I had turned
away my eyes from it, and replaced the thin
handkerchief
that covered it, while she was yet insensible.
But now,
now
, that I had her in my arms; and could
feel the blood rippling through the blue veins, of her
white, soft neck, against which my forehead rested,I
knew not how longGod knows, that I had
forgotten
every thingevery thing on this earth---I
shuddered
in the contact; I drew her to me convulsively, and
pressed my passionate mouth to her bosom, Gracious
heaven!I felt her heart stop; and her head reel. She
turned cold instantly, all over. Her flesh was like
marbleand yet it was covered with perspiration;
and her breathing was frightful. She attempted to
arise, but she had not the strength; what kept her
alive, I know notindignation perhaps; but she put me
away from her, and thenO, I thought that I should
never get
my
breath again. My voice rattled in my
chest. I was dying; I felt that I wasand that, if
she did not speak quickly, I should be a dead man,
unforgiven for my last transgression. A long interval
past, of unutterable agony. I reached some water to
her; and she bathed her temples, trying, repeatedly, to
arise, but she could not. I heard a stepit was the
father'sand there were other voices.
O Caroline!
Caroline!
I cried, forgive me
speak to me! speak to meI am desperateour death
is at handspeak to metell me, that I am forgiven.
She aroseshe put both of her hands upon my
forehead
,
as if to prevent me from seeing her shameand
tears, and tenderness;fell upon my bosom, and
whispered---O
,
it was musick to meit was the voice of
humanity, to a shipwrecked and famished creature,
upon
a desolate rock---I do forgive thee! The door
Cc 2
opened!what!had I not locked itno, noI had
not. And there were strange facesservantslights
the father and motherandmerciful Providence!
could I be deceived
Hammond the dwarf
! How
came he there! whence! who! what was he! My
hair rosemy brain whirledandII.
I was conscious of nothing more, except that a
phantom
went by, with her dress torn and bloodytears
continually streaming from her eyesand her hair all
in disorder; and then, it seemed to me, that there was the
report of a pistol. And soon after, I awoke, in thick
darkness. I remembered it, and shuddered. Was I
again in the mad house? Who was this, that sat by
me, motionless and voiceless? I put out my hands,
and encountered another. It was cold and muscular.
Who are you? said I, speak to me.
Hammond the dwarf
; was the reply.
And by what right, said I, do you pursue, and
thwart, and worry me?at every step?you!
By the right of a superiour.
You,
you
my superior! God! if I had you, monster,
upon the solid earth; or in the bowels of it, upon
molten
iron, I would wrench a contradiction of
that
, out of
your heart. Where am I?
In my house.
Yours!let me begone.
No; it is impossible.
No!who shall detain me?
II will detain you. God will detain you.
Blasphemer!would that the everlasting skies
might fall upon you, for your saying!
Be done, William Adams; be done with this; no
resistance. I will be obeyed. You are in my power.
I can do as I please, with you. You have attempted
my life.
Iliar!scoundrel!monster!what mean you?
You have wounded me, in the presence of many
witnesses
;
mortally, it was thought, for nearly a month.
When was this?
When you were first discoveredAh, William
Adams, when will you have compassion upon woman;
the innocent and lovely Caroline
I leaped from my bedI tore myself away from the
encompassing bandsI threw myself at his throat
and he was astonished, I am sure, at my quickness and
strength; but, Lord! he overcame me, in an instant; and
replaced me again, as quietly, upon my bed, as if I had
been a babe.
Beware how you pronounce that name again;
said Iexhausted with passion. If I live, I will
strangle
you for it
A dead silence followed. Still, the impenetrable
monster moved notspoke not; and the night wore
away, if it were night, without a breath or a murmur.
I was weary of this tremendous silence. It was
insupportable
,
I felt my arms. They were exceedingly
emaciated; and my hair, I fancied, had been recently
shaved, close to my head; for, there was a strange
smoothness, and softness in it, as if it were new hair,
or the hair of an infant. What! was my dream coming
true, at last?
O said I, unwilling to pronounce a name, so
hateful
to me
will
you answer me?
I will; said hestarting with surprise, at the tone
of my voice; whatever I cannow, that you are
rational
.
Where am I?
In the
Pennsylvania
hospital.
What! What! I yelledin the
hospital?
Be calm, William Adams, he replied, I thought,
with some emotion; these frightful starts of passion,
are very perilous. I have undertaken your cure.
My
cure!
What mean you? How came you here?
My relation is the manager. Nay, nay, you are
in safe hands, if you will only behave like a man. I
have come here, to watch by you, and protect you.
You!
you!
to watch by
me
, and protect
me!
Say,
rather
,
to torture and distract me, by your cruelty and
mockery.
William Adams! said he, in a voice, that was like
the voice of majesty, rising in the wind, to a trumpet
call....it fell upon my heart, like a sentence;
I pity
you
. You wrong me. When have
I
mocked at
you?
when have I derided and tortured
you?
I felt it. I
felt
it. It was scalding lead to me.
Why had I hated him? Not that
he
had wronged, and
mocked at, and spit upon
me;
but, that I had wronged
him
, through all my lifemocked at
him
, from my very
boyhood; and spit upon
him
, till I was blind with
passion
.
What could I do? I could not repent, all at once.
I could not embrace a mortal foe, so suddenly. Yet,
yet, there was a yearning at my vitals; and I was so
utterly ashamed and humbled, by the awful justice of
his rebuke, that I could, almost, have lain down upon
the earth; and prayed to him, to set his foot upon my
neck.
Hammond, said Iit almost choked me, to
pronounce
his name. How long have I been here?
Nearly three months.
What!Do I hear aright? Where, then, is
Caroline
?the
fatherthe motherthe. O,
the light breaks in, upon me! It was you, Hammond,
you
, that destroyed me. But for
you
and yet, you have
dared to ask what you have done to meyea, in
mockery
,
and wrong, and insultha! ha! ha!
go on---go on---thou prince of darknessthou.
He leaned over methere was a light, cold and
starry
;
and, I could see his forehead work; and the tears
fell upon me(not like the church yard dew;) and his
voice came, with a compassionate sound, as from a
labouring
heart. I could not brush off the tears, then
nothough once, a drop, from the eyes of Hammond,
had been to me, like distillation, from the limbs of a
gibbetted
mana murderer, hung up to the weeping of
midnight dews; and the wailing of November winds.
Three months!
I cried; and where are they?
Ask me no questions, nowsaid Hammondwe
must not suffer you to be agitated. Believe that all
are well
all
your sisterand friends;and try to
sleep. I shall leave you, now, for a little timebut,
there will be a servant, within call. Try to sleep, if
you can.
He left me; but, I could not sleep.
Three months!
I said, continually, to myself. Here, so long, so alone,
for three whole months. But, as I thought, with my
eyes partly shut, there were some glimpses of
recollection
;
intervals of sanityI thought, in this dreary and
endless alienation. I heard a step; it was the step of
an aged woman. I called her to me; and soon learnt, to
my mortification, that I had been watched, by the
abused
Hammond, in darkness, day after day, night after
night, when people were dying, all about me, of a
pestilential
disorder; that his own life had nearly fallen a
sacrifice to his watchfulness over me; that he was the
admiration of all the household; that, I had passed for
his brother; notwithstanding that, in my lucid
intervals
,
I had called upon his name, and cursed him, with
the most fearful imprecations; for all that was natural,
to the bereaved of understanding, who are always most
inveterate, to their nearest and dearest friends. But,
there was yet something else to be told. Hezekiah Anson
had failedwas utterly ruined; and nobody could tell me
whither he had gone.
The next day, I saw Hammond, and pressed his hand.
The room was a little lighter, then. He was very
much disturbed.
William, said he, in one wordone word is
enoughtell me what were your designs upon Caroline
innocent, or guilty?
Open that window, said I, firmlylet me see the
face of the man, who dares to ask that question.
It was opened. I started at the countenance before
me. It was cadaverous, worn; but lofty and
impregnable
;
like one that had never smiled. It was
Hammond
;
but something, I know not what, had grown
upon
his broad forehead, and great eyes, that carried
authority
with it. His mouth was beautiful; and teeth,
the finest in the world; even in his boy-hood. But, his
nostrils were wide, and blood-coloured; like those of a
race horselenoting extraordinary vigour; and his
head was altogether too large for his body. His right
arm was in a sling; and, he halted, worse than ever, in
his walk.
I measured him, steadily, with my eyes; looked into
his very heart; bore
his
gaze, so intrepidly, that
his
eyes filled with the effort.
What prompted him, to that question, I asked
myself---
not
curiosity---no---he is above that.
Doubt
---
perhaps---let me see.
Will you believe my bare word, Hammond?
whatever
it be.
I will
, said he, promptly. His countenance
never
altered.
I am innocent
.
He was gone. I heard no more from him, for three
days. At the end of that time, he brought a young man
to me, pale as death, whom I instantly recognised to
to be the person, of whom, nearly a year before, I had
been rather jealous. Hammond led him to my bed
side; and immediately left the room.
You know the object of my visit, I suppose, said
he, to me.
NoI do not. (He was a good deal
embarrassed
.)
It is to apologize to you. I have injured you.
You?I know not how.
CarCarno, I cannot pronounce
her
name
I have wronged you, and am sorry for it, said he.
I forgive you, young man, I replied, with all my
heart. But how was it?
By searching into your history; believing everything
that I heard against you; and nothing that I heard in
your favourand repeating it to the father of
Caroline
.
I said nothing; but my eyes told him, what I thought
of him; and I soon found that my hands were cramped
with my effort to suppress my passion;and that I had
grappled the sheets, as I would, the throat of a wild
beast; and was holding them yet, till my bones ached.
After the appearance of the Dwarf, I met him; and
he spoke of you, as one, full of great qualities, that had
done much evil, unwittingly. I told Hezekiah; and he
went to the Dwarf. I know not what followed, until
you shot him.
Ishot whomwhom do you mean.
The Dwarf.
Explain yourself. There is a misunderstanding
here.
I allude to the chamberwhenO, Mr. Adams,
it is to
you
, that I owe these tearsbut for you---
It was some minutes before he could speak; and I
began
to find a little glimmering upon the past; some
coherency between my recollection of the chamber, and
pistolIf I understand you rightly, said Iyou
allude
tono matter whatis the story abroad?
It isall over the worldthe wide world!
Did I shoot Hammond?
So the story goes. He was wounded in the breast
you perceive that his arm is in a sling nowyou
shattered the arm. You were carried away for dead.
The whole town took up the affair; and you were sent
to the hospital, where Hammond has attended you,
night and day. Your disorder has been a
complication
,
they say. You have had the yellow fever, during
your delirium; and, though you have had several lucid
intervals; yet, they say, that you forget all that has
happened, at the next relapseand awake each time, as
from a long sleep.
But what brought you to me?
Hammond.
Hammond!how so?
He made me come.
Made
you!what mean you?
WhyI mean thisthat he has gone through the
whole town, fighting your battles, and confronting
your enemies, till many, that were your deadly
calumniators
,
have became your friends.
What could I say?I would have kneltbut I
was too weakI could not. I shut my eyes, and felt
the tears trickling under my lashes, down to my very
lipsthey were bitter and hot, and, I hope,
penitential
.
But how are they all? said I, again, as soon as
I could speak.
Whom do you mean?
Hezekiahand Euniceand.
Ruinedruined, past redemption!in the last
degree
of wretchedness and dependenceutterly helpless
and desolate in their old ageandah, so utterly,
that
And Caroline, said Itell mehow is
she?
well, is she not?O, tell me---for the love of God, tell
me.
What!he answered---looking at me with
compassion
,
and great alarm, as if he thought me relapsing.
O speak to me!---I repeated---tell me, where is
she?
And have you heard nothing
nothing
, said he---
in a whisper, as ifI know not what; but,---for a
moment, I felt as if my own heart had been buried alive
the words, even of his whispering, fell one, one by
one, upon it, like wet clods.
Nothing
, I answered.
He took my hand. Man, he said, man!
---innocent
or guilty, I pity you! I cannot tell you what
has happened toher---but she is
living
, yet---yet---
yet
I gasped for breath.
She has been nearer to you than, it seems, you have
dreamed of, in your delirium.
Gracious God!---that was it!---that was it!---I know
now!---I remember it all---all! O, I heard her sweet
voice, night after night, calling upon me---and I thought
it all a dream---I remember it now, now. Dear,
dear
Caroline---and could'st thou watch over me, thou
pitying
one!---Caroline! Caroline! I cried.
Hush!he said---She watch over you!O, no
---she is gone---she cannot hear you---she was a mad
woman
What!
For nearly two months, Caroline Anson was in the
very next apartment to yours, delirious---with her
broken
hearted parents weeping over her---dishonoured in
their beautiful daughter; ashamed in their old age. O,
sir, how could you spoil so fair, so innocent a
creature
?
I
tried
---but I could not speak---I felt my veins
bursting---my
throat parchedI
Spoil
her! I shrieked out---but---speak to me---
one word---but
one
, before I throw myself upon you---
is she alive?
Yes---barely.
In her senses?
Yes.
Leave me, thenleave me! I cried leave me,
while you may
I forgive you
. But, for the comfort
of your own heart,
believe
menay, I intreat you to
believe me---we are
innocent
---our embracing was
innocent
,
as that of angels.
What
sir---innocent! locked up in your room, at
night; pistols upon the bed; her dress torn, and her
hair disordered; locked in your very arms---weeping;
and inarticulate! O, man! man! you may not be the
most
guilty
---the
most
damnable of villains; but you
are the murderer of Caroline.
Where was I? The sound was there yet. The
murderer of Caroline!
Come back! come back! I
shoutedbut no, no, no!I was left alone, to destroy
myself, with my own supplication.
Hammond came, soon after; he was thunderstruck, at
my appearance. I was dressed, from head to footI
know not how, nor by whom, nor when. The clothes
did not appear like my own.
What is the meaning of this? said he, Who has
done this?
I could not speak. I tried, but I could not. I arose
took his hand; and moved toward the door.
William Adams. William, said he, kindly, what
ails you?
Do
speak to me. I tremble for you. Ha!
you have heardI am sure of itthe scoundrel!I
shall be tempted to wrench him, joint from joint, the
next time that we meet
I laid my hand upon his arm---it was the wounded
arm. He shrunk---and thenO! that pang---it was
the shattered armand
I
had shattered it
Somebody has been talking to you, of Caroline.
Is it not so? he continued, contracting his brows, with
pain.
Dd
I nodded---and the tears scalded my eyes, again.
And you would see her?
Yes, yes--- I answered, convulsively---dead or
alive, I
will
see her. Come---come.
It is impossible! he replied.
I looked upon him, for a moment, like a wild beast,
I am sure. Not a muscle trembled. All my
suspicions
returned. He saw them return.
Down with your black blood, William Adams;
he said. Trust to me. You cannot see Caroline,
to-night
.
Cannot!
---Who shall hinder me?
I will
.
You shall not! said he, resolutely, placing
himself
before me.
I would have stabbed him to the heart---crushed him
to death, if I could; but, when I threw myself upon him,
with my heart strings tightened to snapping; and my
blood-vessels all distended to bursting---he baffled me,
as you would, an infant; and, when I had come to my
senses, I stood before him, weeping, like a spoilt child,
with shame, and indignation. Where was my strength?
It had been terrible, once. Where was it, now? I
looked
down upon my hands---my legs---trod the floor.
Alas, my strength had departed from me! I was
weaker
than the shorn Sampson.
I fell upon my knees before him. O, Hammond---
Hammond! said I, if there be one feeling of humanity
about thee---one place that---but, no, no, no---thou art a
monster. Love never came near thee. Thou canst not
love. What! have I touched thee? O, have pity on
me. Suffer me to see her, once more. O, lead me to
her, let me but see her, once more! once more! She is
sick, Hammond; I know that she is. And could you,
gracious God!
would
you take upon your soul, the risk
of separating us, at such a moment! If she dieshe
will haunt you---and, I---O, I know not what I should
do---but that---I never shall forgive you---O, let me see
her---let me see her, dear Hammond---for the love of
Jesus!
Tears filled his eyes. He lifted me up. William,
said he; you cannot see Caroline, to night. It is a
critical
time, in her disorder. Whatever be the result, she
will, undoubtedly, live several days. Nay, nay---bear
it like a man. My friend---sirWilliam, William
Adams
.---Where
is your fortitude---where---your sister---
bear up against it.
I was no longer sensible---but gave myself up,
passively
,
like an idiot, to his direction.
That
night, and
part of the next day, I had terrible dreams; but, toward
the evening of the third day, I observed, that many
strange people were about me; that I was dressed,
when half asleep; and shaved, with great care and
tenderness
.
At last, there was a large mirror set before
me, I remember; and I stood, and trembled at my own
figure. It was frightful, haggard, and attenuated,
beyond
all my conception, and experience. I now
recollect
,
that there was a strange dizziness and darkness,
all about me; and, a great heaviness at my heart; and,
then, a long and dreary interval, in which I saw
nothing
but lights, continually passing and re-passing me;
and great, still shadows, mute as death; and that I heard
nothing but the noise of carriage wheels, going forever,
in one direction; and then, there was a strong, cold wind,
as from the sea beach, and the splash of waterthe
noise of rowing, and the heeling of a boatbut, all was
profoundly dark; and I, I neither saw, nor heard, nor
understood
it. It was like a dream to me, from beginning to
end; but, far less vivid and frightful, than many dreams
that I have had; and, I bore it all, patiently; but, with a
mortal oppression at my heart; a boding, as of a yet
more tremendous evil. Then, was I suddenly stopped,
in my meditation, by a jar that shook me, from head
to foot. I was led out, and bidden to step carefully;
and I felt, what I took to be sea-weed, wet and slippery,
crushing under my feet; and the rocks, upon which I
trod, were smooth, and wave-worn; and there were
many voices, whispering about me; and strange shapes;
muffled up; and, a great, even, level sheet, of what I took
to be a motionless water, away behind me. And then,
we had a long, long journey, on foot; and Hammond's
voice, with a tone of authority, I heard, several times,
afar off, giving orders; and, at last, I was sitting in a
miserable hovel; broken chairs, tables, and other
furniture
were all about; as if vessels had been shipwrecked
there; and, there was nothing, that I had ever seen
before
,
in such a place; but, altogether, a kind of
shattered
combination, as if a noble dwelling had been
wrecked
,
somewhere, afar off, and the furniture washed upon
the beach. It was very cold; and, there was no fire
upon the hearthnot a spark.
I sat, and ruminated within me, with my eyes shut,
while the bleak wind stirred my hair; and left it,
saturated
with moisture, as if the spray of salt water had
been, born inland. I was still in a kind of melancholy
stupor; and would start up, now and then, affrighted,
as if I were falling overboardin my sleep; and
uncover
my face; and look about, for a moment, hardly
able to persuade myself, that I was not yet in the boat;
so strongly did the waves still continue to dash, and
roar about me; and so long did I feel the motion of the
boat. At times, too, there were voices of wailing and
lamentation; and some sweet, very sweet toned
instrument
,
it appeared to me, now and then spoke out,
delicately
,
for a moment, as if the night-wind touched it,
in passing. At last, there were other voices; and a
fire was kindled; and, when I looked into the faces
about me, they looked upon me, with such a piteous
expression
that
I was afraid. My poor eyes ached, sadly;
and the room was full of a thick smoke, dashed, here
and there, with a thin, fitful, blueish blazing, very
brilliant; but, very trying to the eyes; and the
countenances
there, appeared hovering and floating about me;
and the statue of Hammond, unearthly. The wind
blew, down the chimney, and scattered the fire.
Gracious
God! cried one of the menit will be a terrible
night!
Aye, aye, Jim, you may well say thatformercy
on us!Lord God! how it thunders! The wind rose,
then; and the crazy hovel shook for a minute, as if it
were adrift upon the water; groaning and creaking, as
if it were out in a hurricane; but, I felt no sort of fear;
none in the world; the smoke, and the wind, and the
dust, and the voices, were all like a dream, to me; and
even the roaring of the seathe thunderthe salt
sprayand the shouting of men, afar off, that I
continually
heard, although my head was muffled up, and I
was like one asleep, more than awakewere all more
like some vision, that I was endeavouring, with painful
interest to remember again, than anything of reality,
in which I was concerned.
Ah! the light!the light!cried another. Fire!
Fire!cried another, out in the open air.
A sudden blaze of light, that penetrated even to my
covered and shut eyes; and a tremendous crash of
thunder
,
that shook the very earth under us, followed,
immediately
,
like a discharge of heavy ordnance, and made
us all start upon our feet, and all but me, run out of the
house.
In the name of God, what is the matter? cried I;
but, before I could get an answer, I had fallen back in
my seat, where I could see through the fissures of the
logs, out of which, the clay had been shaken, another
hovel, on higher ground, afar off, all in a light blaze. The
rain poured, frightfully; and, the house tottered, and
trembled, and swung about, as if it would fall about
our ears, every moment; while the whole room was
dark, with the dust of the blue clay, and plastering,
that were shaken out of the walls and chimney. The
lightning had struck a part of the building, it
appeared
;
and set fire to the only other house, upon the place.
After this; nay, even in the midst of it, I fell into a
little uneasy slumberfrom which I was waked, by
the low voices of people near me, whispering.
It is impossible. They cannot live through it,
said one. Ah, Jonathan, Jonathanthink of their
coming here, to take up with a fisherman's life, in their
old ageso good to the poor, as he wasso kind and
freeah, poor
K'iah
hard life this.
In their old age too, replied another---Ah, that's
it. Somebody was plainly sobbing near me. I looked
at the shadow.
It was the dwarf. His chest heaved, as with a
convulsion
.
Still there was a strangeness about all these
things, that reminded me only of past dreams; and the
Dd 2
knowledge, that I had been out of my senses lately,
kept me incredulous to their proof, even
then
. When
will this end? I muttered inwardly,---it is very
childish---and
wintry---in my bed, I suppose---perhaps in
my cell---and.
My breathing startled Hammond, who came to
me; and in that voice of unutterable power, which no
man living could hear unmoved, bid me prepare myself.
I will, said I, I
am
prepared, scarcely heeding
what he said.
The noise of the wind and the sea had abated; and
the shaking of the house, I observed, was all over.
Just then, the tread of another was heard
approaching
;
but I was weary of my own thought; and I drew
my heavy cloak about me; and buried my face in it
again
,
and fell sleep; yet while I slept, I dreamed, or
heard a dialogue of this nature, carried on very near
me, by unknown voices.
Is that he?
Yes---do not speak loud.
Poor fellow---will he bear it?
I know not; he is no common man---but, will she?
I heard no answer; but the breathing of Hammond
was then suspended, for a moment, as if he were
listening
;
and then he laid his hand upon mine.
She thought I, to myself, whom do they mean?
what
she?
. What have I came here for
here
I am
not, herewhere am I?surely there were some.
But my thoughts were diverted away again.
But how happened this ruin?why do not their
friends assist them? Their creditors.
Their
creditors!
said Hammond, with a little
laugh,
creditors
what! will ye ask the Egyptian to
free his hewer of wood, and drawer of waterthe
master
to set the slave free. Both may do so, if the slave
and bondmen be old and worthless; but the creditor,
never!
never!
But the Society.They are humane.
The
society
. They!it is they, that have broken
his heart They thrust him out from among them;
forth upon the world, more than a year ago, because
O, the righteous administration of such menbecause
some foreign house, in which poor Anson was
concerned
.
Anson
Anson! thought I; not Hezekiah Anson
O, no, not Hezekiah---But he went on.
Had failed. They called it commercial
gambling
;
and, after a while, they thrust the old man out from
among them. There began the history of his
calamities
.
He was no longer one of
them
;---and it was too
late to renew his covenant, with any other religion.
Abused and broken down; shut out from them, that
he had dwelt, and worshipped with, for half a
century
he
began to neglect his affairs---to entrust them
to others;---they have gone now to rack, and ruin;
but, he is still free, still untrammelled with debt. To
the last shirt upon his back; the last earthly remnant,
he hath sold, and paid!---and this,---look about you, and
behold the result;---this hovel, which he built, in the
day of his prosperity; and gave away to the family of a
poor fisherman, who left it years ago, to the birds and
the beasts of the island---is now his only refuge. He is
too old to work---he cannot beg---he will not borrow,
when there is no hope of repaying---cannot steal;---and
hath come here, alone, with his wife and child, to die.
His wife and child---his
child
, said I, of whom is
he talking? Still, I was troubled; and a cloud was
upon
me.
But, were it known, he would be relieved, I am
sure; hundreds of people in the city love and respect
him.
You are mistaken. They
did
love and respect him;
but they do so no longer. He is poor---wretchedly
poor, now; with no money to lend; no merchandize to
sell; no ships to freight; and the tenderest hearted
think it quite enough to be charitable, when they are
persuaded, and solicited, while calamity is yet fresh
and frightful in its visitation. But,
now
---now, that
many winters have passed; and poor Anson is too much
of a man to run after the world, and importune them,
and supplicate them with his gray hair, and trembling
hands; and the desolation is already an old story---it
were vain.
The speaker was interrupted by a loud shriek from a
room above. Gracious God!the lightning flashed
in, all at once upon methe house tottered; as I leaped
upward; and rent and tore my way, like a mad man,
out of the encumbering habiliments. It was
her
voice
hers!
I knew itI followed itI broke through the
partitionI threw myself upon a bed.
Yes, it was
she
it was she!poor, dear Caroline.
She knew me, immediately; shrieked twenty times,
without stopping; and put her delicate arms around
my neck, and sobbed aloud; and laughed and cried on
my bosom. I slept thenvery suddenlyfor, I knew
not how long; and we both slept, breast to breast; and,
when I awoke, I found myself in a better apartment,
sitting upa curtained bed before me; and an aged man
sitting near it; the blue chintz curtain drawn; and a
woman, whom I knew, kneeling by the side of it.
I waited, and waited, until I heard a slight motion
in the bed, and saw a thin white hand put out; and the
curtains drawn; and the candle that was by the bed-side,
upon the light stand, flared widely for a moment.
Yes, yes! it was Caroline! I staggered to the bed.
I fell upon my kneesI articulated her name; and I
felt her caressing hand in my hair, pressing my
forehead
.
I drew it to my lips.
Not a word was uttered. Nothing was heard but a
deep, deep heaving of the heart, at long intervals, as if
all of us were dreaming together, under a heavy load.
Hezekiah, said I, is it Hezekiah? He lifted his
eyesthey were fiery. I touched the woman. She
shook off my hand, as if it were the touch of blood.O,
would that I might awake! I cried, where am I?
William, William, love! said a voice, of such
endearing
softness. O, it was that which I had heard in
the next room, and thought to be some instrument,
tuned by the wind.
I became more composed. I looked upon Caroline.
Never, no never, had I seen her so very beautifulher
complexion so delicately, vividly transparent; her
wonderful, large, clear eyes so deep and dark, and
lustrous
there
was a drop of star light in their very
centre
.
Caroline, said I, it is you, I am sure. Do you
know me?
Know thee
, William!---Her sweet lips parted, as
they spoke, and trembled, with the intenseness of her
rebuke---O, when have I forgotten thee! father! look
up! mother---awake! The hour is at hand; the hour of
trial. My weakness hath gone. Awake, and listen to
me! William do thou place a pillow for me---assist
me to rise---and let me lay my head upon thy
shoulder
.
The old man arose; and took his wife's hand, and
stood before the child's bed, in obedience, like creatures
that are about consummating a religious ceremony.
There was a silence so fearful, for some minutes--that,
but for the breathing of Caroline,---I should have
relapsed
into my first doubting, and fancied that the
venerable creatures, who stood before me, were shadows
of another world.
Father
---said Caroline---
Mother!
I have brought
sorrow to your aged hearts. You have loved me, and
doated on me. I had been obedient, I thought, all my
life. Every thought of my heart had been told to you.
I had no concealment---none. Yet---I am upon my
death bed;now, in the blossom of my youth;-- the
gray hairs of my father, and my mother, are going
down to the grave with me;---and the man that I loved
very tenderly---he is about to follow me.---I am dying,
mother---and sincerity like mine, cannot be sinful at
such a moment---do not reproach me, therefore, that I
tell my love, now, for the first time. But O, William
---William---let the lesson be written upon thy heart!
My first errour---was concealment---my next, the
sin
of disobedienceand that went on, and on, till----
it is now too late to deny it---though I die chastely, yet
---I do not deserve it. I have been too utterly in thy
power. And now---we have not many minutes more.---
Let me see you forgive each other.
I put out my arms to embrace her mother. She
shrank, and trembled. Her love for me was all gone.
O, mother! said Caroline;
this
, to thy daughter,
on her death bed!
This
, thy lesson of forgiveness and
resignation? Wilt thou not believe?---William Adams
---my beloved---stand thou up, there! Remember that
thou art in the presence of a just God! Bear thou
witness
for me! Speak thou, to this aged man and woman
---they that forget their humanity, and their relationship
to a dying child; and declare thou my innocence!
By my hope of everlasting salvation, cried I,
kneeling and clasping my hands, Caroline is
altogether
innocent!
We embraced then---and sobbed---and wept.
And by mine too! mother,
mine
too! and the season
of trial is too near to me now, for deception.
He too is
innocent
. As I hope for mercy---I am innocent, and he
too;---but I declare to you, that I owe it less to myself,
that I am so, than to his mercy; and to the protection
of our Father in Heaven. And now, William, farewell.
I must be alone. I cannot have thee near me, at my
last hour---dear---it will take off my thought from
heaven
.
Would'st thou, that I should die reluctantly?
Then, leave me---leave me---my father and mother will
remainheaven have mercy on me---O---II
Again the old man embraced me---and the mother.
O, William, said she, as her grey hairs were woven
with mine, thou should'st have been the husband of
Caroline---our dear child---but---it is, now, too late. Be
patient William. Farewell!
I turned toward Caroline---I went to the bed again.
I knew not what supported me---I went to her---she had
turned away her face---and her beautiful hand had
fallen
over the pillow. I touched itit was strangely
coldI put my mouth to hers, once moreGod!it
was all over with herand darkness fell upon meand
firea storm of brightnessand
END OF VOL. I.